Yep.What is the defining origin of Catholicism if not Germanic values, which go back to the Indo-Europeans?

The way I see it: we're either deciding between Semitic values or Germanic values, and the IE evo strat certainly led its way into science (it enshrines honorable testimony), but the Semitic did not (it enshrines lying).

When I read a science journal, what I'm actually reading is existential testimony.There's a 0.81 correlation between crime and ethnicity, but only a 0.36 one between crime and poverty.Because it's a total coincidence nearly every neoreactionary is a former ancap.

It couldn't be many of us are a more developed version of yourselves.Modern American (non-Catholic) Christianity is a gradient of Germanic-to-Anglo/Semitic values.

The True blue (non-Catholic) Christians will embellish the Semitic and Anglo values, while the looser ones will embellish the Germanic.

In other words, the Christians who practice a kind of militant social conservatism tend to be psychologically Germanic, while the "do no harm; turn the other cheek" Anglo and Semitic.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vu8jfUTAt0Y&amp;t=2h35m26s&gt;What if muslims held a majority position in the ancap/NRx communities?

They're too ethnocentric to be sufficiently meritocratic for robust capital accumulation.

It's why Northern Europe (filled with a low ethnocentric, outbred group) dwarfed both the East and the Near East's achievements combined many times over.I've never seen this guy come out as a neoreactionary.

I thought he was one of you guys, probably is.&gt;It's lazy to attribute nefarious reasons for the meteoric rise of such individuals.

I don't have to paint them as evil to calmly discuss their pluralistic diasporic evo strat.

&gt;You have made several conclusory statements, but have provided no discernable discussion points.

Individuals don't make civilizations; the great feats any of us are capable of is largely due to the civilization in which we find ourselves and its institutions.

What's dangerous about diasporic evo strats is that they're inherently destabilizing of host countries, and when that host is the West, it can lead to civilizational regression (the Jews' social institutions aren't as productive as the West's; they won't be able to pick up the slack if they kill the host).

In the end, though, I'm confident their evo strat will be defeated by the Western evo strat (and no, that's not simple genocide\u2014if anything, that's precisely what low trust evo strats would do).&gt;Right, but this still does not mean all people should automatically be presumed being a criminal based on ethnicity.

I'm just saying, clearly poverty is not the biggest factor.Can you show me a place where this isn't accused of having occurred?

The West is the least racist, most meritocratic set of locations in the world and in history, and yet it's constantly maligned for its "structural racism."&gt;he doesn't say that civilization is a necessary component for this to occur

For what to occur?  For hierarchy to occur?

&gt;based on the way he critiques civilization in relation to culture, it would seem that he even sees civilization to often be a structural impediment to it 

Because you want to keep holding on to your Bureaucracy interpretation.  We already agree on that, but I sense a dishonest motive in you now, where you want to conflate that interpretation with all interpretations of 'civilization'.

&gt;what section are you quoting "a natural order of the first rank" from

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vu8jfUTAt0Y&amp;t=3h29m4sAre you not familiar with Kevin MacDonald and Curt Doolittle's work?&gt; Earlier in the empire they allowed people of Syrian, African, Spanish, Illyrian, and many other non Roman ethnicities to come to positions of leadership and power

You're referring to North African, and Spanish back then meant something very different.

In any event, the West does employ this relative meritocracy.

&gt;if they would have incorporated the Germans into their society the way they had incorporated the Syrians, Iberians, Illyrians, Gauls, Africans and others in less decedent, fearful and racist times, then the empire would have lasted much longer. 

It essentially did, with the Visigoths simply taking over the reigns.

&gt;I do think the tendency to bureaucracy is an important thing to consider in analyzing civilizations.

The Western evo strat is not Bureaucratism; that's the Sino evo strat.

&gt;I am attempting to use it as Nietzsche does

Nietzsche does not use the term in a singular fashion, as that link demonstrates.

Here are a few other quotes from just that work: 

_"The poisonous doctrine, \u201cequal rights for all,\u201d has been propagated as a Christian principle: out of the secret nooks and crannies of bad instinct Christianity has waged a deadly war upon all feelings of reverence and distance between man and man,  which is to say, upon the first prerequisite to every step upward, to every development of civilization."_

_"A high civilization is a pyramid: it can stand only on a broad base; its primary prerequisite is a strong and soundly consolidated mediocrity."_

_"It would be altogether unworthy of a profound intellect to see anything objectionable in mediocrity in itself. It is, in fact, the first prerequisite to the appearance of the exceptional: it is a necessary condition to a high degree of civilization."_

&gt;It says, "an order of nature, a natural law of the first rank" -- pretty close though.

I hope you realize that you can translate that from the German into what I said, and how pathetically grasping that you thought this bore attention.

&gt;and violence enforced hierarchy is the reason why

Wait a second, are you claiming that Nietzsche was against 'violence enforced hierarchy'?

Do we really need to return to the final chapter of _BG&amp;E_ with you leftists, for the 10,000th time?Maybe my understanding of modern world events is flawed, but how is he lecturing the US, with what he did in Crimea and Ukraine?  And with what he does to internal political enemies.

Russia isn't randomly a high-trust country, at the convenient moment of a press conference.

State-to-state, the chess game never stops.There's ~33x more white non-Hispanics in the US than there are Muslims.

Given that, that there are as many as 26 jihadist attacks for 48 "right wing" (and presumably white non-Hispanic caused) is not a compliment to Muslims.

We have [a concordance of data showing Muslims as a group hold more violent views than Europeans, too.](https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/)It already is culturally alien to the coastal regions and big cities.

Only rural America has any significant appreciation for and direct experience with firearms.&gt;thanks to hundreds of years of bondafide oppression

American slavery wasn't as bad as is propagandized in public schools.

(What, the State randomly tells the truth in this particular part of history?  Many of you are already awake to who Lincoln really was.)

The slaves that were purchased were sold to Europeans by their very own people, as a result of tribal warfare, so they could purchase more weapons for more war for more weapons, in a never-ending cycle of domination blacks wanted to commit against each other.

For the lucky few who didn't die in a war, were taken as prisoner (or simply kidnapped by blacks), and made it to the US, they were fed better than those who sold them\u2014American blacks ate better than even many Northerners, especially the Irish\u2014and didn't have death in a random African war always looming over their heads.

Now, we can shoot for an even better arrangement, but unfortunately for those early West Africans, they didn't understand our language, customs, or markets as well as we ourselves did, hence a kind of legal paternalism was natural.

And there have been [many accounts by slaves themselves that they enjoyed the arrangement.](http://i.imgur.com/4gbhBOP.png)  Some were even confused why it was ended.Many African and Middle Eastern groups have been slaves of each other for thousands of years.

The slavery practiced by Europeans was gentle by comparison, eugenic, and historically brief.  Masters actually invested in their slaves, because they understood the capital value of them.

Many of the men were fed a pound of pork a day, something some Northerners could only dream of.Much gun violence is linked to urban areas, not rural.

Here in the South, there are parts where there's three guns per person, and yet everyone is very kind and outgoing toward one another.

This issue is much more complicated, invoking race and culture.The fall of capital L libertarianism is due to its push for the Levantine interpretation of freedom (do whatever nonviolent thing you want, even if it's socially irresponsible).

Americans don't go for that: the interpretation of freedom they understand is the Anglo-Saxon one, where trust and social responsibility are not abandoned, but are encouraged and protected, to create an ascending polity.

There's a strong chance the US is doomed to ethnic fracture and secession, regardless of what is done in the next twenty years, but either then or after, the way out for any surviving white group is to listen to all political specializations' grievances, integrate them, and move forward with our ancient Western evo strat: aristocratic egalitarianism, where markets, social norms, and class continuity are observed and maintained.

Essentially, at the core, each of the three major political specializations are right: class continuity is eroding, certain submarkets are overregulated and weakening, and social norms which hold it all together receding.  We are becoming an unaristocratic people and have to return to the healthy balance of the three interests.12 year olds write better stories.&gt;Congrats on ~~posting the fucking stupidest post I've seen on Reddit this week~~ hurting my feelings.I don't see why I should repost Kevin MacDonald's works, when the more efficient option is you just read them.And as if race doesn't bias a people in those directions.Western meritocracy has certainly experienced a trough, but historically speaking it has been, and even today probably still is relatively speaking.Northwest (White) or Southwest (Hispanic).  These are two of the areas most homogeneous toward a given demographic and thus most primed for separation.

However, given that non-white Americans are largely gaining from the association with whites, I'd be surprised if the Southwest wanted to secede first, but regardless of who secedes first the Southwest is already culturally lost.

There has been interesting works published on this matter as well as [interesting complementary analysis](https://jaymans.wordpress.com/2015/07/29/genes-climate-and-even-more-maps-of-the-american-nations/).

From [here,](https://jaymans.files.wordpress.com/2014/12/north-american-nations-4-3.png) the next cultural division\u2014Northeast and Southeast\u2014is actually larger than the aforementioned, but the South is not sufficiently homogeneous to pull off secession as easily as the Northwest could.

And what's more, the South really exists as three entities: the Appalachians, the Deep South, and the relatively well-educated, high-income Tidewater.

Tidewater would leave last of the three due to proximity to the North and functional attachment to D.C., Appalachia would have an easier time with regard to blacks, but not with regard to local economies (mining ghost towns, reallocation of resources post-regulation), and the Deep South's perennial problem of blacks still holds it back.

Realistically, I'm doubtful we will ever see _formal_ separation for each distinct culture, but I think there's a good chance we will see the first major bloc fractures within the next 60 years.  The Mid-Northwest looks like it will be the securest holdout for whites (a great deal of uncorrupted Anglos and Germanics live there, still traditionalist and still proud of their heritage), as they lose control of the government federally and as the Federal gov't experiences fiscal shocks.I'm saying the story itself is likely bullshit; I'm not caring that he's foreign.

Humans of New York is also a hilariously awful FB page.&gt;This is PHI1100.

[Rothbard is not even PHI 300](http://www.vforvoluntary.com/my-articles/16/rothbard-misunderstood-and-misrepresented-misess-morality).

Even Mises, whom I respect much more than Rothbard as much more read and well-thought, is not without his amateur mistakes (e.g. his proof for the synthetic a priori).

After interacting with Curt more than a few times, I can confirm he's even more philosophically educated than Hoppe is, even if I don't like the kind of philosophy he's into (way too Anglo for me, and we know what Nietzsche said about Mill and Darwin).

&gt;we\u2019re presented with a bundle of unbacked assertions and undefined terms lacking any context as to how this relates to Rothbardianism

That his system is non-trivial to _technically_ understand (I contest it's very easy to understand intuitively, just not technically) and takes work to decode is not uncommon to many other scientific fields.  If I showed you a bioanalytical chemistry journal, you couldn't even make it through the abstract; these fields take time to understand, but they certainly are not obscurantist.

Obscurantism is perhaps the last charge one can make of a scientist: it's precisely their job to make the indiscernible discernible, both of nature and between men; we pursue patterns, and we relay those patterns in an operational way (the methods and procedure sections of a science journal are exactly what operationalism is\u2014putting everything on the table, showcasing an existential proof).

And in actuality, science must linguistically proceed by way of packaged phrases.  We invent terms, so as to condense operators.  We do this even in mathematics, with numbers and functions.  Were we forbidden from doing this and existential proofs had to always be in their most unpacked form, we couldn't efficiently communicate with one another.

Instead, what we scientists do is package in a manner befitting our audience and needed economy.  Sometimes, this means we have to lose some people.  The important thing, however, is that we still are held to account for existential proofs by our peers (just like legal juries\u2014not an accidental association).

So, what does this mean in relation to you?  You're not a peer of Curt, and consequently are having difficulty unpacking his condensed operations and seeing if he's a hypocritical sophist himself.  I'm not even a peer of Curt, at least not on the deeper metaphysical points he makes; I'm not that educated in analytic philosophy (I'm much more interested in Continental) and I'm mostly just waiting for his treatise, to put him to the final logical test; his site is too poorly organized for me to waste my time on most of his posts (so we're probably in agreement on that one detail).

One thing that should be said in his defense, however, is that he never sought to make his posts his final product; he more likes to brainstorm with those who similarly enjoy the back-forth.

&gt;It\u2019s not at all clear what Doolittle means by \u201cfree riding,\u201d

Obviously, he's just employing it in its general meaning: free-riding is the process by which third-party gains are made without costs being borne.

Now, I do think this statement of his \u2014 _"If free riding is present, then it is not logical to cooperate._" \u2014 is not logically tight enough, as cooperation can still be rational, even if a third-party free rides, but I do agree that it naturally incenses people (making them bear an individual opportunity cost to a scenario where they can extract payment) and increases demand for the State.

&gt;and the burden shouldn\u2019t be on the Rothbardian reader to decode his inside baseball

Well, he has a glossary section on his site.

&gt;These are not logically incompatible terms, as there are numerous ways an unproductive individual could \u201cfree ride\u201d on general rising productivity without coercion (charity, panhandling, enjoying the commons, etc.) while still preserving a general spirit of cooperation in society.

He obviously is not an advocate of "non-coercion," and is obviously pushing for something more precisely controlled than just "a general spirit of cooperation."

&gt;More importantly, how do property rights emerge prior to economic production, as opposed to as a result of economic production

Well, you obviously have to have titles before you can even trade.

&gt;the relevance of monogamy

Monogamous marriage is a social institution whereby the two sexes' different breeding strategies are compromised into an equilibrium, and this negotiation rests on property, where adultery is criminal.  What the punishments should be for it, I don't know, and I'm not sure Curt has ever suggested something in particular.

From Curt's post: 

&gt;It is possible to construct a federation of polities, as the medieval monarchies demonstrated, wherein cooperation between factions is limited to low trust \u2013 enforcement of merely criminal prohibitions

And this is exactly what international law is: notice how states are much more able and willing to enforce against bare criminal acts between each other, like killing and stealing, but mostly mind their business on cultural issues?

It's when low trust can be gotten past that a nation starts to form; where low trust cannot be overcome, the 'society' remains not really a 'society', but a conglomeration of multiple, divided nations.

Returning to your post: 

&gt;it\u2019s unclear what \u201cimmoral action\u201d is referring to

Maybe [this](http://imgur.com/a/kIHKT) will clarify.  I always interpreted his use of the term as action that wasn't "fully informed, warranted, value added, and voluntary."

&gt;I suspect he means libertine behaviors which don\u2019t align with his aesthetic.

They probably don't, but he's already said his aesthetics are logically independent of his political economics.

&gt;This is it. The full scope of Doolittle's attention to the NAP in an article claiming to render Rothbardian claims embarrassing and argumentatively impossible.

Actually, the entire piece is highly related to the article's title.  It's obviously understandable some vantage points will not be able to see that, however.

&gt;The NAP under ISV only prohibits criminal, but not unethical or immoral
&gt;&gt;An unbacked assertion

How is that an unbacked assertion?  Have you read _Defending the Undefendable_?

&gt;further obfuscated by Doolittle's lack of descriptions for the various behaviors he claims the NAP is incapable of prohibiting

That image album should list examples, which include lying\u2014both directly and by omission\u2014as well as free riding.

&gt;he fails to acknowledge that unethical behavior, such as breach of contract or fraud, are indeed considered criminal under the NAP

You can't create a contract for what is fluid, real-time social dynamics, and what would then be the point of the NAP, if a libertarian society constantly required additional, oft-clausal stipulative norms?

Why not move forward with the full formalization which included those norms?  In a way, Hoppe moved toward this, but Curt picked up where he left off.

&gt;how can Doolittle claim that the NAP doesn\u2019t prohibit conquest? What exactly does the Non-Aggression Principle entail if not a prohibition on conquest?

War is obviously included under ancaps' prohibition against aggression, but not included is cultural conquest, via immigration, breeding, and religious activity.

I'll admit, some of these terms seem strange and stifling even to me, but I understand their logical relevance.  Perhaps, the matter is that these would certainly be the interests of a polity, to maintain its identity, but whether every polity should maintain its identity is something I obviously object to.

&gt;he doesn't offer even a cursory explanation as to why his "prohibition on free riding" outlook fares better than the ancap prohibition on aggression

Sure, he does: his thesis is that it lowers the barrier for cooperation and decreases demand for the State.

&gt;his critiques of a sophisticated theory are so aggressively illiterate

As someone who's been familiar with Rothbardianism for nearly a decade, I don't consider it sophisticated.

&gt;The next time you NRx'ers want to claim that Rothbardian libertarianism has been supplanted by Doolittle's theories

Rothbardianism was supplanted by Misesianism several years ago, no need for Curt to have slayed Rothbard.Are pure mathematicians obscurantists?

Is [this](http://www.scielo.br/img/revistas/aabc/v85n2//0001-3765-aabc-85-02-443-ge58.jpg) obscurantism?

How do we know deceit from specialty?  The only way is to do the legwork of following the unpacked steps, to become educated and literate in a body of work and field.&gt;basement in Ukraine

Basement?  Haha, oh, boy, are you unfamiliar with him.

&gt;You just solved all the problems of the 20th Century.

If you look at his bibliography, it's quite dense, making him more of a synthesizer of dozens of minds.&gt;they're actually stupid enough to believe that a state can and will be benevolent

Testimonialists don't worship the State, but precisely seek to eliminate it, as one of the most egregious parasitic actors of all.Yes, when I read that line, I found it tortured and in need of editing, too.

A while back, I wondered if he employs an editor; I think he does have a (perhaps, paid) team to help him with his treatise, but it's clear some of his posts (which seem to just come from FB musing) lack basic editing (as OP said, sloppy capitalization).

&gt;I tried to approach it like a puzzle -- come up with the precise combination of definitions for each term that

Haha, yes, I do that, too, with some authors.  Hearing another person phrase it in such a relatable manner amuses me.

How I interpreted the quote was thus: 

&gt;And since all objective moral arguments and corresponding property definitions **[may be talking about Rotbardians' insistence on allowing libertine behavior, as not immoral, and it being immoral to suppress it]** consist of involuntary transfers that violate the prohibition on free riding, we can construct no libertarian argument **[we can't construct Rothbardian arguments against free riding]** against it.

I think what he's trying to say is: _"Since Rothbardianism allows for free-riding, we can't construct a Rothbardian argument against free-riding."_  I could be wrong, but if I'm right, it certainly was a terrible way of simply saying that.No reason to not give due where it is due.  By honoring success where I think it is success, I subject myself to the full rigors of character development.

Were I to go, "Oh, well, I don't like you, so I'm going to discount your success," I'd shelter my mind from the bumps and bruises that come from intellectual growth, and I'd thereby rob and delude myself from what the full arena looks like.

But anyways, Curt is not a role model of mine by any means (he's an Anglo empiricist, whereas I'm something quite different), simply useful.

I've also always been one to track the psychological undercurrents of things, the libertarian movement being one of them, and I've already spotted that Curt is slated to change much of the movement's direction, so he and his opponents are at least intriguing to watch, if nothing else.&gt;Do you even know what obscurantism is? It's not when a scientist uses technical terms

Of course, I know what obscurantism is, but I'm laying the groundwork for what he's actually doing as being scientific\u2014technically packaged.

&gt;Curt is 100% guilty of this.

How can you know, without completely unpacking him?  Where is the gotcha non-sequitur?

&gt;I knew that immediately based upon your writing style.

And yet, you are the emotionally startled one here, not me.

I hope you realize, for every Reddit exchange, there's probably something like 30+ times as many onlookers, and one-third to one-half are people who make note of tone and discern strength of total position from that, so I'd recommend controlling your emotions better in debates, if you want more influence.

I can confirm I've gotten dozens PMs over the years, from people telling me they could tell I was on to something by how calmly I engaged and how hysterical my opponents always were.  Maybe I was logically wrong, but rhetorically, it's very unwise to waste time with "Pfft, yeah right!"s.

&gt;Is fraud unethical? The NAP prohibits that.

Not by any rigorous logical extension, only that NAPers realize they have to placate on that issue.

And if breaking a contract is inherently immoral, why isn't verbal lying?

&gt;What do you mean by fluid, real-time social dynamics, and why are these incompatible with contracts?

There's always a cutting edge, pre-contractual element to life, and we can't enter into explicit contract every single novel interaction.

&gt;to call one of the most prolific political philosophers of the 20th Century

There have been scores of political philosophers in the 20th century, many of whom were better read than Rothbard.  That may be a hard thing for an ancap to admit, but it's True.

This doesn't mean Rothbard is a random bum on the street, but he's not even in the top 30 philosophers.

&gt;The only difference between Misesianism and Rothbardianism is that Rothbard modified Mises' views with natural rights theory and state abolition.

It also bears a rhetorical and sociological difference, as it relates to how a free society could be achieved.  This was the beginning step for many Misesians to become techno-commercialists.&gt;And on top of that, the mathematics are structured in a logical orderly fashion so that anyone with the right knowledge can follow. Good mathematics does not make leaps of understanding.

Certainly, but to know that with him, you'd have to educate yourself more in his system.Well, /r/ancap is obviously just a sliver of the libertarian movement.

But, I will say, as self-serving as it may sound, most of the more educated, more experienced, and probably more intelligent ancaps I've met here over the years have come around to preferring his system, to varying degrees.

And full disclosure: It is also True, however, that these same men have moved into the alt-right and what socially traditionalist views that typically brings\u2014though I think this connection is the result of being inherently related to some of the things Curt talks about\u2014himself also a traveler in the (very diverse) alt-right\u2014and indicates a deeper understanding of political economy (i.e. when one gets past socially oblivious libertarianism, _of course_ one dabbles in some manner of traditionalism).

&gt;but enough to shift the quality of this sub

Well, the sad thing then for you is that posts in relation to the alt-right are the deepest this sub typically sees (sorry, but Janet Yellen and police shooting stories aren't deep).Was that on here (link, if so?), or are you referring to a FB interaction?&gt;So he's trying to say that because free-riding doesn't necessarily cause any quantifiable harm, a Rothbardian approach would not attempt to pre-empt it

Maybe [I'm one of the more radical Austrians](https://www.reddit.com/r/CalculationProblems/comments/2wu17u/should_the_economic_calculation_problem_be_called/), but I avoid quantitation, even in explicit pricing, at least as it concerns anything beyond trivial business accounting.

So, anyways, I think what Curt is really opposing rests more on the _moral allowance_ for free-riding, not so much whether it can be quantified or not, as I think many Rothbardians would allow for free-riding, even if it could somehow be quantified or estimated.

&gt;he's starting from the proposition that free-riding is harmful

Well, is it not, socially?  This is probably where ancaps should first begin thinking and talking about with him, not so much the metaphysics; his amendment to praxeology can come later.

&gt;I think what he's trying to say is: "Since Rothbardianism allows for free-riding, we can't construct a Rothbardian argument against free-riding."
&gt;&gt;But that's just a tautology.

Of course, which just makes such a statement a manner of conversing; people do it all the time (obviously, the logical import of such a thesis would then be found elsewhere).It certainly is True that Rothbardians and people like Walter Block should consider Curt's system socially authoritarian, but it's authoritarian as a nation, not a rent-seeking state.

Think of traditional America, where adultery and pre-marital sex and pregnancy were shamed and suppressed in some manner or other.  Libertine libertarians would certainly regard this as authoritarian, but again, that's not really a rent-seeking state.&gt;A non-sequitur isn't needed to demonstrate obscurantism.

Sure, it is.  Obscurantism can only really be solidified as a charge until one can find non-sequiturs disguised as sequiturs, as well as the probable existence of gross and obvious-to-peers inconsistencies.

Just because someone is hard to understand does not make them sufficiently guilty, so you're going to need more evidence\u2014what better evidence than an intellectual peer deconstructing the argument and showing fraud, which I will define as "exhibiting a level of stupidity that is atypical of that specialty, but which is also personally profitable and socially parasitic."

Think of the cold fusion guys, or any form of fudging data\u2014peers attempt to reproduce the existential claim, can't, and gradually realize the person is engaging in the type of fraud defined above.  This can be seen as a kind of obscurantism, but I of course agree with you that historically obscurantism was also often associated with postmodernists.  That said, what the pomos did _does actually_ relate to operationalism and scientific testimony, so I am using the term in a consistent way between both scenarios.

&gt;I get it, Rothbard was jewbad and we can't have that.

Rothbard actually consciously championed Western civilization and did not want its destruction, even if he subconsciously slipped in certain non-Western ethics.

&gt;He invented anarcho-capitalism -- no mean feat.

The ground work was already laid honestly; it wasn't that much of a logical leap, especially given his diasporic ethics.

&gt;you can't slag off on Rothbard while cheerleading someone like Curt as revolutionary

Curt's end game isn't my end game (I consider him a bourgeois modernite), but I do think it's a fact he is many of you (also bourgeois) libertarians' end game.  His system is the technical means you should actually be employing to fight the State, not anarcho-capitalism.

We're talking about thousands-fold growth in social feasibility, usability, and power (don't forget that classical liberalism has actually existed in history and is the most powerful system to ever exist, whereas a kind of anarcho-capitalism exists with Xeer, and yet such communities like it and the Levant are so poor and conflict-dense).  The left-libertarians can't make this move, but you right-libertarians have every reason to make the move.

&gt;It also bears a rhetorical and sociological difference, as it relates to how a free society could be achieved.
&gt;&gt;That has more to do with the break between minarchism and anarchism than anything else. Not sure I follow you here.

No, Rothbard believed in a conscious ideologizing model of political order, whereas Mises held more to a non-ideological model.  This entailed many Misesians moved on into developing techno-commercialism.Obviously, it's the feminized, cheeseball narratives they push.I agree that many parts of California are beautiful, and I agree that not all of Hispanics are disagreeable people, but sociopolitically that state has gone to hell because of immigration.

Don't mistake my position for lack of cultural interaction; I support international trade in goods, services, and ideas, just not political supplanting of values I hold (a tool commonly used by states throughout history).I wasn't saying he was entirely wrong; was just cautioning celebrating him in particular.Crime is predicted twice as well by ethnicity than poverty.&gt;There's every reason to believe that if the drug war, welfare, minimum wage, public education/housing were eliminated that only a minority of blacks would be exhibiting the negative behavior 

What about Africa, then?We can end the war on the drugs and that will certainly have some effects, but I don't think it will reduce black crime rates to parity with whites', as Africa demonstrates.If I had a low IQ, was in a foreign land, and escaped violent, impoverished conditions, sure.&gt;North African were berber and semitic peoples back then, and Syrians were mainly semitic as well. Certainly not your precious indo-europeans.

Eh, I'm not so sure.  I certainly can't say one way or the other, but I do know Iranians and a number of Mediterraneans have the haplotypes.

&gt;The Romans in the early empire actually had it more so than we have it today

I know.

&gt;to the extent to which we follow the advice of racists such as yourself

Being a race realist doesn't prevent one from being a meritocrat.

&gt;You for example would certainly have the west cease having this relative meritocracy

Not True.&gt;Let's just ignore that polycentric-law allows the creation of w/e social norms you want to live with

The point is that only high trust libertarianism will survive and maintain high levels of capital accumulation.

Let's not forget that when we say 'polycentric law', what we're really saying is 'international law', and in that international law, which arrangements have fared the best?  High trust liberalism.

So, while you can advocate the minimal position of 'polycentric law', it's not really much of a system to advocate for or an interesting position in itself.Is taxation propagandized as bad in public schools?&gt; Where are we getting "inherently immoral" from? The differential treatment between breach of contract and lying can be explained without reference to morality. Are you presupposing that the NAP is derivative of morality?

I was talking specifically about the NAP moralists and minimalists.

&gt;Libertarians (as compared to Doolittle) do not ignore this.

To be fair, Curt _is_ a psychological libertarian\u2014he's very bourgeois, very pro-production, and is a successful entrepreneur himself.  He just is intelligent enough to not limit his political philosophy to his own psychological predisposition; he understands how to include progressive and conservative instincts, too, in a mutually reinforcing manner.

&gt;For instance, if I assure you I will give you a job if you move to a new city, and then I do not follow through, there is at least a plausible account of how we would hold the promisor accountable for damages without violating any other libertarian rule (in my view).

How?&gt; You don't think that bureaucracy is a problem in western civilization? Really?

You need to become more precise with your language: the State is _not_ civilization.

If you can't create these distinctions, then whatever "anti-civilization" thing you're referencing can be easily misperceived by people you were probably trying to convince of your position.

&gt;while they do show Nietzsche praises civilization, don't contradict his criticisms of it

Because he has multiple meanings for the same word, something I'm also capable of, but you keep using civilization in a negative way.

&gt;Sort of like Nietzsche's views on the Jews -- he is critical of them, but is not an anti-semite.

He was an anti-anti-Semite only to the extent he was an anti-plebeian; he was _far_ from being a philo-Semite, as _The Anti-Christ_ shows.

&gt;I doubt that the German would allow an appositional phrase to be either in or out of the sentence

Nietzsche is a constantly appositionalizing writer.

&gt;It is something he is not against, but which his analysis of does include a critique of.

Lion-Child, yes, we know.

&gt;but decided that living without civilization is a better way of engendering and furthering a cultural aristocracy.

What is "living without civilization" to you?Yes, we talked about this last time.&gt;I may have been a bit loose in my language there: I meant "quantifiable harm" to convey manifest harm, i.e. harm directly observable and identifiable as such

Oh, Rothbardians can observe clear harm in things like IP and its violation, or in slandering of reputation.  They just don't think it's justified to retaliate.

&gt;it doesn't seem clear that benefiting from positive externalizes without directly contributing to the process that created them inherently imposes costs on anyone else

Relative to a scenario where the producer was compensated, it does.  The real critique to this suppression of free-riding is the one lib-boy mentions, where we need to evaluate the relative merit and cost of suppressive actions, too.

&gt;if the opportunity to free-ride (without violating the property rights of anyone in particular, of course) can act as a release valve for what might otherwise transform into support for authoritarianism

How could that happen?

&gt;I'd expect a written essay intended as a philosophical treatise to be a bit more rigorous

That "article" was probably literally a Facebook status update.The Kurds are feminist libsocs.  Let them stand or fall by themselves.Please don't take the following as cheesy TRP analysis; I only mean these terms scientifically: 

Beta males will increasingly experience existential difficulties the more dysfunctional the sexual market becomes (marriage breaking down being one of the main causes).  Through a combination of that and dysgenics, the West will see mass shooting incidents, which are essentially just protest suicides.

In the Middle East, how beta males handle sexual exclusion in their polygamous culture and still seek prestige is suicide bombing.  The West's monogamy was supposed to be an ingenious adaptation toward avoiding the social unrest of exclusion, combined of course with eugenic institutions like manorialism.  However, this is starting to unravel the more and more dysgenic the West becomes.Hah, fun retort.

What then became corrupted?  I still push meritocracy.Me tearing apart your hypocritical character assaults on other people is not the same thing as me dismissing all merits of your arguments.

You have been one of the better opponents of mine on this forum, though I'm not sure how much that is really saying.&gt;and we know how people select identities: to further their status

What's delusional about the science that's been repeatedly reproduced about average racial differences?

I can flood you with a concordance of 200 journals.  What's delusional?

&gt;All I can suggest is actually go out and interact with people.

I have.  I live in the South.  I've interacted with more blacks than probably most of this forum.

Well, he constantly interacts with anyone who wants to engage him in messaging, something many intellectuals refuse to do, precisely because he doesn't want to be incomprehensible.

This is a very humble, joyous man.  He's far more educated than almost everyone here, yet he talks to many of us like we have some kind of special honorable prestige.California is home to some of the largest Hispanic communities in the US.The way you guys go on and on about "freed markets," without having an earthly clue of how that arises, is embarrassing.Can you show me many of them having multiple wives?Are you saying that the State would be the exact same, regardless of demographics?Oh, the irony.International law is decentralized, by definition.&gt;I haven;t heard anything about these guys being pushed into a feminine identity that they didn't identify with.

A couple of these families actively push their little boys into hormone therapy.  A child doesn't understand the gravity of these matters.  If anything, a male with sexual identity issues should experiment with testosterone treatment, not estrogen.

Many of these identity issues are influenced by there not being a father, too\u2014"I don't need no man" (yeah, when the State is your man).

&gt;Also, a transperson is just as capable of forming healthy relationships and succeeding economically as you or me.

That's not what the statistics show: the suicide rate is quite high, and it actually increases with each successive operation.

&gt;The Rape Culture Myth
&gt;&gt;It's not a myth.

Okay, can you provide some evidence and definitions?

&gt;If a guy cannot get laid, he is sure to feel inadequate.
&gt;&gt;This is because of our society's treatment of male sexuality.

This is fairly deep-seated, biologically.  No society has a reason to celebrate the not trying to project forward genes (and of course, genetic inheritance isn't as simple as individual mating, as many genes of an individual get passed on regardless of if that particular individual breeds, especially through their siblings and cousins).

&gt;What? Feminists want women to be treated like human beings. How does this lead to a miserable life of loneliness?

Traditional masculinity can accomplish that just fine; if anything, traditional masculinity treats women better than modern society does.

We have to understand that these gender roles are the result of thousands of years; deceiving ourselves that we can change them _simply because (some people's) conscious minds think they want it_ is not a strong enough reason; such people are fighting the deep-seated subconscious.

I have seen this deep-seated subconscious plenty of times in women; it's very well-known among men that you can only take what comes out of a woman's mouth half-seriously, as she is even less the conscious master of her subconscious than men are\u2014'_Varium et mutabile semper femina_'.

This disconnect is how feminism had to become nothing but a power grab, even while "it's just equality" was repeated.  Feminism is at minimum a subconscious power grab, whether the woman in question is a conscious harpy or not.

&gt;We should be saying that there's more to masculinity than getting laid

Well, that is what traditional masculinity preaches\u2014valor, scholarship, honor, physical vigor, self-control, askesis, arete, etc.\u2014a masculinity which can exist independent of woman and her devices, even while the family must inherently be composed of both man and woman.

&gt;I will agree that a lack of a good male role model can have bad consequences for a child though.

Both boys and girls.

&gt;I don't see what wanting equality between the sexes has to do with gun control.

He was probably talking about as it concerns mass shootings, in general.&gt;It's such a braindead approach

Certainly, if you believe that really is the logic of such a diverse system as the alt-right.

Just as certain: it is comforting for the wretch to straw man his intellectual responsibilities.How is a centralized dictatorship _anything_ perennial to the West?  We have a rich history of republics and meritocracy.

To push these things today, however, places one firmly in the alt-right.New York still has a decent amount of blacks, Hispanics, and Ashkenazi, all of whom overwhelmingly vote Democrat.

What's more, the whites in the northeast have a different sociobiological background than the whites in the West and South.

https://jaymans.wordpress.com/2015/07/29/genes-climate-and-even-more-maps-of-the-american-nations/

http://i.imgur.com/KUZFmSZ.jpg

Note how the northeast is an American anomaly; it stems from [the sociobiological background they migrated from](https://jaymans.files.wordpress.com/2013/08/uk-origins3.png)\u2014East Anglia, which came from Denmark, which came from the conquered hyperegalitarian pre-IEs.

This different background showed itself in the American and English civil wars; it was, as it were, a _second_ fight between the IEs (aristocrats) and pre-IEs (neo-Puritans).  We certainly know who want the second engagement, but it's taking Western civ down with it.  I'm confident, however, that they and their wrongheaded policies will be purged within the next century.&gt; A couple of these families actively push their little boys into hormone therapy.
&gt;&gt; I haven't heard about this being the case with any of the recent mass shooters.

It's just to showcase how far the culture has shifted; there has been a general shift, and showing the more extreme bounds is one way of talking about how much these views have permeated.

In another time, none of this could ever be dreamed to be allowed to happen.

&gt;I attribute that to what those poor souls have to go through. I imagine that living in a society where so many people hate you and call you a freak must be tough.

That almost never happens; their misery is almost entirely inherent in their biopsychological condition itself.  You can't lay everything at society's feet.  Real chemical depression, for example, exists, and is not society's doing.

From that link: 

&gt;Rape culture is women being told to learn how to defend themselves, and to not get too drunk, and to always travel with a friend, more often than men are told not to rape.

Telling people they have to defend themselves from home burglars does not mean that people aren't told to burglarize, or that when someone does burglarize it's society's fault for not chanting "Don't burglarize" a few more times.

Similarly, telling people to avoid dark alleys if they want to increase their chances of not getting mugged is not excusing mugging.  It doesn't create a "mugging culture."

Here's what I think is actually causing the emotional reaction that feminists have when they decry "rape culture":

* Yes, we do live in a patriarchal world, where women are always at minimum sexual objects, and only ever potentially a mind worth engaging secondarily.  (I don't think this is necessarily bad, nor do I think women aren't without their own animalizing of civic virtue.)

* These feminists understand that the sexualization of women (even including the "male gaze") represents an affront on their sexual resources in the sexual market, and they don't like it.  They have a burning, burning hatred for it, and understandably.  No one likes being robbed of comparative power and resources.

 How should they respond?  How they are and in the manner that women pursue their reproductive strategies: by stirring up cultural gossip in a way that protects those sexual resources.

  The name for this event is of course 'Feminism', the war on men, and it must always be a war on men; equality only exists among equals, not different classes, different animals, or different sexes.

&gt;How do you feel about cultures where western gender roles are reversed? I know they're not common but they do exist.

No, [they have only ever been matrilineal, not matriarchal.](http://www.goldberg-patriarchy.com/logic.html)

And of course, being a descendant of Indo-Europeans (like pretty much every European), I favor unashamed patriarchy.  This doesn't mean you abuse women; I don't abuse women even mentally, but what it does entail is being on such a stoic height that you don't let yourself be conquered by the gossip games of women, that you curtly display power and the natural order.

In actuality, the aforementioned 'deep-seated subconscious' of women tend to love this.  Some of them may consciously fight it (and some consciously celebrate it), but deep down, most women like it.  The feminist-masculinist wars are nothing but repressed sexuality.

Having a fun, flirtatious debate with a feminist is perhaps the best way to mindfuck them.  They come to hate you even more, but you're simultaneously confusing their subconscious, especially if you are somewhat handsome and muscular.  It's a power war, and you show yourself to be the grand prize if you demonstrate an alpha psychology.

The feminists never respect the beta toys they have around their cause; they have them on tight leashes and wear them like wrist trinkets\u2014_battle trophies!_  Thus, let yourself be the grand, unhuntable hunt.

&gt;What you describe as traditional masculinity sounds great and resembles what I've been thinking of as a new masculinity with the toxic aspects removed.

Yes, I'm describing a warrior psychology, but one that is also a father and king.  The highest heights of masculinity is not the mere eating of meat and vigorous physical activity; to really ascend, on top of this must be constructed the healthy propagation of family and people.  Perhaps also to become a novel thinker, too, a scientist, artist, and philosopher.

The Art of Manliness site has [an interesting series on masculine archetypes](http://www.artofmanliness.com/2011/07/31/king-warrior-magician-lover-introduction/) that's worth reading, even if only some morsels are integrated.

What's worthwhile about it and I guess Jung (whom I really haven't explored that much) is that it discusses shadow types of the archetypes, and how the ultimate goal is to start out with what male personality you tend to be the most and gradually mature into a king mindset (how to be a Promethean, as I would call it), and I (and I'm guessing them) don't use the phrase 'king' as mere inherited title, but actual, earned psychology.

So, this is how I explain the natural Dionysian warrior psychology I have (I come from a long line of soldiers, athletes, and fairly violent people, which definitely has its dark side, but I still like it and never'd ask for pacified genes; I love that destructive fire that is so essential to an aristo: 

_"Was geschah, meine Br\u00fcder? Ich \u00fcberwand mich, den Leidenden, ich trug meine eigne Asche zu Berge, eine hellere Flamme erfand ich mir. Und siehe! Da wich das Gespenst von mir!_

_Verbrennen musst du dich wollen in deiner eignen Flamme: wie wolltest du neu werden, wenn du nicht erst Asche geworden bist!"_

_"Every art and every philosophy may be regarded either as a cure or as a stimulant to ascending or declining life: they always presuppose suffering and sufferers._

_But there are two kinds of sufferers:_

_Those that suffer from overflowing vitality, who need Dionysian art and require a tragic insight into, and a tragic outlook upon, the phenomenon life._

_And there are those who suffer from reduced vitality, and who crave for repose, quietness, calm seas, or else the intoxication, the spasm, the bewilderment which art and philosophy provide."_

) and my gradual tempering of it into a balanced king mindset.

&gt;but I'm not a fan of your average MRA or MGTOW

Well, sure, and neither are the traditionalists, who regard these guys as whiny betas, diseased universalists in their own right.Races have naturally different predispositions (there are more genetic differences _beneath_ the skin and bone than wrt them); it's entirely natural to enjoy being mostly around one's own kind.

Thus, when one says, "This lack of diversity is troubling!" what they're really saying is, "Gosh, I wish people would do what I want and not what they want!"&gt;Outside of leftist circles, Transphobia is pretty common, at least in my experience when discussing it with people. 

There was a man-to-woman transperson in my science program.  He was nice and didn't bother me; I treated him like everyone else and never saw anything but kindness directed toward him, by both students and professors.

(I say "he" here because I fundamentally believe people are still what they're born as; they just are a deviant of that type and pursue what makes sense to them.  I also never referred to him as "he," only his name, as I know transpeople can get upset by that, as a way of compromising between my values and transpeople's.)

&gt;Just look at the way people reacted to Caitlyn Jenner.

Much of that wasn't that he wanted to be a woman, but that it was media-driven and shoved down our throats.

The media-izing of these issues has gotten so bad that some homosexuals, like Jack Donovan, can't identify with the gay movement, preferring instead to see himself as just an ['androphile'](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jack_Donovan#Androphilia).

I think lengthyounarthur probably feels the same way, as he despises people who politicize their sexuality; he thinks it should just be an element of your identity, not your entire identity, one where you must constantly air it in public to get validation like a weakling.

Sometimes, as hard as it might be to believe it as a leftist, homosexuals can be the only bullies in a scenario, constantly shoving it in people's faces whom they know want to peacefully avoid it.  Christians are probably persecuted more now in the modern US than gays, and I say this as someone who's vehemently anti-Christian.

&gt;the majority of it is just the brain being a dick

_Gah!_ _such misandrous language!_

&gt;I believe that their argument is that we should put more of an emphasis on learning the value of consent

There will always be people who rob, murder, and rape.  When feminists try to put rapists on to society, they're just using it as a tool to extract more rents.  It's a bait-and-switch.

To understand how immorally they seek power (and I say this as a Nietzschean, not Christian), one need only watch them make fun of "not all men," but then use the same logic to combat racists.

To understand how anyone might immorally seek power, one need only watch for gleeful hypocrisy, embodied best by the bully-bullied hybrid psychology (scientifically seen to have the lowest self-esteem of all kinds).  I see this bully-bullied mind in full force when I quietly watch the modern Left cry out against their abuse, and then abuse when they detect a moment's advantage (gleefully doxxing someone, trying to get them fired, encouraging them to commit suicide from the extreme social stigma of the faceless mob).

I see online gamer nerds do the same thing, shaming and mocking people not as experienced or talented in a game, while being shamed and mocked from real life sports by jocks.

From an early age, seeing how weak and ugly most people are underneath\u2014the latent will to power in their games\u2014was perhaps my first step down the road to Nietzscheanism and aristocratic values, though I didn't know a thing about Nietzsche until much later.

But, as he said: 

_"No one can draw more out of books than he already knows. A man has no ears for that to which experience has given him no access."_

In reading him, I found not him, but myself.

&gt;and teaching people that other people are not objects

But, we must inevitably be toward one another.  We can have close relations with others, but ultimately, we must live our own life, which involves a fundamental disconnect, an objectifying of others.

If anything, this demand that others not be objectified is a siren's call of an objectifier.

&gt;Yes, we do live in a patriarchal world, where women are always at minimum sexual objects, and only ever potentially a mind worth engaging secondarily. (I don't think this is necessarily bad
&gt;&gt;Why is that not necessarily bad?

Because our sexuality must be aggressive in nature.  This is one of the reasons I encourage the eating of meat.  I enjoy the taste, but I also value the affirmation of fundamental power dynamics in the act of eating another animal.  I even further encourage the killing of what one does eat where one is supplied the chance, be it on a farm or in a hunt.

I would like to slaughter and butcher a pig and decapitate and prepare a chicken, then eat them.  In these acts, I am in deeper communion with life than both the vegetarian and the eater of packaged deli meat from his local grocery store.

Also in these acts is my objectifying of these animals: they are mine; I have power and they are mine.  It is just the same in sexuality, and it is right and healthy for a man to approach it this way.  If you do not, you will one day find yourself in her web, and the spider kills just as mercilessly as the lion.

&gt;These feminists understand that the sexualization of women (even including the "male gaze") represents an affront on their sexual resources in the sexual market
&gt;&gt;I'm not denying that there are feminists out there who think like that but I'm really doubtful that they make up the majority.

Not only is it most if not all feminists, it's most if not all women.  Each gender has its reproductive strategy, and women don't all of a sudden obtain theirs upon becoming a 'feminist'.  Feminism is simply the furthering of the female reproductive strategy, a bolder female will to power.

&gt;aren't those redpill terms?

Those TRP guys may use those terms (I don't really hang out with them, as they are decadents themselves), but they are scientific concepts that precede TRP.

&gt;but because they sincerely value equality between the sexes

Again, the conscious mind vs. the subconscious.  I do not trust what comes out of a woman's mouth if it contradicts their subconscious, just as I do not trust what comes out of a man's mouth if it contradicts his subconscious (betas, MRAs, etc.).

&gt;I don't see how equality between men and women is a war on men.

In just the same way equality between the classes was a war on aristocrats.

It is very easy to preach equality when the direction of equalization gives power to those demanding equality.  It is a simple con game, one which requires only a 120 IQ to see through.  But, then men out number women 8-to-1 there and at an even higher rate the higher up you go in IQ, so it doesn't surprise me to see a silly game played by 90-110 IQ women.

Women also have the worst self-knowledge, victims of their own volatile natures, something that has been known for thousands of years; the Romans knew it: _Varium et mutabile semper femina_ \u2014 "fickle and changeable an object, always woman," the famous line of Mercury to Aeneas, warning him to leave with haste, before the woman who loved him turned on him.  And sure enough she did turn, but he was already gone, leaving her only able to kill herself.

&gt;What have been the results where this has been attempted?

I think it tends to be suppressed as a method of research.Women, in general, have a consumptive reproductive strategy that's quite hostile to economic stability, which is why politically enfranchising them was perhaps the single worst political development of the past 150 years.

That said, married white women tend to still vote conservatively, just not as overwhelmingly as married white men.&gt; we are raising daughters who biologically want sex, but are socially wary of it

Sexually promiscuous women, when sex is very socially expensive for them, are socially destructive.

Either the costs are put on society or they die out.

&gt;Then we are raising sons to view females as conquests.

Yes, even though monogamy is a Western adaptation, men still regard sexuality as a method of war.

This is psychologically edifying and good, to commune with one's subconscious, to unite the animal.&gt; Varg Vikernes, a Norwegian musician, is extremely right wing and has spoken about how he believes both men and women should save themselves for marriage.

Yes, he's advocating for the socially productive institution of monogamy.

I've been told by many people there's no denying that monogamy, as the general norm, is the better societal strat, wrt both crime and genetics, though a eugenic economy still has to be present.

It's certainly True you don't want the bottom half getting to breed just because you don't want them committing sexually frustrated crime: you want continual differential breeding, funded by an anti-egalitarian economy.

In the modern, resource-dense world, though, every subgenome can create 2-6 children, but most can't make 20 (indeed, the poor are outbreeding the rich now, whereas in the past it was the reverse!), so I'm not sure where we're going.  We need a return to eugenics somehow, and maybe these politically crazy and spiritually tumultuous times we live in will be just that.

I should not go without saying, however, that polygamy or no, a man should always take care of his offspring; I just don't agree that polygamy must always be bad, socially or individually.&gt; Society has stopped lobotomizing gay men, I know a lot of the company you keep is upset about even that

Do you really know the company I keep?

&gt;I've seen reactionaries rail against the left because they believe in traditional gender roles yet it was the state

Most reactionaries are anti-State, precisely because they understand how it had a hand in social decline.

&gt;I suppose those pushy bitches went too far when they started demanding their co-workers stop grabbing their asses though.

Yeah, because that's going to fly when she has a husband who'd kick the guy's teeth in.

&gt;slavery

[European slavery of West Africans materially and genetically improved them.](http://therightstuff.biz/2015/08/23/slavery-of-blacks-was-pretty-tame/)

&gt;then apartheid

Also improved the black migrants.

&gt;then straight into the welfare state

Which the Left did.

&gt;the drug war

The drug war in America doesn't cause higher crime rates in Africa.

&gt;but Black America's problems can ALL be boiled down to genetics and black culture. I mean, those uppity blacks have had almost two whole generations to get their shit together after all.

Yet everywhere you go, black admixtures have low IQs and high crime.

And blacks have had just as long as Europeans to conquer the globe, yet when the Europeans arrived, they didn't have even two-story buildings or sea-worthy ships\u2014in some parts not even the wheel.

&gt; I prefer a social view that is psychologically healthy and more freedom based.

One of things the modern world is teaching us is that "liberation" can be precisely what is socially disintegrative.

'To be liberated from one's civilization'.

Society isn't about freedom, but power; if you want True freedom, you be anti-society.&gt;From this and some of your descriptions of your interactions with blacks, it sounds like you usually keep your beliefs to yourself "in real life".

Oh, I've told blacks what I think about their race, and I'll tell a transgender person what I think about the phenomenon.

If I don't actively say everything that could ever be on my mind, it's for this reason: 

_"At heart, I am a warrior.  Attacking belongs to my instincts.  To be able to be an enemy, to be an enemy.  Such natures need resistance, consequently they go in search of obstacles._

_The strength of the aggressor can be measured by the opposition which he needs; every increase of growth betrays itself by a seeking out of more formidable opponents\u2014or problems: for a philosopher who is combative challenges even problems to a duel._

_The task is not to overcome opponents in general, but only those opponents against whom one has to summon all one's strength, one's skill, and one's swordmanship\u2014in fact, opponents who are one's equals.  To be one's enemy's equal\u2014this is the first condition of an honorable duel._

_Where one commands, where one sees something beneath one, one ought not to wage war.  I attack only things that are triumphant\u2014if necessary I wait until they become triumphant.  I attack only those things against which I find no allies, against which I stand alone\u2014against which I compromise nobody but myself."_

I don't pick on those weaker in mind.  It isn't that I sympathize with the weaker, but that they simply bore me; they offer no resistance, so I pass over them not as a lion, but a gentle breeze, a gentle smile.  This is the pathos of distance, which only psychological aristos have any awareness of, to be able to be indifferently kind and indifferently terrible.

&gt;hyper political correctness is one of the things that is killing the western left

And it had to be this way:  _ressentiment_ has layers upon layers; the inverted hierarchy affects the Left internally, too.  It's will to power all the way down, both internal to the movement and external.

Rightists who are much more at peace with the notion of power already understand what's going on the minute they see leftists fighting each other.

&gt;How can you be certain you know what their subconsciences want?

Because of historical biological selection pressure.  Sexual dimorphism was a biological development, and cultural gender roles had to follow from there.  What's the point of dimorphism if there aren't differential roles?

&gt;There are plenty of brilliant men and women who have supported sexual equality. Are you suggesting that most people who don't hold your beliefs aren't as intelligent as you?

I would say they are more unknown to themselves, more internally disconnected\u2014the conscious and subconscious.&gt; What is this from?

_Ecce Homo_.

&gt;Are there any methods of getting a better understanding of my subconscious that you would recommend?

I don't know, honestly.  I've always had a natural psychological ability, to understand myself\u2014what I'm doing, why, and whether there's any contemptible cowardice going on\u2014as well as others.

So, I've largely always been in communion with my subconscious, getting better with age.  Therefore, I'm not entirely sure there's always something I can say to someone; much of this could just be hardwired.

&gt;Btw, where would you recommend starting with Evola and, if you've read him, Nick Land?

I've barely tried to read Nick Land; isn't he just another facile transhumanist techno-commercialist materialist?

Regarding Evola (and really any writer), I always recommend just jumping right in, and if something doesn't make sense, it probably will be specific in nature, not the entirety of the author.

From there, you'll have a much better idea of how to efficiently spend your time thence, rather than guessing you need to first understand another author whom you didn't in fact need to understand (e.g. people ask me if they need to first understand Schopenhauer before they read Nietzsche and how they have been reading Schopenhauer, but in fact one doesn't need to read him first).

Now, does that apply to Nietzsche-Evola, not really, but definitely more so than Schopenhauer-Nietzsche.  I haven't finished all of Evola's works yet either, so also take that into account; I'm not 1/20th the authority on him as I am on Nietzsche.&gt;I just figured that since he's an important figure in the far right

Like most tech guys, I'm not entirely sure he's psychologically a 'rightist'.

Tech philosophies tend to be gender neutral.

&gt;I do kinda wish I had at least read some sort of basic philosophy book first that summed up the basics of the Greeks, the German Idealists, ect. before jumping into the Continentals.

Have you looked at [this website](http://philosophybasics.com/) before?  From here, there's also of course Wikipedia and SEP.

&gt; it would have been statistically significant too since it would have correlated with the other detracting factors, but it wasn't and it didn't

Aren't you talking about having already filtered out factor such as single parent homes and criminal peers, which they are more as a race likely to be around?

&gt;If someone is not in those particular socioeconomic circumstances the study has not identified any statistically significant difference in the rate of offending for the cohort, regardless of their ethnicity.

Yes, so you're just selecting for the right tail of their bell curve, to get results similar to whites.

That isn't anything contradictory with my position, just that racial distribution means are not equally positioned.When it's been scientifically shown that women have extremely inferior **dynamic** spatial ability (separate from static spatial) to men, in what sense can they ever be as iconically physically vigorous and active?

Furthermore, women tend to have a more difficult time with self-control, given the volatile nature of their hormonal profiles\u2014opportunity cost for being able to alter her body to make it an incubator for a little one, which guys don't have to deal with, hence why men's moods tend to be much more level (women are by far the biggest users of mood-altering pharmaceuticals).

This levelheadedness and more publicly active lifestyle also selected for 'honor' to be more the male trait.  The concept of honor first originated with militaries, which to this day, like sports, is still dominated by men, because of the vastly superior dynamic spatial ability men have (men are so much better at it that, as less intelligent as black men are to white women, white women are still obscenely inferior to low IQ black men's dynamic spatial ability, even though black men's tends to be much worse than white men's\u2014that's just how bad women's are.).

And scholarship even today still tends to be a male attribute (there are actually _fewer_ female laureates today than pre-feminism, and in both times men remain the overwhelmingly dominant recipient of a field's most prestigious awards).  This is due to different IQ variances (past 130 IQ, there are 'virtually' no women left, and yet this is around the IQ you need to be around to be a mover and shaker), but also due to different typical values and desires (women tend to want children and like to nurture and nest, not study dense technical manuals).Well, I wouldn't actively encourage them, but if a woman has a natural inclination and desire for them, I'm not sure it'd ever be worth it to discourage her; all I'd really do is just offer her more information and then see where she wants to go from there.&gt;While this is somewhat True it's not entirely what's going on here. Certain races are generally poorer at the moment and frequently get pushed out of developing areas that they can't afford to live in.

And yet East Asians and Ashkenazi recovered.Where's "here"?

And I hope you realize the government subsidizes black housing via anti-discrimination laws.During an expected general downturn, diversification isn't superior to going in on a sliver of assets (if you know what you're doing).

You can liken it to an oncoming assault: get impaled, spread the area of impact so that it's a punch, not an impale, or dodge the punch.The Japanese also have low testosterone and a culture of obedience, opposite of Americans.Clausewitz is a flair because one of my old friends likes him, wanted ancaps to think about war strategy more, and convinced one of the mods to add him.&gt;Foreigners in Japan act like fucking idiots.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BsYGzhjXkTA&amp;t=3m11s&gt;Augustus Sol Invictus 

I already like him.&gt; I could image certain conversations on this subreddit with nrx folks being taken out of context.

What would give you that impression?People have a narrow conception of what fascism is.Consequentialism doesn't mean anything until the values being calculated are stated.Aristocratic republic.Eastern European girls are low-trust, like the area.If you say so.&gt; See how easy it is to get you guys to say something completely stupid?

I realize how desperately you need to feel the emotional victor here.

&gt;Only married women should work then? They're the women reactionaries want to stay home.

Obviously, I say it as it occurs she is there.

&gt;None of that was invented by ze Germans though was it? It was invented by Middle East and Far East cultures.

If you call the Indo-Europeans "Middle Easterners," I guess.

It also shows gross ignorance on your part to differentiate "ze Germans" and Middle Easterners, given that Europe experienced migration from the Near East during the neolithic era.

Still more, the culture the Nazis celebrated was that of the Indo-Europeans.

&gt;Europeans still hadn't figured out how to treat leather by the time Mesopotamians were fiddling with double entry accounting.

What on earth makes you think I celebrate the native hunter-gatherer egalitarians?  Everything that made the West great, filled with warrior aristocracies, came from the IEs.

You really think I celebrate a landmass?

&gt;I noticed you dodged the last point of previous comment.

There's not much one can (or should) say to someone who thinks population genetics is astrology.&gt;without the significant characteristics identified

The whole point is that blacks are more likely to have those characteristics.

&gt;since all members of the ethnic group would be subject to the same detracting factors

This is a way of getting off subject.  Obviously, the causal factors are more specific to race and ethnicity, but the point is that races and ethnicities possess these characteristics at disproportionate rates.

&gt;Anybody can find themselves within these socioeconomic situations

Well, it certainly wouldn't be driven by poverty as much, as poor whites commit less crime than wealthy blacks, just as children of poor whites tend to still have higher IQs than children of wealthy blacks.Economics has known for a while that you can subsidize behavior without a direct subsidy.Banks estimate costs of legal battles and discount it off those non-whites whom they'd marginally deny a loan.https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/34qc8h/hitler_20/

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3mmgzm/just_so_were_clear_youre_saying_that_genocide_is/Just would depend on the many factors that control real estate prices (sure, if enough blacks entered a neighborhood, property values would likely go down, yes; in the cases where they don't, the black in question often gets foreclosed on).Just one of a hundred ways of deconstructing objective morality.Artificial (defined as non-market) encouragement.Over-accusing people of fascism can exist independent of people having a narrow conception of what fascism is.

Fascism actually goes back to Greco-Roman republics, ways of life the Nazis tried to restore, but perhaps too inorganically.'The State' isn't anything but the result of a failure of the commons, a failure which is not inherently permanent.

Thus, the State doesn't represent any sort of optimum service.Yes, the State is the most anti-aristocratic, anti-white organization in existence.

I'll take whites' chances with a race war any day of the week.Afghanistan was developed by US engineers.They certainly can be aesthetically pleasing to many men's tastes, but they do remain low-trust, like the area.That's just how we've commonly argued in economics.

"Yeah, but if you do X, you're subsidizing Y."Unfortunately for Curt, I'm a Nietzschean.

That'll be my testimony in court: I plead the Nietzschean.People prefer the State to colloquial anarchy, but that doesn't make the State\u2014particularly a large state\u2014necessary.

History testifies to there being a diversity in state sizes, so I see no reason to accept a particularly overbearing state; we should instead endeavor to understand how a culture and economy increases or decreases a state.From an evolutionary history standpoint, this is actually True.

What we know as East Asians today evolved much longer in Siberia, a climate even colder than the conditions pre-IE Europeans evolved in, before migrating south.

These cold environments encouraged delayed development (East Asians and Europeans gestate and experience puberty later than sub-Saharan Africans) as well as decreased anti-sociality (lower population density and a harsher environment increase the opportunity costs of social predation).

Now, of course, we're speaking long, long, long-term, as when the warring Indo-Europeans arrived into Northern Europe, they conquered and turned much of the area into imperialist warrior aristocracies.

The notion of a cold northman, a viking (played off in so much fantasy fiction like Warhammer) comes from this migration of people who evolved under more temperate conditions into colder ones, not that that cold somehow created violent men.Rojava isn't really 'market anarchism' as much as just libsoc nationalism.

I realize some would consider the latter a subset of the former, but the former is such a silly term to begin with, like anarcho-capitalism.

&gt;the more I realize that it is very possible for it to gain it's independence

No, their economy is super primitive; the only reason they haven't been run over just yet is because bigger fish are concerned about bigger fish right now (Turkey, Assad, Iran, etc.).

&gt;what's more they back up there claims with women in the war zone

Which is remarkably stupid: women as a group have dramatically inferior dynamic spatial ability (ability to track and coordinate with respect to moving objects, indispensable for field tactics and firing on the move), not to mention they are much more biologically expensive to lose.Which speaks to the seriousness of anarchism.Fuck white flight; deport them.You're saying capitally dense areas aren't attractive to move toward?Now, want to get even more ahead in your morbid observations of modernity?

Read Nietzsche.  (\u141b)It's almost like spiritual ideology has a sociobiological anchoring...

The East Anglos have a long history of egalitarianism and dildoing of Western civ.  They are the revolt against the aristocratic IE way of life, coming to a head during the English and American civil wars.You have to understand atheism as a Protestantism 2.0, as the revolt against hierarchical Catholicism, which was really nothing but [a Germanized Christianity](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Reaction/comments/3gbghw/when_christian_missionaries_tried_to_appeal_to/) (which is to say a Christianity infused with Germanic values of military excellence and affirmation of hierarchy).

In this way, modern atheists are another Christian revolt against Rome.  Modern atheists' objection to Christianity is actually that _it isn't Christian enough!_  [You see the Christian values in these secular-humanists.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2f2037/more_juicy_antileftist_rhetoric_for_you_guys_but/)

Modern atheists are the better moralists, and in so doing, they show their psychological origins.Oh, their God is still well alive.  What they killed was any semblance of Germanic world-acceptance.Why do people talk about Moldbug like he's anything but a cheap, primitive version of a third of Nietzsche's writings, which precedes Moldbug by 150 years?

I realize people pay homage to _how_ they came to a set of ideas about as much as that set of ideas, even if there are more esteemed versions, but it's like I would have figured reactionaries would have found the actual thought leaders by now.No, I think the critical turning point was the building of high trust in Northern Europe, which was a result of several factors, including 'aristocratic egalitarian' IE blood (which encouraged honor and honesty as heroic acts of both social and military importance), decentralized geography, and tremendous outbreeding (the Church at one point forbade breeding with anyone closer than I believe a sixth cousin).

Much of these China lacked, even though they do have certain favorable genetics like 100-105 IQs and the capacity for cooperation.  That East Asians came close is how they have been the culture to interface best with the West, of all those out there.So, then I take it you retract your earlier statement?

Surely, you don't suggest we liquidate our capital just so people don't want to come over.

It's better to just invest in methods of keeping undesirables out.&gt;And neither group was treated with the systematic racism

Well, the Romans were fairly redpilled on Semites'\u2014particularly Jews\u2014ethnocentric dishonesty.

Let me ask you: in your commitment to meritocracy, are you willing to go to the lengths of being masochistically abused by ethnocentric outgroups?

&gt;or which you seem to advocate Semitic and other races be treated today

What I recommend is demonstrated liars be treated like demonstrated liars, nothing more, nothing less.

&gt;Being a race realist doesn't prevent one from being a meritocrat.
&gt;&gt;This line of discussion got started because you were advocating structural racism as a necessity, no?

And you leftists regard differential racial outcomes as a product of 'structural racism', not biological reality.

&gt;You don't advocate for racist structures that prevent people from certain races of gaining certain positions and influences in society?

If they can reliably demonstrate a commitment to meritocracy, I don't care about their origin; I only care about people's origins because I'm aware it has a very real effect on their mental and psychological proclivities.&gt;Christianity ... positive developments

Like what?

&gt;I just said he was critical of Jews but not an anti-semite, just like he is critical of a lot of things without rejecting everything that occurs under the label of those things.

That's not saying much, when one is an _amor fati_ mind.

Better individual bourgeois traits (low time preferences, low crime rates, greater materialist fixations, greater obedience to the collective, etc.).

The position I've defended and put forward the most often on this forum is that the West developed the most economically efficient _social institutions_, but this doesn't require Northern Europeans be the most capable individual actors within those economic institutions (East Asians' slightly higher performance and Ashkenazi's noticeably higher performance stand as testament).

Where I would put forward that Europeans are the most individually capable, however, is in being more natural aristos, though it's not impossible someone from another sociobiology couldn't be one (e.g. Yukio Mishima, who was quite ascetic and artistic, though I will say he was quite psychologically troubled and in a way world-rejecting, which is not an apex trait).

That said, in a modern world where aristos don't really exist as they once did and where it is instead run by bourgeoisie and bourgeois values, it is True that the dominant forces will be the West's superior economic institutions merged with more natural bourgeois individuals, like East Asians and Ashkenazi, insofar as these exist in number and can be logistically absorbed (there's still very few Jews in the world and much of East Asia remains not integrated).Well, I think the jury is still out on whether any of these intellectual movements aren't anything but post-hoc formalisms, secondary effects of the actual _Primum Mobile_ \u2014 subconscious biopsychology.

What does my conscious mind ascertain that my subconscious didn't let me?  What diseases do I overcome that I wasn't ever actually diseased by?

My ideological history was nothing but my subconscious slowly informing me of how things will be.  At bottom, I still am the same psychological fiber I was in my earliest memory.

If this much is in agreement, how can I ever save the subconsciously damned?Christianity was indeed warped by Germania (you can still see it today in the South, where the military is celebrated more than Jesus' pacifism\u2014southern Christians ate up [this film](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AqcthD64Srs&amp;t=1m40s), very Germanic, not Semitic).

It took the Protestants to return to the universalist roots the Semites conned with.&gt; I am not sure what is meant. Can you give me an example?

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fp8aQe812ug

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-lL4hFtphhg

&gt;But, do you think individuals can be classified as "demonstrated liars" or not based on what race they are?

I used the adjective demonstrated to stress demonstration.

&gt;there is so much variance from the mean among individuals of every race

Not so much that means don't matter, as most of the sub-Saharan bell curve, for example, does not cross into the European.

&gt;I don't see how statistical likely hood based on race is an argument for social barriers or benefits to individuals from a certain race

Coupled with the above, social capital and genetic similarity theory are real things.

Does this mean meritocracy must be damned?  Not necessarily, but don't be surprised (for many reasons) when that meritocracy is dominated by whitey.

&gt;And who gets to be the judge of this?

An aristocratic jury, of course.

&gt;Why not just get rid of social barriers and benefits based on race (structural racism)

What you're then asking for is the abolition of social dynamics.

What's more, Northern Europeans are the least ethnocentric people on the planet, so it's curious that you seek to demonize them rather than the more ethnocentric cultures.

&gt;as opposed to trusting in a bureaucracy that is assigned the task of determining who can and cannot be exempt from structural racism?

Are you saying aristocratic republics are Sino bureaucracies?

&gt;Personally, I trust in the clash of individual wills more than bureaucracy, and find that the only out group I need to oppose are those trying to create social barriers and benefits to maintain power and social influence they don't deserve and are simply (in my eyes of course) misusing and squandering.

So, you're socially suicidal against your own group, so that more ethnocentric groups can take advantage of your good will.So, you're a walking contradiction then.

You may leave now.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fp8aQe812ug&amp;t=5m22s

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-yFhR1fKWG0&amp;t=40s&gt;People willing to move there without any hope of government welfare might be similarly inclined, and therefore apt to fit in.

What about people who just want to get rich on the comparatively less preferred riches of the rich?

Carl Menger, right?  Are you saying this doesn't have the capacity to produce socially self-consuming externalities?&gt;They are individually lower earners and more inclined to crime than asians.

East Asians, not all Asians, and again, these are bourgeois evaluative terms, not aristo.&gt;if they're going to be damned regardless, how do we harness their energies?

Let them kill each other, which is what I look forward to (neo-Puritans, blacks, Hispanics, Jews, etc.).

I look forward to the day anti-gun, anti-racist urban whites get killed with a gun by a black, en masse.

&gt;The left did this with universalist egalitarianism

'The Left' didn't 'do' anything: what we see is nothing but symptoms, not free actors.

&gt;their broader ideology worked towards the same goal

Because that is the broader trend of reality.  The Left is perhaps the dumbest, least self-aware movement in existence, but they have modernity on their side, so they must move like gods to those less aware of what's going on.This is but a sliver of the broader tale and by no means an eventuality.&gt; I couldn't watch those videos, sorry.

Well, then I suppose I have little reason to invest in you, by reading your overwritten, unsuccinct comments.Yes, this is the oft-copy-pasted anti-FAQ.  Unfortunately for the author (and the OP) there's no mention of Nietzsche, Evola, J\u00fcnger, Ortega, Heidegger, Spengler, etc.\u2014the leading reactionary figures.

What the author is doing is attacking a techno-commercialist, so the two have engaged in a bourgeois vs. bourgeois battle, over who can prove more materialist utils.

This is of course barely reactionary at all.&gt;"A great man is always willing to be little."

So says the snake.The State just magically "disappears" and the Market just magically "takes over."

Don't ask him how.No, they haven't.  They're still very unstable.You just deregulate, dudebros.

Ya just do it.Nietzscheans are not simple atheists.If I preferred bourgeois values, yes.

One thing that should be mentioned however, regarding raw intellect, is that Europeans have a higher standard deviation in IQ, meaning they tend to still dominate the 130+ IQ territory, and it shows in the Nobel Prize data, where East Asians don't do that well.

This is however an independent point; I still hold to my earlier desire for aristo values, as the highest values a psychology could ever possess.I oppose the psychological separation between God and His believers.

That makes me an atheist to some and a theist to others.Their view of man, yes.My view is: the sensations of God, the Sublime, the "super"natural are all real.

I just take a different orientation toward them and give a different explanation.&gt;Some of the greatest victories of social justice in 20th-century America have, in the end, cost us less than nothing. The end of Jim Crow laws, which restricted blacks\u2019 right to work for any willing employer, didn\u2019t only help blacks; it also enriched our whole society by allowing black workers to fully use their talents.

Blacks, in political total, have not been a net economic positive for Americans, however.

&gt;The entry of American women into traditionally male jobs, similarly, was not a victory for women alone; wasting half the country\u2019s skill, determination and ingenuity would have been a tragic loss for the U.S.

Is Caplan really this stupid?  Women were still doing labor in the past, and what's more: it was labor they are more psychologically geared toward, making for a happier arrangement for many women who were socially pressured into going to college and working.

Someone still has to raise children and that labor is either being done by the mother, the father, or a stranger, and it's a demonstration of how much the family unit has been destroyed if a stranger seems like the optimal situation.

&gt;These successes should make us wonder if we\u2019re overlooking other ways to make our society juster and richer at the same time.

Did Caplan really just equate white women working, black men working, and Syrian  men working, like they all have the same political ramifications?

"People came; people did stuff."\u2014this is literally how sophisticated Caplan's worldview is.

&gt;we should return to the historic American policy of open borders

The historic policy of open borders?

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_United_States_immigration_legislation

The actual history is a long one of restrictions.  It could only look like 'open borders' if you were Western European.

&gt;If you lived in Syria or Haiti, you wouldn\u2019t be very productive either.

As if those areas aren't as capitally dense for some random reason.  Haiti actually used to be wealthy while it was still under French control, until the blacks took it over and turned it into Africa.

&gt;You could just as well ask, \u201cHow would equal rights for blacks benefit whites?\u201d 

The hilarious thing is that it didn't: blacks vote 95% for gibsmedat; they liquidate capital as fast as they can, just like they did in Haiti and just like they did in South Africa.

&gt;"How would equal rights for women benefit men?\u201d

It didn't: enfranchising women as individuals (instead of as a family) created a political climate where the gender wars entered state affairs, when they should have been kept within the family, making political affairs negotiations between families.

Enfranchising women as individuals created the gradual path toward dissolution of marriage and the family, as the women could just vote for the State to be her husband.

&gt;A mind \u2013 white or black, male or female, native or foreign \u2013 is a terrible thing to waste.

They're not all the same, though, making your ability to use them restricted.  You wouldn't hire a garbage collector to be a CEO, right, Caplan?

&gt;these laws trap most of mankind\u2019s skill, determination, and ingenuity in countries that cripple these precious assets

Precious assets?  $1-5/hr labor is precious human capital?

&gt;The losses boggle the imagination.

I think we'll live with mechanization on the margin, and we'll get to skip the immigrants and their kids voting Democrat en masse.

&gt;According to economists\u2019 standard estimates, letting anyone take a job anywhere would roughly double global production

Given how simplistic your above identity of white woman = black man = Syrian man, I'm going to bet this model is just as simplistic.  I can solve trivial equations, too.

&gt;Immigrants are rarely charity cases. On some level, even immigration\u2019s harshest critics know that immigrants come to work. That\u2019s why critics favor strict enforcement of the many draconian laws that bar foreigners from the labor market.

Or that the demographic change changes the political climate.  We already have the numbers, too: with the demographics of just 1991, Obama never would have got elected in either '08 or '12.

&gt;Syrian refugees will take some time to get on their feet, but they, too, will eventually find jobs as long as their host countries permit them to work.

The ones refusing food?  The ones going on welfare tours?

Caplan's argument here seems to be that if we can just get as many workers of the world under one national tent, we can avoid international restrictions, but this assumes these migrants' countries ended up as they are politically and economically for no reason whatsoever, that as soon as they get under European and American tents, they'll be just like Europeans and Americans.

It should be quite obvious that if you bring enough in from a given country, the area becomes that country.

&gt;Yet serious researchers usually conclude that anti-immigration pundits and politicians are making mountains out of molehills.

So, the move toward a Democratic stranglehold at the national level is a molehill?

&gt;We are talking about trillions of dollars of extra wealth creation, year after year.

If they were actually Europeans, but they're not.Paleolibertarians have existed as the core of libertarianism for, what, two centuries?&gt;It's the idea that an homogeneous white society will always be more high-trust than an homogeneous community of any other race, because we're somehow more genetically predisposed to trusting each other, that seems more controversial

That's where the science is: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/35oxu9/understanding_why_the_us_and_europe_slowly_became/

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/368jdg/understanding_why_northern_european_culture_is/

http://www.unz.com/pfrost/we-are-not-equally-empathic/

We have many explanations for it, too, including significant outbreeding.So, you don't care about how to analyze your said experiences and how to anticipate future ones?

Do you just black out in social scenarios?  Do you look at Reddit comments as random dehumanized text?That would be a good development, as working in reality requires knowledge of reality (imagine that).&gt;NRx = Fascism

_Ya got us!_

&gt;The problem with NRxers is that they use this as a ploy in an attempt to justify their bullshit racist prejudices.

Some do, some (like many here) don't have to, as they push a meritocracy with robust naturalization tests.Society is a collective; any political system that actually manifests has to accept this on some level.

Should a doctor say, "I don't see humans; I see individual cells _because I'm not a collectivist!  nae nae boo boo!_"&gt;I open my bank account to assess my standing in life.

Some standing.&gt;Nowhere does Caplan argue for universal suffrage, or increasing suffrage in general.

That will be the package deal.

&gt;Of course he's also aware the largest variable in the income of separated twins is the institutions they live under.

And those institutions can erode.

&gt;Low-skilled immigrants can make fine nannies, freeing up the mother to perform more productive work.

What could be more productive work than having a bond with your own children?  lolOf course, but we'd also have to establish evaluative standards, too.

Are we counting in USDs?  Subjective psychic benefit of the children?  Of the mother?&gt;Doesn't childcare seem like exactly the kind of role that unskilled immigrants could play in the modern economy?

If you think there shouldn't be much of a bond between parents and their children.A person is mostly determined by their genome, but that doesn't mean not having a father or not having a mother won't set a kid back socially.

One can have intelligence without an education.As regards human cannibalism, 'morality' and nutrition aren't in conflict: 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Transmissible_spongiform_encephalopathy&gt;The soylent green comment was priceless, and I bet it shut you up lol.

[Not really.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3nzoef/a_lesson_in_pc_exvegan_blogger_receives_death/cvt2crk?context=3)

&gt;which includes shit like cheese and eggs, and iced cream

Eggs?  That's a developing animal.Profuse meat-eating goes back several thousand years for many Europeans.

Having access to a great deal of meat and dairy is believed to be one of the leading causes to Indo-Europeans being much larger.&gt;How far are you willing to go to make sure that the animals are treated well?

Ah, yes, the weakling finds repose from his emptiness even in animals.Sympathy is always a sign of internal poverty, reaching out to the external, because the internal is a void.&gt;The distinction seems like special pleading, that just because they hold the title of human, then they are somehow different.

lol, oh, ale.

&gt;My actions are the same whether I'm swinging a club at X or swinging a club at Y. If swinging a club at X is wrong, then the wrongness is in my action, not what X is.

Genius.&gt;why should I respect the life of a chinese factory worker if all they offer me is cheap tennis shoes?

Now, you're getting it.

&gt;if I want to eradicate some bacteria, then I should foster the growth of a competing bacteria

You are so smart.Anenome's a reactionary now, guys.

I'll get the champagne.&gt;100 slaves than I do with 100 wives

But, 100 wives will be 100 slaves, _bbbbrrrroooo_.

&gt;Now if you say that if I treat a black as a free and equal life form, they will reward me greater than if I treated them as a slave, then shouldn't this same logic apply to a pig or a bird?

lol, your one point about spiritual enlightenment being negatively correlated with IQ is really ringing True.

(That or you're just equally retarded at both.)&gt;I won't like a vegetarian/vegan when I meat them

\u00ac\u203f\u00ac"Simply do what's 50 steps past where we are."He's got that jungle fever.None of that contradicts my point; we're not all the same genetically.Because that's what an aristocratic republic is.As if it was said out of sympathy.Yes, the mob comes together, until it finally has enough material to create a functional unit.

One's psychological richness, if you will, is a function of that required number.What this says is that there isn't a strong relation one way or the other, meaning "more guns, less crime" is just as False.

What matters is sociobiology and cultural institutions.Now, do crime by ethnicity...Like a good Christian.This show was hilariously and improbably multiculturalist.

What's more, from an objective production standpoint, it was written awfully for an audience most of whom had seen _The Walking Dead_.Again, no relationship between these dimensions.

However, if you look at the locales themselves, you'll see a relationship between European and East Asian populaces vs. African and Hispanic.

Indeed, one of the driving forces for what homicides the US sees is disproportionately due to blacks and Hispanics; the US' crime rate would probably be around Northern Europe's were there no blacks (because\u2014what do you know?\u2014country of origin predicts immigrant quality).That would be a very imprudent relationship to posit.

It'd be much more warranted to investigate other causes, especially given that the US is fairly heterogeneous sociobiologically and has dramatically different crime rates between those groups.http://i.imgur.com/15yKYGw.jpgThis is mere social signaling, even by the Harvard team itself.

It'd be better to open the hood and see what the actual arguments were.&gt; The market promotes the masses

Prior to this is breeding patterns; if there's dysgenic breeding, then yes you're right; if there's eugenic breeding, then no you're mistaken.&gt;anything based on "Truth-telling" is retarded

"Truth-telling" is just being operationally open, not omniscient.

"Truth-telling" is a necessary component to an aristocratic egalitarian system, as the Indo-Europeans (who were composed of decentralized, independent war families) had and the European republics they fostered, because there's no other way of fostering interpersonal cooperation than intersubjective consensus.

Furthermore, a mythos is not precluded from existing in such a system: the aristos generate and propagate it into intersubjective consensus.  The final chapter of _BG&amp;E_ is Nietzsche actually talking about aristocratic egalitarianism and the IEs.You're just link dumping and talking to yourself.

I'd recommend understanding the levels of separation between yourself and a given audience and making sure enough is written concerning each stage (but succinctly), so the audience can connect the dots and move toward you.

It's a sign of mastery for an author when he can do this.&gt;Dionysus is God and Spirit and Apollo is rationalism and objectivity.

Eh, you could try to define the dichotomy in this way, but I don't think it works out, as the Apollonian can represent people's spiritual views, too ("Heaven is a place where nothing ever happens.").

It's more cogent to make the dichotomy Being vs. Becoming, calm repose vs. electrifying madness and identity shifts through traumatic suffering (leading of course to leaps in psychological growth, new Being).

&gt;The world of today is heavily biased toward the Apollonian and that is a problem.

The Dionysian exists underneath it, though\u2014the irrational is still well alive, and you can see it in society if you have an eye for it.

The masses just have a great fear of that nihilistic energy; they on an animal level understand they won't survive that flame, so they kick and resist and run into the Apollonian, but that energy is part of and an interface with the greater Becoming.The video he put to his narration is pretty hilarious.

Could just as well have linked [_ye ye ye ye_.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uEgtNSBa4Zk)

You're just hypersensitive to reactionaries; you couldn't even humor his proposal, even if it does exist as a way of showing a contradiction between leftist arguments and leftist values.Are you familiar yet with Curt Doolittle and his work?The plot thickens.&gt;By all emperical values that a society, class, or race could be judged by, east asians are superior to all other races.

You mean, like [historical innovation](https://i.imgur.com/4QMUtnT.png)?  Even today, Europeans still dominate math and science innovation.Your article sources it to Anatolia, and my position isn't that innovation can't come from anywhere not Europe.  You must now be in desperate mode.A concealed 'yea' is driving us forward\u2014we can no longer choose: we must be dancers.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l8xphl-CyvU&gt;Compare that to PRC which is 93.94% Han Chinese.

Aren't you making my point?Boy, you're a desperate little man, going to these lengths.From perusing the Wikipedia on Niger, it looks like it's a former French colony near-totally dependent on the IMF and foreign aid.

It's also True that half of the homicides in the US are done by black males, which comprise only about six percent of the population, so removing them from the picture puts the US' murder rate with Norway's.Immigration from Africa traditionally has selected for far right tail outliers (mass refugee movements are the exception).

I have met some of these enterprising Africans; they work hard and do well in school and business.

The problem, unfortunately, is that most members of their home countries are not like them and over time the children of these first generation immigrants regress back to the mean.

We already have data on this, too.&gt;His hypothesis seems to be "race=homicide rates".

Sociobiology creates the scaffold for social institutions.

Eastern Europeans are a good example of an undeveloped scaffold, due to historical circumstance (constant subjugation and little chance for eugenic outbreeding).&gt;PRC which is 93.94% Han Chinese

How is this heterogeneous?If anything, this would speak to the _effects_ of a more trusting people, not the causes of their being more trusting or not.

In other words, higher trust societies can peacefully get away with greater weapon ownership, whereas lower trust societies cannot.

More weapons in low trust, high ethnic conflict zones like Iraq and Syria have only increased deaths (remember the raided armories?).In science, we don't go with nonlinear relationships without de**lineat**ing it into unpacked linear relationships.

We would want to eventually create linear correlations for each contributing factor.  Obviously, reality is modeled as a process of millions of variables, but we have to first linearize each variable.  It's what graphical "axes" ever were for \u2014 linear vector differentials, even though we could have chosen nonlinear ones.And yet there aren't any high murder, low gun ownership European-derived nations.

What this graph shows is that high gun ownership or low gun ownership, European-derived nations have low murder rates, period.

This then begs for a better analysis.See these comments: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3o1gja/all_murders_vs_gun_ownership/cvtd466

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3o1gja/all_murders_vs_gun_ownership/cvtd2bk&gt;even though only ~37% of households reportedly own guns

One could just requite by zooming in on rural areas, which have a very high gun ownership rate, but where crime is very low.&gt;I think it's silly for people to talk about how dangerous America is

It just depends on where you are: some parts of some cities are up there in being one of the most dangerous places in the world.  Of course, those parts are "coincidentally" 80-90% black.That the US is internally experiencing divergent economic and political trajectories should testify to the very different subcultures that exist here.

The white US' murder rate is more on par with Northern Europe, because (shock) most whites are Northern European-derived.&gt;the graph does show murders exponentially decreasing as gun ownership increases until about 1 gun for every 2 people

Is Iraq and Syria in short of weapons?  What happened after the Shias and Sunnis got access to weapons post-Saddam?

The only "high" (more like medium) gun ownership, low murder rate, non-European, non-East Asian country on this list is Yemen, which is now even more destabilized (which makes me wonder how recent or credible this data is).

Many of these Arab countries are also US protectorates for the interests of resource extraction.  I know a couple engineers who lived in Saudi Arabia for a decade who said in the protected compounds they were on it was as safe as any American city, but outside it wasn't.  So, I'd be interested in breaking down the nature of Yemen's gun ownership as well as political equilibrium; it certainly isn't stable right now.Reading that article, I had to chuckle at Rahm's "outrage," like he gaf about the 'schwartzas'.Sub-Saharan Africans have even higher crime rates than American blacks.Yes, and please expand that timeline as a rate.

Do it for enslavement rates, too.  Even today, Africans still keep enslaving each other.They tip less, they litter more, they blast music out of their car so everyone within two blocks knows how dey be...

It's almost like low trust produces shitty commons.You're saying poor, uneducated, illiterate Mexican women should be private tutors?&gt;All cells in a human body work together for a common goal.

No, they don't, and you're attributing a grand telos to their behavior in a way you have no special reason to that you wouldn't then have to as regards a nation and an economy.I am arguing in favor of understanding sociobiology, so that we have a better understanding of how freer societies might exist.

If we just go, "Hue, society don't real," then we will always be blind to how particular societies form or don't form.The West never had that strong of monarchies, compared to the East and Near East; we've fairly consistently had aristocratic republics, where kings were held in check by the aristocratic class.

It goes all the way back before even the Greeks, who also wrote epics which invoked a plethora of decentralized characters, some openly defying kings, like Achilles.

This tradition is mostly absent in other continents.&gt;I just wish they'd aks themselves if there was a better way to live, ya know?

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a5VWpFokjYc&amp;t=1m29s&gt;What could be more productive work than having a bond with your own children? lol
&gt;&gt;Lots of things.

I guess if you don't care that much about your lineage.

&gt;Currently people are economizing by just not having children, which seems like the worst possible outcome.

Well, now that raises an interesting point.  However, I still think controlling breeding of the underclass is the more pressing matter.&gt;I mean that American blacks have no excuse for acting like retards.

Well, even with them, the 20-30% European genetics that are in the average American black doesn't buy them but 15 points on the low 60-70s of a pure sub-Saharan.lib-boy did raise one interesting point however: increased breeding by quality subpopulations, partly facilitated by multiple caregivers (however, I'm not sure why that couldn't be aunts, grandmothers, sisters, and cousins).

That said, it is True a woman's body can only take so much, especially today's trophy women, which kind of reintroduces the importance of selecting for women who have quality hormone profiles and intelligence.  My mother was a standout athlete and hearty woman; she probably provided me with a fairly masculine womb environment.

We need to return to breeding psychologically dominant males, not these effeminate little bitches afraid of defending their civilization.  I guess whites kind of are doing that, as liberal fertility is much lower than conservative.

That's only one side of the coin, though: the other is not encouraging breeding of the underclass (through welfare and foreign aid).Spooky.Still doesn't change that blacks and whites rarely date.

This show didn't have a single white-white couple.&gt;I don't know where you come up with this stuff.

The article you linked.I don't see how what I said is False.&gt; That is not Truth.

And it was never invoked in that way.Still doesn't put any of this into broad history or as rates.

&gt;I do believe Western countries actually exported their values wherever their technology could take them, their values were conquest, slavery and genocide.

You're claiming the Amerindians and Africans weren't massacring and enslaving each other pre-European contact?

&gt;Your genes aren't better, your nutrition is.

Food sufficiently causes brain size differences?  Food sufficiently causes peace?

TIL genes are just decorative trim: they don't control for enzyme efficiency or protein production.

Or is it that carbohydrates rewrite genomes?You think so?  Surveyed American blacks still show diminished empathy.  They were much more likely to blame a victim of theft for stupidity than blame a thief for being immoral.&gt;you are not a more evolved human

Just depends on what you mean by "more evolved."  Natural selection has happened; different selection pressures have existed on different continents, and sub-Saharan Africans don't even have Neanderthal DNA in them\u2014one gene of which controls for brain size.

&gt;They did some terrible shit, even though they were white.
Your brain isn't any different than theirs, your wealth is greater.

What's even supposed to be the point of this speech?  That I think whites never are violent?  Would I even want that?The New Yorker\u2014great choice._And this is coming from a robot!_The Wikipedia's data is from a 2012 UNODC report.

Maybe something changed in 8 years, either in reality or how or whether certain deaths were cataloged; I don't know.Wealthy blacks actually commit more crime than poor whites."How many ways we can differentiate Europeans/East Asians and Africans/Hispanics."

Edit: http://i.imgur.com/sJvXBYd.jpgI'm not sure if it was fraud or what.&gt; given that one hundred and fifty years ago, whites were just as violent as American blacks

Prove it.

&gt;Genetics can't explain predispositions to violence, at least not yet.

Low-R MAO-A allele doesn't exist?

&gt;Do you really expect the entire world to become white middle class suburbia simultaneously?

Isn't my position precisely that that isn't possible?

&gt;If the answer to that is no then why cast genetic judgment on entire races of people when they haven't had that opportunity?

You know Europe was not resource-rich, right?  Europe actually was one of the more primitive areas before the Indo-Europeans arrived.

And what else could be my position than that blacks and whites have different evolutionary histories?  I'm not calling blacks "evil"; I'm merely taking a position with respect to them given how they are now and are likely to be until genetic engineering.

&gt;welfare, believe me that fucks up white people too

Apparently, whites demand it less.

&gt;There ain't no trash like trailer trash.

You sure about that?  You ever go to Detroit or Atlanta?  I'll take a hill billy over most blacks.

&gt;is there anything that gets people hankering to kill people more than tribalism or nationalism?

Ethno-nationalism is how people politically move as the default anyways: just some sociobiological groups aren't nearly as ethno-centric as others.

&gt;Different cultures around the world haven't had one hundred years of industrialization, some of them haven't even had one year.

Yes, the Industrial Revolution just dropped in Europe's lap\u2014twice.  The rest of the world never outdid even just Rome.

&gt;Europeans have had generations of wealth compared to most of the world

And that of course was an arbitrary, random event.  It could have happened to anyone else!Probably [this one.](https://soundcloud.com/inquestofficial/corridor-of-chameleons)I'm cointelpro.Why?https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2bvv8a/an_exceptional_quote_for_all_utopian_idealists/http://www.bjs.gov/content/pub/pdf/htus8008.pdfMy understanding is that bouts between nobles didn't often involve the peasant class.&gt;  There's an enormous selection bias between people who came to the US (often with nothing but the clothes on their back)

That the overwhelming amount who came were poor is not True.One of the major factors is the negative effects of the world wars on Europe's male sex.

The US is one of the few places left with a noticeably anti-egalitarian populace.  Though the Civil War removed the Southern aristocracy from explicit power, much of the anti-egalitarian blood is still alive, whereas most of what was in Europe in the Old World has either migrated to the US or been killed off.

And ethnic heterogeneity is not a sufficient cause for decrease in empathy, as Northern Europeans are among the most empathetic in the world toward outgroups.  The US also has been largely homogeneously Western European for most of its history; it's only been until relatively recently that it's losing it.The market will reflect underlying differences in capability and education, however, which will not make the egalitarians happy.

Thus, you ancaps can't win them over in any event and should simply not care.Could have said something better than just "statist," like that's that insulting.

I probably would have said, "Corrupt lobbyist, liar, and traitor."

Or, you could have dropped a quote or two of his about blacks on there.Rothbard also profusely attacked George for being a dunce of Hamilton's and a grossly incompetent military commander who got many men killed out of stupidity and was almost unseated by a more capable officer beneath him, but "Never Can Tell a Lie" George didn't let that politically happen.[So hot.](http://i.imgur.com/TOP4Xxz.jpg)&lt;passionately frozen, wide-eyed expression&gt;Only have to say 8-10 simple factual lies to troll?  Not impressed.The people who downvote [this.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3lysax/meta_ive_changed_my_mind/cvb15fy)I wasn't referring to northeastern Europe as much as southeastern.

Latvia is hybrid Scandinavian.&gt;Rome collapsed because they kept invading hand to mouth peasants in the name of nationalism.

Curious, considering Rome's legions contained a diversity of ethnics.

&gt;When you had the extraordinary wealth of China, you didn't need an Empire.

So, the British and American empires were never wealthy?&gt; Could you elaborate on this?

Massive spikes in war deaths obviously wipe out a great deal of alleles which contribute toward masculine traits.

&gt;Since the majority of their power came form the ownership of other individuals, do you consider this a bad thing?

I don't consider the Southern enslavement of blacks as wholly bad, no.  I don't consider it ideal, as I would prefer the blacks have been left in Africa, but being that they were here a legal paternalism was necessary and that paternalism did improve them, genetically and materially, as they ate much better (a pound of pork a day\u2014better than even many Northerners) than those in Africa and were much safer.

&gt;I know you love aristocracy but I wouldn't expect owning slaves to be something you would approve of.

It just depends on the manner.  I don't support sadism, but I also understand large gaps in IQ (the very first generation West Africans probably had an IQ of 50-70) require some kind of paternalism to make functional in a more sophisticated economy.

We could have cut them loose, but when many of the first generations didn't understand our language, customs, or economies, they weren't likely to do well, as some of the African slaves brought to South America, but who escaped and set up villages demonstrated (even today, they still live primitively like those in Africa).

&gt;what do you think of other countries outside of Europe where Western Europeans are at least 85-90% of the population like Argentina, Uruguay, and Australia?

What are you asking me specifically?  Argentina was a pseudo-America 2.0.  I know the Nazis took interest in it and a number of them went there after the war, but beyond that I don't know much.What sentient intention is ever demonstrated?Well, it's regression to the subpopulation mean.  The human species isn't mixed enough to have a 'species mean'.

Even within one ethnicity, like Anglo or German, there isn't one subpopulation mean, but several (think classes and consistently high or low performing families).

Now, if one of these immigrants is a "high born" (think Brahmin Indian), then yes, their offspring will likely remain high quality for a longer period of time, depending on with whom they breed over that same time.

The 'Hispanic' race is of course not really a distinct race.

If we were to actually get rigorous with this, we'd want to look at actual Amerindian percentages as well as any sub-Saharan African, as often exists in Brazil (which by the way not accidentally has an IQ around American blacks').

A 3% Amerindian is not really the same race as a 30%.

And yes, I agree that analysis of each country does not exist in a vacuum (e.g. US and Soviet interventions around the world and UN aid to Africa).It sounds like your saying it's not useful for an individual to have a political philosophy either, because he can't do anything about effecting it, in the main.As regards genetic engineering?  It's much more complicated than people realize (it's not only allele combinatorial effects, but also chromosomal combinatorial effects, making the matter much more complicated than the mere existence of a given allele; epigenetics also has marginal effects).  We're probably more ~100 years away, not 30-60.

Machine-learning has to really, really step up in a big way, as computing is still the main bottleneck for the level of needed bioinformatics breakthroughs.

And my main interest is HBD, genetics, and human improvement: I spend my time focusing on the general science, not so much simply bashing a given ethnicity; I'll be happy to see improvements.  My career is in this direction.Blacks tend to create population dense areas, given enough resources.Oh, many things can be hyperbolic in reality; I'm just saying it's not aligned with scientific tradition to not eventually break it down into linear relationships, before reconstructing it back up into the nonlinear one.I'm calling you the pious one.&gt; Then why were the masculine traits you're talking about so much more prevalent in times when war was more common?

We didn't have a massive spike, though.  Also, this is a gradual process: I wouldn't be surprised if the world wars were not the only allele-removing setback, but other, past wars.  It's just that the world wars were a great speed-up.

Another issue is that modernity has led to dramatic increases in birth rates of all classes of people, slowly drowning out the aristocratic and warrior classes.  As Evola said, today we have the soldier (the faceless weapon of the bourgeoisie), out of the spotlight is the supra-materialist warrior (if you want to find him today, you'll have to look to athletics, as the only remaining outlet for duels of honor).

&gt;I've heard you talk about how parts of the US are still aristocratic. I was wondering if you felt like those countries held any potential for what would be, in your eyes, a favorable future for the white race.

Well, it could definitely happen in the South were there not so many blacks, as the specific European ethnicities that spent several hundred years under an aristocracy are still here.

What I would like to see happen is many of the white southerners gradually move up to the Pacific Northwest and Midwest, but even if they don't those areas still have quite a bit of Germanic blood and that is the area that stands the best chance of a secession and a restoration of a republic.&gt;If you aren't aware they set about conquest in the name of conquest, conquest for the "Glory of Rome" perhaps you should learn more about the absolute insanity people will engage in because nationalism.

Odd that you'd say nationalism over personal sociopathy.

&gt;Do I need to inform you that China fell so far behind in industrialization because of isolationism, xenophobia and nationalism? They had to protect their precious fucking heritage so much they tried to freeze time and culture. That wasn't their best move was it?

I don't propose isolationism, but international trade and meritocracy.It's really not that threatening to be a cosmopolitan libertarian like Drew or anyone from Reason.

What actually is threatening is to be a paleolibertarian or a race realist.  You can get fired and receive never-ending death threats over that, showbiz or no.You mean, given that blacks were kept out of suburbia?

I don't see how that contradicts my statement.  Africa and Brazil stand by my statement.As in their chances of restoring to strong prominence a European-styled republic?

Maybe, but I don't know enough about them.  I know I have no problem moving outside the US if I felt it was the better place to be for an aristocratic republic, higher culture, and sufficiently good economic opportunity.

Some people strangely think if one has my politics that one just sees themselves as the aristocratic class.  I don't have to be a ruler and I'm not that interested in political mundaneness.  Where I more stand is in the philosophic culture itself.  But then again, maybe those always were the best rulers in the virtuous sense.  In any event, it's pie in the sky for now.Only just now found this?Brazil and Africa contain peoples of high black admixture and have created population-dense ghettos now that they're allowed out of their Malthusian trap by European aid.&gt; The intention to keep you alive.

How is it demonstrated as sentient?&gt;all relationships being linear at the most fundamental levels?

I didn't say what the reality actually is, just that that's how humans have to conceive of it.I'm obviously speaking just objectively here.Africa is almost entirely dependent on European aid.

They still don't know how to produce food at the levels they're willing to breed.I'm not sure their "helping" of the developing world is that much better use of money.

If someone was serious about helping Africa, they'd look into behavioral genetics and not be encouraging rampant dysgenic breeding.

All that Europeans are doing with Africa is setting them up for a genocidal event the likes of which the world has never seen.To be potentially threatened isn't the same as being a victim.Demonstrated intelligence, understanding, and intention.&gt;Sentience is generally either described as A) Self-awareness or B) Ability to subjectively sense or feel stimuli.

That's one and the same as my definition.

How do cells demonstrate self-awareness or exist as definite 'subjects'?&gt;Neither are 12 month old children.

Who says I regard them as having personhood?

&gt;They do subjectively experience and react to stimuli.

As 'subjects'?  What's your definition of a subject?It's just evolutionary behavior.&gt;In essence, the antithesis that I will discuss refers to the different relationship between the military and the bourgeois elements, and to the different meaning and function that the former is supposed to play in society and in the State.

&gt;The view of modern democracies that first emerged in England, under the aegis of mercantilism, is that in society the primary element is the bourgeois type and the bourgeois life during times of peace; such a life is dominated by the physical concern for safety, well-being, and material wealth, with the cultivation of letters and the arts serving as a decorative frame.  Thus, according to this view, the "civilian" or "bourgeois" element is usually, and as a matter of principle, entrusted with running the State.

&gt;It is this human type that engages in politics; when politics\u2014that is, international politics\u2014must be continued with other means, to use the famous expression of Clausewitz, the armed forces are then employed. In this view the military and warrior element has the subordinated meaning of a mere instrument: it should have no particular influence or exercise any interference whatsoever in daily social life.

&gt;Even if it is acknowledged that the military element has its own code of ethics, it is not desirable that this code be applied to the normal, overall life of a nation. The view I am referring to is closely associated to the humanitarian-liberal beliefs that True civilization has nothing to do with that tragic necessity and useless carnage called "war"; that a True civilization's foundations are not the warrior, but the "civic" and "social" virtues inspired by the "immortal principles"; and that "culture" and "spirituality" are expressed in the world of "thought," the sciences, and the arts, while everything that is related to war and military matters amounts to brute strength, to something materialistic and soulless. 

&gt;[...]

&gt;The armed forces are used by modern democracies to impose or retain an economic hegemony; to gain new markets and to acquire raw materials; and to create new space for capital seeking investment and profit. No mention is made of mercenaries, and many nice and noble words are uttered, appealing to the ideas of country, civilization, and progress.

&gt;And yet, all things considered, things do not change much: we still have the "soldier" working for the "bourgeois" or for the "merchant"; the "merchant," in the wider sense of the word, is the social type or caste that is at the forefront in this capitalist civilization.

&gt;[...]

&gt;This order of ideas is opposed by the truth professed by those who uphold the higher right of a warrior view of life, which has its own spirituality, values, and ethics. Such a view finds a specific expression in everything that has particular pertinence to war and the military profession, yet it is not reduced to or exhausted by it; it is susceptible to manifestation in other forms and domains as well, and to imparting an overall tone to a given, unmistakable type of socio-political organization.

&gt;In this context the "military" values approximate the specifically "warrior" ones, and it is regarded as desirable that they join political and ethical values and supply the State with a firm foundation. The anti-political bourgeois view of what is "spirit" is rejected here, as are the humanistic-bourgeois ideals of so-called "culture" and "progress"; a limit to the bourgeoisie and the bourgeois spirit is established in the State's articulations and overall order.

&gt;This does not mean that the military must manage the affairs of the state (with the exception of emergency cases, as recently happened in Spain, Turkey, and Greece, in order to contain the spread of subversion), but rather that virtues, disciplines, and feelings of a military type acquire preeminence and a superior dignity over everything that is of a bourgeois type.

&gt;We may add that this view does not uphold the "barracks as an ideal," nor does it seek a strict regimentation of daily life (one of the traits of totalitarianism), which is synonymous with a stiffening and with a mechanical and obtuse discipline. Love for hierarchy; relationships of obedience and command; courage; feelings of honor and loyalty; specific forms of active impersonality capable of producing anonymous sacrifice; frank and open relationships from man to man, from one comrade to another, from leader to follower\u2014all these are the characteristic, living values that are predominant in the aforementioned view.

&gt;These are the values found in what I have called the _Mannerbund_. Everything that has exclusive pertinence to the army and
warfare is only a detail in a wider order of things.

&gt;[...]

&gt; ... how often in the traditional world we encounter the interpretation of life as a perennial struggle between metaphysical powers, between Uranian forces of light and order, on the one hand, and telluric, dark forces of chaos and matter on the other. Traditional man yearned to fight this battle and to triumph in both the inner and outer worlds.

&gt;A True and just war on the external plane reproduced in other terms the same struggle that had to be waged within: it was a struggle against forces and people that in the external world presented the same traits as the powers the single individual needed to subjugate and dominate internally, until a _pax triumphalis_ was achieved.

&gt;From this follows an interdependence between the warrior idea and that of a certain "asceticism," inner discipline, and superiority toward or control of one's self that appears in various degrees in the best warrior traditions and remains on the military plane (in the specific sense of the term) with the authentic value of a culture, in the antiintellectualist sense of development and mastery of one's self.

&gt;Contrary to what the bourgeois and liberal polemics claim, the warrior idea may not be reduced to materialism, nor it is synonymous with the exaltation of the brutal use of strength and destructive violence.  Rather, the calm, conscious, and planned development of the inner being and a code of ethics; love of distance; hierarchy; order; the faculty of subordinating the emotional and individualistic element of one's self to higher goals and principles, especially in the name of honor and duty\u2014these are all elements of the warrior idea, and they act as the foundations of a specific "style" that has largely been lost.

&gt;[...]

&gt; It has rightly been affirmed that war shows a nation what peace has meant for it.  The "military" education of the spirit has an independent value from "militarism" and from war; however, it creates the necessary potential so that, when a war breaks out, a
nation is ready for it, and fights it with a sufficient number of men who reproduce in a new form the warrior type, rather than that of the "soldier."

&gt;The entire order of ideas that has been discussed so far is thus ignored or falsified by the polemics against "militarism," just as in other cases (e.g., "totalitarianism") a False target is created. In reality, what is meant to be effaced and discredited is a world that the merchant and the bourgeois type abhor, hate, and regard as intolerable, even when it does not directly threaten democracy.

&gt;Thus, it is convenient to focus on that which is only a degeneration of militarism, namely those situations in which a certain class of
professional soldiers, of rather narrow views and limited competence, exercises an artificial influence on the politics of a nation, pushing it to the brink of war with the support of warmongering elements. Such situations can be definitely condemned without thereby  compromising the value of the overall warrior view that I have discussed so far. -- Julius Evola, _Men Among the Ruins_My dreams are either about sex or violence, sometimes grocery shopping.Bad, of course: it's a waste of resources.

It's True I do value tempering of character, but a high-speed burst of death and random monkey-grade violence are not uniquely ascetic in a way a more naturally ordered method would not be.&gt;Don't read books or think about them. -- JobDestroyerDoesn't have to be a genocide.Racism actually increases the closer whites live to blacks.&gt;re: average black high school senior scoring slightly below average white 8th grader

It's not that shocking, as the average sub-Saharan African adult has a raw IQ score (not normalized) on par with the raw IQ score of an 11 year old Northern European.

Now, with American blacks their (normalized) IQ is 15 points higher than pure sub-Saharan Africans, thanks to the former having 20-30% European genetics, so the disparity isn't going to be quite as great as the above, but it will be noticeable: 

That white 8th grader is around 14 years old and their raw IQ and brain will still be growing, whereas the black high school senior has likely already reached where his inherited IQ is going to be and his overall brain is almost done growing, so the latter can be roughly seen as an adult for these purposes.

Thus, there is only a three year difference between a pure and an American black to achieve raw IQ parity with whites, again due to that 20-30% European genetics.

What's more, pure sub-Saharan Africans also are particularly poor at mathematical ability, just like American blacks, as Tom said.Gradual and deliberate war, but built up toward in all the natural, healthy ways, not war just for war, as that imbalances the growth and makes for little gotten out of it.

I recommend looking at [this passage I posted recently.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3o7wr7/daily_discussion_thread_everything_about_me_on/cvutbif)

What I favor, above all else and for all times, is this disposition.  From here, a war brought to us is delighted for, but we will not create them willy nilly, lest we imbalance the growth process and lose the mental pose of fighting for something internally meaningful.

In short, to be able to be a saint and a demon, in a streamlined, always spiritually ascending process.That's my boy.There's all kinds of ways genetics can be modulated, too.

The low-R MAO-A allele that is often cited as disproportionately occurring in black males and which increases the likelihood of antisocial violence can be made worse by child abuse.

It's similar to how psychopathy can be modulated by child abuse.Well, there's that, but also selective pressure in diaspora and certain kinds of recessive interbreeding that panned out well.https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Psychopathy#Genetic&gt;It shouldn't be shocking that IQ favors children over adults of any categories.

Wha?  Raw IQ scores are lower pre-adulthood, for the same race/sex.

&gt;So your saying growth development for africans stops sooner than whites?

You don't seem to understand the difference between raw and normalized IQ scores.&gt;It could be that africans might naturally have a different hormonal cutoff, but that's a long stretch from saying it's genetic.

Are you referring to the fact that Africans do, in fact, develop more quickly (gestation, puberty, etc.)?

It's pretty immaterial to our point.

&gt;it still isn't genetic because genes don't directly start or stop brain development - that is done through hormones

The nature v. nurture hypothesis is ultimately about heritability v. changeability.Sugarcoating where the evidence points on a given issue is not indicative of an environment that will accept cold economics either.

The ancaps I've known over the years who were very strong on economics have gradually also become race realists, because they had the ability to be reasonable.

Trying to make a cut-off point between the two is clunky and strange; it's not in our nature to not be reasonable, so your effort will likely fail.&gt;it is not part of anarcho capitalism

And yet Europeans are the only ones who've ever had even classical liberalism.

How can you say sociobiology isn't important\u2014even vitally critical\u2014to what politics form?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jWYRDCIAKKk

It's experimental industrial, made by one of the pioneers of the genre.

I found this group while I was in the middle of reading Evola, and I must say the combination is _subliiiiiime!_&gt;whites are superior to blacks

One has to always first name the dimension: 

West Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having a greater fast twitch muscle density in their legs (sprints, jumping).

East Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having a sizable combination of fast and slow twitch muscle density in their legs (medium endurance running).

Sub-Saharan Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having straighter femurs, which give a more efficient running skeletal profile; in having greater bone density where it's advantageous; in having slightly longer legs (running, jumping), and in having wider nostrils and larger lips where heat dispersal is important.

Europeans are 'superior' to Africans in having lower bone density where it's advantageous (swimming), slightly shorter legs, but higher innate upper body strength (weightlifting, wrestling), and narrower nostrils and smaller lips where heat retention is important.

These, of course, are just some of the physical differences, too: there are developmental differences, hormonal differences, and neuronal differences.He also came from a very long line of Jewish rabbis.

Given diasporic Jews' tendency to end up in sociology and in making fundamental critiques of the West (see [_Culture of Critique_](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Culture_of_Critique_series)), it's not that shocking he did what he did, and if one understands what the Jewish evolutionary strategy is (pseudoscience, scriptural interpretation), it's even less shocking.Do you have any interest in observing the current alt-right fights that happen here?

Otherwise, I'm not sure this place is much better.&gt;The anarchists.  These are not the oppressed classes, but the outcasts of the community of all classes hitherto.

&gt;Seeing that all our classes are permeated by these elements, we have grasped the fact that modern society is not a 'society' or a 'body', but a diseased agglomeration of Chandala, a society which no longer has the strength even to excrete.&gt;high school drama

_"When the anarchist, as the mouthpiece of the declining strata of society, demands with a fine indignation what is 'right', 'justice', and 'equal rights', he is merely under the pressure of his own uncultured state, which cannot comprehend the real reason for his suffering\u2014what it is that he is poor in: life._

_A causal instinct asserts itself in him: it must be somebody's fault that he is in a bad way.  Also, the 'fine indignation' itself soothes him; it is a pleasure for all wretched devils to scold: it gives a slight but intoxicating sense of power._

_Even plaintiveness and complaining can give life a charm for the sake of which one endures it: there is a fine dose of revenge in every complaint; one charges one's own bad situation, and under certain circumstances even one's own badness, to those who are different, as if that were an injustice, a forbidden privilege. 'If I am canaille, you ought to be too'\u2014on such logic are revolutions made."_ -- _Twilight of the Idols_

---

_"The well-born simply felt themselves happy; they did not have to manufacture their happiness artificially through looking at their enemies, or in cases to talk and lie themselves into happiness (as is the custom with all resentful men); and similarly, complete men as they were, exuberant with strength, and consequently necessarily energetic.  They were too wise to dissociate happiness from action\u2014activity becomes in their minds necessarily counted as happiness (that is the etymology of \u03b5\u1f56 \u03c0\u03c1\u03ac\u03c4\u03c4\u03b5\u03b9\u03bd)._

_All in sharp contrast to the 'happiness' of the weak and the oppressed, with their festering venom and malignity, among whom happiness appears essentially as a narcotic, a deadening, a quietude, a peace, a Sabbath, an enervation of the mind and relaxation of the limbs\u2014in short, a purely passive phenomenon._

_While the aristocratic man lived in confidence and openness with himself (\u03b3\u03b5\u03bd\u03bd\u03b1\u1fd6\u03bf\u03c2, 'noble-born', emphasizes the nuance sincere, and perhaps also 'na\u00eff'), the resentful man, on the other hand, is neither sincere nor na\u00eff, nor honest and candid with himself._

_His soul squints; his mind loves hidden crannies, tortuous paths and back-doors, everything secret appeals to him as his world, his safety, his balm; he is past master in silence, in not forgetting, in waiting, in provisional self-depreciation and self-abasement._

_..._

_To be unable to take his enemies, his misfortunes and even his misdeeds seriously for long\u2014that is the sign of strong, rounded natures who possess a superfluity of moulding plastic force, that heals completely and produces forgetfulness: a good example of this in the modern world is Mirabeau, who had no memory for any insults and meannesses which were practised on him, and who was only incapable of forgiving because he forgot._

_Such a man indeed shakes off with a shrug many a worm which would have buried itself in another; it is only in characters like these that we see the possibility (supposing, of course, that there is such a possibility in the world) of the real 'love of one's enemies'."_ -- _On the Genealogy of Morals_

I like the shitlord aspects of her, but little else.

(If you want [the ultimate female shitlord.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Savitri_Devi))&gt;I think as she says, she may have the only consistent philosophy that you can live a fulfilling life under.

[Oh, hai.](http://i.imgur.com/BZoFwEu.jpg)&gt;Psychology and philosophy don't mix.

For analytics, not continentals.  It's pretty easy to force biopsychology to the fore, either by getting at what logic really is or even invoking modern neuroscience.&gt;outright fascistic

What's wrong with this?

'Fascism' isn't one and the same as 20th century totalitarianism; it more concerns a spirit of a polity.

Capitalism can be thought of as rule by the bourgeoisie, Communism rule by the proletariat, and Fascism rule by the aristos.

Fascism is about [a kind of ascended spirit](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3o7wr7/daily_discussion_thread_everything_about_me_on/cvutbif), which Captalism materializes into timid mediocrity, which Communism then seeks to simply end by ending civilization itself.&gt;anarcho-capitalists turning toward mutualism

Many more are leaving it for the alt-right, not mutualism.&gt;Most people who identify them as previously AnCap tend to have an extremely poor understanding of what AnCaps actually believe

This was True before the alt-right when the very few who left here and there went into leftism and mutualism.

Now, however, you're going to have a hard time finding post-ancaps who went further to the Right (the majority of the exodus now) not being able to show specialized knowledge of the treatises.

Many of us have actually read much more ancap literature than the present ancap flag wavers.Have you seen him debate sociobiology?

The man clearly shows up.  I'm just a fraudulent former ancap.

&gt;saying his own arguments for his position are so difficult that not even most of the people on this sub that call themselves anarcho-capitalists could grasp them

He's just a second-tier consequentialist ancap; he wasn't that impressive to us other consequentialists back in the day.That's pretty silly: I'm a talented real-time debater, but I've been methodically taken to task by certain commentators whom I'm confident are not aggressive orators.

It's essentially an INTJ v. ENTJ battle, where the former can offer good criticism if you're noble enough to give him the time.&gt;Mostly through Center for a Stateless Society.

http://i.imgur.com/uUt3oMr.png

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/328aw4/keith_preston_on_c4ss_theyre_all_crazy_nutcase/Bourgeois self-hatred.Libertarianism is failing because it's too leftist, too Levantine.

For it to manifest, it must do what it did before: be high trust.I recently collated the rest of the Nietzsche quotes I like, as I move on into Evola, J\u00fcnger, and Ortega (and do the same for them).What's so outlandish about different sociobiological groups adapting to different geographic and sociopolitical circumstances, leading to different evolutionary strategies?

From where did you even think cultural differences arise?(\u3065\uffe3 \u00b3\uffe3)\u3065

I have a great deal of virtue ethics content from Evola and J\u00fcnger coming, too.It's a question of the degree of subconscious self-deceit.

It's True you can find certain types who are not as vengeful as the most anti-civilizational minds, but as regards "equality," it depends on the manner in which you're approaching it.

If it's out of explicit "this is what's right and just!" then it is decadent, which is to also say 'self-loathing', 'unknown to oneself', 'slavish plotting'.

If it's out of an unconscious "I do not need the cowardice of arbitrary subjugation and restraint" [monarchical rule v. aristocratic rule], then it's of course not decadent, but very strong.

The above quote describes a man who is too strong to have need for special revenge, for deep-seated grudges; due to his overflowing vitality, he is happy to enrich his enemies, to give them their "due" (even though there really isn't such a thing and nor does he need such machinations) and their chance to prove themselves and meet spirit-to-spirit.

In describing this, I am partially presenting Aristocratic Egalitarianism, which endorses an 'equality' only out of the relish of an honorable challenge, a chance to stretch one's limbs and enjoy one's power (sex and athletics are the few outlets we have left where men are True to themselves and commune with all dimensions of their spirit).http://i.imgur.com/qAtmaes.gifv

What's a great man without his escort of gossipers?Some of the recent ones were, but the term ultimately goes back to aristocracies.That's the monarchical-totalitarian form of ruling so common to the East.

'Fascism' derives from Roman and Etruscan aristocratic roots, which is unique to the West.

Unfortunately, though, much of the West has regressed into bourgeois consumerism and plebeian anti-culture.

And for the record, I don't know that much about the German and Italian fascist movements of the 20th century to be able to say where they stayed True to Aristocratic Egalitarianism and where they went off into Eastern despotism.  I look forward to knowing soon, though.A martial disposition toward adversity is admirable and spiritually empowering, but an anti-artistic, mere thug mindset doesn't take one to any higher consciousness.I see you're still enjoying the lion phase.Well, that's the scientific parlance; take it up with the evolutionary psychologists.Christians tend to be more charitable._Auhtizmz feez_ _geewwwddd!_Curt is actually a heavy analytic, not much like me.http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf

I'd start with Chapter 7, but you can read the whole thing.Looks more like a broad synthesis of various modes of analysis, but if you say so.lol&gt;calls me a race traitor

lolwutProbably near the end of the year.It's a very useful interpretative tool for organizing people and dispositions toward them.

The descriptions they give tend to be spot on and the advice on faults helpful.because - but - however - because - however \u2014 value preferences.It would be better if there was archaeological evidence presented on the native Africans, rather than 'eye witness' accounts.

Many Classicists believe Julius Caesar lied about the barbarity and polyarmory of the Gauls, and I imagine this is a fairly common act for civilizations with an incentive to dehumanize.I like it on some levels and would have _really_ liked such an explicit system in my ex_logica days, but I understand now the extent to which dialectics is egalitarian and spiritually and artistically suicidal.

It's not an accident philosophy has historically moved toward egalitarianism\u2014dialectics is the very first step toward leftism.&gt;Personally, I'm not a big fan of the whole enslavement and mass killing of any peoples, even if it does get them to stop ripping out hearts and enslaving each other.

How would you handle such a foreign culture?Are we coming out as [Nazis](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sW80JfXLZGs&amp;t=25s) now?&gt;Eye witness evidence is more reliable than archeology

Not as an absolute, no, far from it.  It just depends on multiple factors what you go with.

Forensics bleeds into archaeology and often with similar rigor.

Obviously, if there's comparatively less to go by with archaeological evidence of an area, we can consider eye witness accounts more heavily, but even here prudence must be taken.Have you looked into these two authors yet?

* http://www.goldberg-patriarchy.com/

* http://marchofthetitans.com/

Have you finished _The Uniqueness of Western Civilization_ yet?&gt;"Why shouldn't seasteading go south, too, like the mainland?"

&gt;&gt;"Because property rights and contract."

&gt;&gt;&gt;"So, more social rigidity."

These two supposed paths to ancap are bedfellows\u2014seasteading and tech; they are both ways of dissecting fluid society into abstract, isolated units of account, which can be mathematically manipulated and reconstructed in a way that pleases the rationalist.

In all this, the irrational, the animalistic must be hated, hated for being incomprehensible to the weapons of the rationalist, hated for being a world not bourgeois _in toto_ \u2014 the State as the greatest concentration of the anti-rational, one that will never be conquered by the bourgeois rationalist.

The only way forward from here is to accept nations as pre-conscious biological phenomena and stop trying to conquer them with post-conscious tools, as if 'property rights and contracts' could circle back and turn on its origin.I'm more making an (obscure) philosophical point, rather than one couched in the analytic framework.

Maybe reading [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/35ctpo/the_neonazi_element_in_this_sub_is_disturbing/cr3q0br) will help.Why should you be concerned whether your political philosophy for society has no awareness of society?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9hB9bRQlXz4&gt;humanist politicsHasn't Penn always been more the touchy-feely sort?

It's not that surprising.  In the end, you guys need us levelheaded shitlords.(Extreme) 'income inequality' has the potential to break up a social pact.

Aristocratic republics existed as social pacts where the aristos were allowed to enjoy their higher abilities because they still ensured all boats rose and kept the nation together.

Many aristos even enjoyed this burden being placed on them, as a chance to demonstrate heroism and grandeur.

However, today in the US, we have an aristocratic class that isn't really an aristocratic class: they exist blissfully unaware of [the death of the working class,](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6q3zy4NRzz4) and the chances of the social pact\u2014where some measure of inequality is tolerated by that working class\u2014breaking are increasing from here.Would ancap not use drones?The Left has always been about identity politics.&gt;No wonder why the mexican cartel put a million dollar bounty on trump.

It was supposedly $100 million, but the DEA regards it as fake.Low skilled labor is not going to generate enough productivity and it also shifts the voting demographics even further toward leftism.

Obama wouldn't have gotten elected in '08 or '12 had we just had the demographics of '91, that's how quickly things are changing.

Another decade of Hispanic immigration and we'll be pushed even further to the Left.

And you were talking about encouraging lazy people?Latinos have already treated the US like dirt for the majority of their time here, by repeatedly voting 70% Democrat and pushing the Democrat party into the coalition of anti-whitey, anti-European legal institutions.&gt;You think he'd be a Hitler 2.0 with Latinos in the place of Jews?

We know your butthole puckers at the chance to morally shriek and sigh.Anarchy is indeed international law.Race and ethnicity are the scaffold for a particular culture and set of sociopolitical institutions.With regard to point 2, Lincoln's treatment of the South also acted as a warning to Northern copperhead secessionists.The only thing I can recall calling people on the issue of race is a cuck\u2014a self-hating whitey.

I'm a meritocrat more than an ethno-nationalist, but when one goes out of their way to hate whitey, you bet I revile that level of self-hatred.I recommend taking a look at [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2pfj5h/antimetaphysical_egoism/).

I'll explain anything else from there.&gt;Saying the individual is the fundamental social unit is no less aware of society than a study of atoms is unaware of molecules.

Even with the invention of the isolated atom, we run the risk of pretending like its identity isn't connected to the Universe in the manner it is.

&gt;Social atomism sees society as an emergent creation of the action of individuals

And this is an invention.Do you support Barack Obama?  Because they sure did.

They have little to no awareness of the European historical arc.

They want more and more services; almost every party south of the border is explicitly socialist and communist.&gt;Cantwell just disavowed NRx as statists

Oh, no, we're going down now; all bets were on this random outsider Cantwell who's read 1/2000th of the literature.

&gt;Mao was right, political power comes largely out of the barrel of a gun. Our choices are to cower from this reality, or to fight for the most noble of causes.

"Hahaha, Cantwell just disavowed ancap as pansies.  Classic, and True."

&gt;My biggest problem with Cantwell is he has not learned the deeper lesson of love.

"My biggest problem with Cantwell is he doesn't understand this ideology like I do, _but he totes understands the other one, huehuehuehue._"You are cringeworthily ignorant.  The testimonialist branch does not push for or love the State, but sees it as a social parasite complicit with much of the cultural decline.

The State pushes for multiculturalism, for Christ's sake.  Perhaps you multiculturalist blank slaters should realize whose dinner table you're at.You take a look at Kevin MacDonald's works yet?Apple is actually a hilariously shitty company with hilariously shitty products.You good little Christian, revolting against Rome.

What I don't understand is why you shouldn't go full on into your vengeful ideology and join those even more leftist.&gt;One of the primary advantages of libertarianism is that it would allow Mr. Cantwell to get together with other's who share his cultural beliefs and put them into practice

How did this libertarianism come about in the first place?

&gt;us who disagree with Mr. Cantwell to associate in alternative communities

Like Detroit?  Like Chicago?  Like Atlanta? Like South Africa?  Like Haiti?  Like the Levant? Like Somalia?

Where are the non-majority white libertarian paradises?

&gt;Social practice diversity (within the confines of libertarian axiomatic commitments)

So, 95% white kind of "diversity."Have you taken a look at Curt Doolittle's [Propertarianism](http://www.propertarianism.com/) yet?

It's to ancap what ancap was to classical liberalism; that is, the next phase and how we _actually_ reduce and eliminate the State, with much more history and science on its side.&gt;Don't we all?

Whites do not demand for greater government services nearly as much as blacks and Hispanics.

&gt;You mean like Europe?

The democratic socialist states in Europe are not full blown communist like many parts of Latin and South America (not even Norway and Sweden are that socialist; when you actually look under the hood, you see they do have a capitalist ethos).

They also have been dealing with a hostile elite like us Americans (e.g. anti-free speech legislation passed that imprisons you if you say, "Maybe not exactly 6 million Jews died in the Holocaust," even though free speech is a deeply European institution).

Nationalism is slowly growing in Europe, starting in France and the East, but slowly building up in other areas, like Poland, Germany, and the UK; the elites want to keep breaking it up, but the greater tide is turning.What if the collateral damage is deemed worth it on the broader market?

What if there were few willing to represent or collect for contingent victims?

Let's not kid ourselves that brown people are going to all of a sudden become high trust and establish high market value.&gt;Maybe I would still attempt to conquer the Americas and force them to give up sacrificial rituals and keep them from fighting each other out of some sense that what I'm doing is for the greater good but still allow non-toxic aspects of their culture to exist.

And when they descend upon your people with spears and shields?

&gt;What about you? Would you do anything differently than our timeline?

I don't know all the specifics of Spanish colonialism.  Any aristocratic republic I was a part of I would want to practice a sustainable division of labor between the classes: the workers, the bourgeoisie, the aristos, the artist mythmakers.

I don't hate brutal cultures, least of all the Aztecs.  As an enemy, I would proudly honor them how they would want to be honored: on the battlefield.

Life, after all, isn't about survival; it's about ascending and experiencing the Sublime how one will, before one's life flickers out, perhaps as the brightest moment right before it does.

[War and Warriors](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w3eNMHPALjA&amp;t=1h22m2s)And yet where are the toilet paper shortages in Europe?&gt;Where else do you see society then? Can you point to it? Weigh it?

Yes, I see society as sociobiological blocs.

&gt;We recognize the concept of a network is an abstraction over many individual components

And why can't it be the other way around?  The individual as the "useful invention"?&gt;Nothing is for nothing, and suffering is the price.

I like this.

&gt;One day we shall march through Europe in flames, avengers of our comrades' martyrdom; builders of future Aryandom upon the ruins of Christendom; rulers of the new Golden Age.

She's getting me hot and bothered._Grrreeeeeaaaat_.  We got us another reactionary here, guys.

_Mods, do something for my NAPs!_At least come up with relevant joke material.Tommy boy is a Catholic conservative.  He's already in Curt's camp; he just doesn't know it yet.

I tried to schedule an interview between the two, but I haven't been able to get a hold of Tom yet.

There is zero conflict between Tom's values and Curt's system, and I imagine it's a system Tom would be a thousand times more comfortable pushing than ancap polycentric law (when was the last time you heard Tom talk about "PDAs"?).https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9-gSJW3sHXE&amp;t=8s&gt;Viewing a set of individuals as a society reduces complexity (destroys information).

And why can't it be the reverse?

The greater complexity of the Universe is in its combinations of units, not the units.

(And even this leaves aside my critique of universal atomism\u2014personhood is not equally distributed.)

https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/I love how you talk around giving a counter-argument to make it sound less like bullshit.With which degree?There's nothing wrong with having a certain pang for that 17-18 year old girl that's fresh on the scene, but when you're a 45 year old loser attracted to 8 year old girls, we got a problem.Well, your first claim aside, even the anti-racists here would probably prefer a neoreactionary aristocracy to a populist democracy.

At least when you have fewer and more intelligent people with influence, you can more easily reason with them and there are fewer minds to have to sway; when it's a populist democracy, it's communism all the way down.https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3ojgf7/the_lifestyle_of_the_natives_conquered_by_the/cvz7y24Post this question as a thread; I'm confident you'll be told sound economics + racism &gt; democracy + racial egalitarianism.We have indeed had this conversation before and I'll tell you what I told you then: I'm not advocating for an autocracy; aristocracy is not an autocracy, but historically stands in strong defiance of it.&gt;you aren't the person we asked for a source

I'm sorry your attack on him didn't go as planned, truly.

&gt;rambling lists of other articles written by NRxers is bad evidence

TIL CBS News is "NRx."If that's where the economics are, I'd love for you to show me a prominent firm advocating for unprofitable policies.

You guys shouldn't forget I was a moral nihilist consequentialist ancap for nearly a decade; I can take you apart using your own system; it was I who turned many of the prominent consequentialists here into what they now are.I'm thoroughly uninterested in wondering what a mediocre rationalist was thinking X number of days ago.

You don't even understand what the ancient aristocracies historically even were.

Go read Duchesne and then strike a conversation with me; otherwise I'm moving on.Ancap revolution one inch closer thanks to this submission.Probably many East Anglo urbanites.

From here, the demographics of the Democrat vote will be the same group + blacks and Hispanics.So, why do ancaps have such a fetish for social atomism?

Why is the individual the starting point and not the Nation?

After examining biopsychology and neuroscience, 'the individual' is no less an invention than a 'nation' is.It's been a glorious fall into neoreaction.I think people have tipped me Bitcoin in the past, but I don't track the crypto scene for the how-to.Aristocratic republics are anti-state\u2014the State being defined as concentrated social parasitism.

Historically, it was only the aristos who could [defy both tyrant kings and mob rule.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FdjQpQWyff0&amp;t=48m44s)

Historically, it was only via these republics the world has understood any significant measure of liberty.Deportation of all Sub-Saharan African-derived persons testing below a 100 IQ.

I can propose more changes from here, but they may take longer than 5 years for the GDP to recover and exceed its counter-factual.

The ideal situation is where one doesn't get citizenship merely because one wants to be here, waits the allotted time (or just comes illegally), and then passes a trivia test; the ideal situation is meritorious naturalization, which will have the coincident result of a 90+% European nation, with only the cream of the crop of other ethnicities allowed in.  Anyone who degrades the political order will be deported regardless.Society isn't about 'voluntaryness', never was, and never will be: people and polities will routinely violate what rights you think you deserve if externalities are sufficiently in play.Increasing welfare tourism would help the economy?Increasing welfare tourism would help the economy?

Importing more of a demographic which favors an expansion in government at 7:3 odds helps the economy?You don't even have to play this card: Hispanics will reduce the monetary economy, too.What do you mean by current nationalization standards?What would be the 'economic correction' that takes place while importing scores of government-loving Hispanics?And ancap governance is primarily based on insurance.

Oh, the irony.Ancap PDAs won't be concerned with developing risk profiles for certain categories of persons?

You do understand how insurance works, right?How is turning everyone into a soldier the efficient equilibrium?&gt;It's hard to convince people to go attack that other guy and potentially die.

Muhammadism seemed to do it sufficiently fine._The Art of War_ is a pretty terrible "book."Why go with that horrendous naturalization process?Many blacks don't work and are net beneficiaries and increasers of the State.

&gt;What you call "meritorious naturalization", I call "the pricing mechanism".

The problem you're going to have is that human organization doesn't have a market as its ultimate foundation.

There's [a status economy](http://www.propertarianism.com/2010/08/30/the-bipolarity-of-class/), for example, and not everything can be privatized (market norms themselves are an instance of a public good).Actually, most European Americans support a reduction of the United States government.What what has come to?  Maybe Darch's group is brigading you, but that wouldn't be a part of mine, and I don't do that.

As for your above claim, it's True that there's a significant monetary element to libertarianism, with the Puritans and the Ashkenazim being compartmentalized into the mobile bourgeois classes.

But, classical liberalism also has a significant component of aristocratic ethics, for the landed ideology that let it exist.  Britain's rich 19th century civic culture would be an instance of it.Limit Hispanic immigration.I wasn't invoking any political party.  When polled, most white Americans support a reduction of the State.&gt;I think it's better to describe them as a strategy people undertake

It's both.  [It will have public goods dynamics.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3ruuxa/libertarian_institutions_it_is_an_erroneous/)

&gt;the self-reinforcing aspect of market norms

Now, you're playing fast and loose, as it's not the market reinforcing itself, but society continuing to construct the institutions.&gt;Why Sub-Saharan Africans in particular? Why not deport all persons below 100IQ?

Because the group also has behavioral problems.  Deporting all of the unintelligent ones will be a good fell swoop of it.  If intelligent blacks show themselves to still be parasitic, then they will be politically disenfranchised, too.

&gt;you realize the majority of the reason Sub-Saharan africans have low IQs is malnutrition

That's not True.  Intelligence has a very high heritability in the US and has no race specificity.

&gt;You're also wrong about who will pass the meritocratic test. It will be 90+% asians (and some Jews).

East Asians are anti-Faustian and Ashkenazim are often heavily anti-aristocratic.

The former can still be worked into the economy, as middle managers, but both groups really shouldn't be granted much political legitimacy.&gt;the degree is smaller than you imply

Not at all.  It's the difference between a robust market and South America.Force and the threat thereof, of course.

Parasitic state actors should be treated as criminals on the commons.

I don't make a distinction: if you're a parasite, you're punished as such, state or non-state.&gt;economists estimate opening worldwide borders would double GDP

I've looked at the analysis: it assumes market and political constancy, which is hilariously dishonest, given that political externalities are the whole of the objection.

&gt;and double GDP is enough to outweigh a LOT of other "bad" consequences

Particularly when that never comes about in the first place and the US is instead turned into South America.Trump is such a meany, ergo I'm right.Actually, blacks and Hispanics don't care much for freedom of speech; they don't have a cultural history of it, but one of ethnocentric lying.I and another can enforce universal property rights, while you merely free-ride on the enforcement and the expectation, and don't formally or informally further their existence.

&gt;One example, being less jealous of allowing others to accumulate wealth makes it easier to overcome the cognitive dissonance with owning that much wealth yourself.

Ethnocentric lying is actually the norm outside Northern European-derived civilizations.You're speaking of external imposition, with those examples.&gt;you're on much shakier scientific ground here

Please, do go through what you base your theories on, then.

&gt;You also conveniently ignore my point about Iodine, which is merely one example of what I'm talking about.

Show widespread iodine deficiency among American blacks.&gt;it's because all their citizens know how to fight

No, the national service is internally seen as a joke and cultural ritual.

Russia could take over Switzerland, even with the mountains and forts they have.  Switzerland is largely left alone because they're engulfed by NATO.The vast majority of people in prison over marijuana are high volume dealers, not mere users.Governance of society is always surrounded by force and the threat thereof.

Regarding punishment of rent-seeking state actors, it must still be an orderly, lawful process.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3v50wr/ancaps_what_are_your_opinions_on_the_more/cxkpk4w?context=3There are multiple phenomena with multiple causes you need to each separate: 

* Doctrinal Islam is inherently imperialistic, conquering and subjugating territories whenever the material allowance is there (see the recent treatment of the Yazidi by ISIS).

* While one party is the weaker, asymmetric warfare is the rational choice.

* Polygamous cultures leave out a swath of men from the possibility of family, children, and a lineage, increasing their time preferences and needing to give them a mythos by which they can still attain status.  War is one method and suicide bombing is the most palpable kind when asymmetric warfare is the rational method of war.

 This is also why rape is a very common method of punishment of women, as it's some of the only action some men get.  Islam also has the practice of taking in conquered peoples' women as sex slaves, to replenish the poverty of women they frequently face.  This is also why they sent primarily their underclass, female-starved men into Europe.  It relieves domestic pressure and weaponizes their underclass.

(And by the way, I'm an aristocratic republican, not an "NRxer" / monarchist / techno-commercialist.)&gt;None of those explain why only Muslims of lands of which are occupied commit such atrocities.

The most violent Muslims are not accidentally those who ethnically originate with the Medina flourishing of imperialist Islam: Arabs.

Arabs only later conquered Iranians and Afghans and forced them to change their religion.

&gt;And let's not forget the kamikaze attacks during WW2 by the Japanese...they weren't Muslim but wait for it....afraid of U.S occupation after the war.

The Japanese had an imperialist, nationalist interest.  The US didn't force them to have that mission; it simply forced them to lash out with it at the US.  The US didn't tell them to go commit genocide against the Chinese.

You're having to _really_ stretch your case if you think the Japanese didn't find it highly honorable to die before surrender, but were thinking about merely occupation.  Were they that peaceful, they wouldn't have tried to take control of the entire southeast.As regards those groups, I don't know enough of the specifics to comment, but I would begin with the suspicion that they simply are materially delimited to the targets they are and are currently more inflamed with the targets they are targeting, not that they love the kafir.I'd believe that were there not a 1400 year history of imperialism, genocide, and slavery, each explicitly demanded by doctrine.

And by the way, the Quran is not the entirety of the doctrine: Muslims worship Allah, but most of the doctrine concerns living like Muhammad, through following the Hadith.When is Caplan going to finally answer his critics on their terms, rather than a sterile economic model which assumes political constancy?This is a decent summary, though there's probably a bit more I need to add: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3spyv0/im_confused_what_this_place_is_for_is_the_sidebar/cx0vttd

I like any inching toward my Faustian aristocracy ideal.  Obviously, Trump has symptoms of the degenerate times in him himself and is not my groomed candidate, but he's a noticeable improvement upon even Cruz (I actually somewhat like Santorum, but he doesn't have a chance).

/u/martinlinsky China has always displayed an essentiality that was capable of some technological breakthrough (the water clock, as imprecise and irregular as it was; and large fleets, as primitive, unwarlike, and unambitious in their treks as they were).

The problem was that they are a culture that more prefers stability with the known than branching out into the unknown.  Most of their identity has been holding off raiders and keeping everyone together.  It's one of seeing reality as a cycle of tradition (East Asian) than a linear progress of endless space (Indo-European, Western).

This is why there was a scientific revolution in Europe as early as the 5th century, well before the Industrial Revolution's engineering side of it, but never one in the East: all they had were various, separate schools, and none of them were independent of the State, but were explicitly oriented around preparing students for the civil service exams.

China had the material to industrialize and nothing stopped them from being scientists but themselves.  Instead of hungrily acquiring and applying new knowledge, they mostly developed laterally, using the same methods to geographically expand and take advantage of the self-fertilizing land they were gifted (contrasted with Europe, which had thick, wet soil that had to be deep-plowed and crop-rotated), until they ran into a Malthusian trap therein and went into decline.

Now, that different spirit is what separates the West from the East, but what separates both the West and the East from the Bantu (Africans) is that both (Proto-)Europeans and East Asians evolved in northern climes (East Asians actually spent most of their evolution in Siberia, migrating down into China and Japan only later).  These harsh northern climates delay development (Europeans and East Asians gestate later than Sub-Saharan Africans and start puberty later), select for lower time preferences, and led to the coincidental mixing with Neanderthals, leading to larger brains (about a cup size difference).

These lower time preferences are what really allow East Asians to work well with Europeans, and in a way that Sub-Saharan Africans have trouble.  It's stereotypical, but I think largely accurate: I like to think of Europeans, East Asians, and Sub-Saharan Africans in the global economy as a firm organization, where Europeans are the Faustian entrepreneurs, East Asians the risk-averse middle managers, and Sub-Saharan Africans the high time preference menial wage-laborers.

Obviously, that's politically incorrect and not immune from ethnic exceptions, but I think it's largely accurate.Obviously, East Asians are a largely peaceful people, and the Japanese in particular are extremely high trust.

What more separates them from Westerners is the hungry, disruptive Faustian spirit the latter has.  _That_ is how I can tell the difference, not 'just eyes'.Well, why shouldn't the West extract and process the oil and gas in the Middle East?

Arabs can't do it themselves anywhere to the level we can.  I personally know engineers who spent a decade extracting and refining in Saudi Arabia.  (Boy, they became wealthy.)The problem you're going to have (like all ancaps, techno-commercialists, and anyone who thinks they can privatize every single thing) is that not everything can be privatized.

There are certain activities and institutions that function more as social corporations with citizens as shareholders.  What this leads to is there being no price possible or tolerated while shareholders still exist (e.g. cultural artifacts and monuments).

So, no, you can't have a "priced border"; what exists instead is positive social externalities (i.e. a nation), which people will defend and have an incentive to defend.  Hence wars, hence nationalism, hence all the things ancaps hate and want to chant out of existence.Solution to borders?  In the abstract ideal and in the current US?

In the abstract ideal, I think only meritorious naturalization should exist and all parasites on the political order (moral commons) should be fined, deported, or otherwise punished.

In the current US, there are rough, simplistic procedures that could be enacted which though not ideal would still lead to a political stabilization and the possibility of a future political recovery, and one of those would be stopping Latino immigration and deporting a portion of the current residents legal or illegal.

The WASP society would have to be gradually restored for the US to remain a world-leading polity, though whether this ever happens is unlikely, at least not without a Soviet-style ethnic breakdown and secession.  From there, we might re-establish a republic in certain sectors.&gt;It feels hypocritical for myself as an immigrant to want to stem the flow of immigration, but nothing good can come from importing extremists.

There's nothing hypocritical about it: we can still let in people of merit who won't privatize, but rather invest in the polity.The main problem in the US is precisely that there is no longer an "average citizen" anymore: we're a diverse set of blocs with fundamentally different attitudes and goals.

In the history of humans, that has never amounted to anything good.  Different people can trade, but different people can't remain long the same nation.

The average white American is probably mostly fine with curtailing Latino immigration, while Latinos are obviously heavily against it.  The 2012 election showed deep demographic problems with the electorate:

http://i.imgur.com/RYVoM0I.jpg&gt;I think that the market will buy the border

What does that even mean?

&gt;and they will start charging people to get in

That's buying a piece of land, in pursuit of encirclement, something common law prohibits: people will not let you privatize their forgone opportunity costs invested into the polity.

Instead, the border will be regulated by the polity itself: the only markets ever allowed to exist are those society lets exist, namely those which don't privatize the moral commons of the nation itself\u2014you getting to enjoy the high capital value of the land as a third party will not be tolerated.  Humans just don't work that way.  The Ashkenazim and other gypsies were hated and constantly deported for a reason.&gt;opening the borders and encouraging socialists to interact with market processes

That they vote out of existence?&gt;If the refugees are choosing the US of their own free will, that is the market in action.

That isn't a 'market'.

If I rape a prettier girl over an uglier girl, I guess that's the market in action.This guy, like Caplan, routinely ignores the political externality argument.Yes, high trust isn't my self-sufficient ideal, if it's not Faustian.

&gt;The Catholic church immediately comes to mind. European culture happily remained in the dark ages until the 1700s.

Talk about embarrassing ignorance.  No professional historian uses that phrase.  It's a myth which does nothing but quickly establish the ignorance of the speaker.You'll have to better restate just what you're trying to say.How is it rent-seeking, when they didn't create the opportunity?

And I think you meant to say free-riders, as rent-seeking, though a subset of free-riding on a provided commons, is a narrow kind of free-riding.&gt;That racism is immoral

I'm not engaging in the ecological fallacy.&gt;Perhaps he ... already has.

He's addressed the correlation between Latino immigration and the movement politically leftward?

Obama and the healthcare bill wouldn't even be a thing were it not for Latino immigration.You can't privatize property rights.  The one must exist before the other can categorically exist."It has also been historically jewish and not nazi."&gt;Modern Islamic terrorists, you mean?

No, I mean the 1400 year long history of imperialism Islam has.

&gt;which makes sense, considering we're the invaders

Afghanistan, which used to be Buddhist before Islam invaded there and wiped it out?I do.  It's inherent in the religion.  Maybe the areas on the periphery we could coax out of their religion, but so long as they faithfully practice it, there by definition is not peace.&gt; Well it's not like I'm going to convince you either way because you've clearly had your mind up about everything from the beginning and you're just going around trying to tell everyone what's correct.

&gt;You can simply not enforce them universally.

Yes, that would be an instance of punishing and expelling free-riders.

Where this becomes non-ancap is that restitution may be sought, to remunerate those who invested in the commons with their forgone opportunity costs of being parasites themselves.

&gt;You could argue socialism also isn't Northern European. However, I don't find that convincing as many Northern Europeans have embraced, and continue to embrace, socialism.

Northern Europeans embrace high trust class collaboration, which is more indicative of having roots in aristocratic republicanism.

If one's definition of 'socialism' is simply not having only mobile bourgeois interests (Puritans, Ashkenazim), then I guess every landed polity is 'socialist'.I don't oppose marijuana legalization, though I find the use of it displeasing, as it affects nearby people, via the active ingredient and the pungent smell.  I won't tolerate extensive use of it around me and have policed such a policy with roommates.Obama wouldn't even be elected had we not the Latino migrants we've had since '65.

How can you say with a straight face a group which routinely supports Democrats at a 70% rate has no effect on the size of government?I don't know the minute demographic details of the various areas of Germany.  Obviously, the more east you go in Europe in general, the lower trust it becomes, particularly when crossing the Hajnal line.

You'd have to also figure Soviet rule selected against aristocratic ethics, disproportionately executing the more strongly anti-Soviet.

&gt;If anything, one would expect better results from immigration, as the act of immigration itself, outside of refugee situations, is a meritorious self-selection.

To some degree, this empirically is seen, but regression to the mean is just as empirically seen.  One instance was a group of higher IQ Caribbean blacks who came to the US, but whose progeny were tested later near their country's domestic score.  Other behaviors fall back to the mean, too, with higher crime rates seen in later generations of, for example, Latinos.

&gt;The support of farm subsidies is, in my opinion, a good metric of both economic literacy and anti-government sentiments

It's a good metric for bourgeois interests, which is to say those with mobile capital (hence why Ashkenazim are talented economists).  I agree that this is undoubtedly a sign of market literacy, but it's not one and the same as a strong polity, which has other economies besides the monetary.I don't mind a certain measure of worker programs, if commons aren't extensively polluted, but political participation should be entirely prohibited (really, this is occurring within the already mentioned category of "no pollution of commons will be tolerated").&gt; scientific consensus

The consensus I've seen is that intelligence is indeed extremely heritable in the US (0.8-0.9).

This focus on genetics (again, after basics are met, like the iodine we discussed) is [quite mainstream.](http://www.udel.edu/educ/gottfredson/reprints/1997mainstream.pdf)

&gt;I take Steven Pinker more seriously than Noam Chomsky.

Well, that's heartening.

&gt;I mention iodine deficiency because it's widespread in sub-Saharan Africa

The gold standard for showing racial differences is those existing between American whites and American blacks, not necessarily Africa, which indeed has a lower heritability figure.

Moreover, Rushton _did_ notice a comparatively lower IQ at a university in South Africa; it's not like he went out and tested some starving Zulu tribesman.

&gt;there are obvious confounders that vastly reduce the gap

What are they in the US?  I take it you're familiar with the adoption studies?  With SES not helping blacks either?  That per pupil public investment is if anything often higher among blacks?  That IQ differences occur early?  That development happens at different paces (there's actually a point where black babies are more intelligent than the later developing white babies), commensurate with what else we understand about white-black metabolisms?

&gt;there's a whole host of reasons that black americans may have been selected for slightly worse IQs, which would not apply to the vast majority of blacks worldwide

Except it does apply: blacks are a low IQ, high crime demographic everywhere they exist in sufficiently large numbers as to note a stable trend in them (a handful of outliers moving to Hong Kong doesn't really count as representative).

The percentage of black admixture in Brazilians and their IQs actually remarkably meets up with the black admixture in black Americans and their IQs (85-87).

&gt;Lastly, blacks have far more genetic diversity than than all other races combined, so categorizing them together seems inappropriate.

Not if they're showing themselves stably around 60-70 IQ across dozens of countries.  That would just mean that diversity is occurring mostly in other traits.How do you privatize norms and behavioral expectations?Rent-seeking is seeking out a buyer for access to free-ride.

It's True it's an instance of parasitism, but a distinction still has to be made between these two categories of involved actors.I don't care if you want to sic Sinologists on me.

Obviously, the currently established world history profession has a decidedly anti-Eurocentric crusade and mistakes that altruism as a sign of sophistication.  It also helps that it overlaps with Marxian psychology, something an academic is wont to do (anti-big men historiography).By ecological fallacy, I mean I don't insist an individual must continually be judged by his ethnicity, where he's sufficiently demonstrated more accurate information to go by.

I'm not 'out' to screw anyone over who is meritorious.Are you saying Latinos don't disproportionately vote for more government?You can't privatize the expectation of trust.  If I and others create that expectation, we don't have the ability to liquidate it, only punish those who interfere with the productivity it generates.Society is itself an instance of coercion, and at all times.&gt;"Without that transformation, Europe will not survive."

Even in her head, how does she figure that?

Ever heard of externalities?  They cause bums to want to move into pristine environments.Political changes and general cleanliness in the case of literal bums.Society will always be ultimately a monocentric entity, by definition.Northern Europe is actually among the freest economies in the world.Most Muslims want Sharia, which enables such violence.

Violence itself doesn't bother me, but the cultural and economic stagnancy of the religion does.Those 'studies' have been linked here before.  They don't address what I just said.Ah, funny.  Apparently, you guys have yourselves a shitshow here, with all the meta-meta-meta-trolling.Northern Europeans are the most anti-privatization of the commons kind of people in existence.Eh, while it's True places like Sweden and Denmark have considerable government budgets, they more than make up for it with very low corruption and high business freedom, something that can't be said about most of the world.

I think the difficulty low trust libertarians like yourself will have in understanding my position is that I'm not against construction and regulation of various commons, which multiply productivity.  I'm just against parasitic rent-seeking and free-riding, which blunt economic velocity and opportunity.Being that I'm against rent-seeking, calling me a 'statist' by you can only mean you want to be able to free-ride as a social parasite.

And by the way, Northern Europe has higher business freedom and respect for property rights than even the United States, and much less corruption.

The United States loses some economic velocity to those transaction costs, hence why its economy is ranked amid Northern Europe or just slightly below.&gt;Scandinavia is known for its meritocracy and property rights.

&gt;Oh wait

tfw Scandinavia [_does_ have higher respect for property rights than even the United States.](http://www.heritage.org/index/explore)We certainly rely on society for the continued existence of deliberate constructions like property rights, yes.

We don't have to tolerate parasitic rent-seeking, but it certainly is True that no one gets to opt out of commons enforcement, if they are to last long.Yes, there's literally no difference between a Norwegian and a Somalian.&gt;polycentric law allows for any type of restitution, in theory

It's not polycentric, though, but imposed monocentricity.

&gt;I'm defining socialism as a socialist would define it: workers ought to own the means of production.

Well, that hardly contains aristocratic ethics.That 'idea trap' is a convenient hypothesis for someone, like Caplain, so hopeful of other ethnicities.

He doesn't dare consider that many of these ethnicities are much further behind in the political economic division of labor, suffering from higher ethnocentrism, nepotism, and corruption and transaction costs because of it.

&gt;"When polled, most white Americans support a reduction of the State"

That extends beyond just the monetary, but a reduction in rent-seeking and corruption.

Europeans are much more suspicious of government than other ethnicities and hold it to much harsher account, hence the significantly lower levels of corruption in Northern European-derived civilizations.Like we needed any more confirmation beltarians are signaling fags.Today, you learned how to smokescreen your emotional needs.

To the extent you don't have a unified society is the extent to which you don't have a robust economy.  Anarcho-Capitalism is the contradiction of anti-sociality and a supposedly rich market, precisely because you guys don't know what landed, aristocratic ethics are, only diasporic bourgeois.The long-term genetic trajectory for low trust groups is obviously not good.  Jews in particular are breeding themselves out of existence.

Moreover, bourgeois classes (Puritans, Ashkenazim) only exist to the extent aristocratic classes provide the landed ideologies for a market's existence in the first place, so it's not like we can't know who's ultimately responsible for what will be.

Thus, I find the _degree_ of obsession over the Jews among some to be misplaced; they're surprisingly a very weak long-run player, without the ability to govern their ultimate fate.You're surprisingly close to the truth there, ale, in accurately describing how low trust canonical ancap is.Ancaps come from the commercial and craftsman classes (bourgeois); their lives are more about the practical day-to-day of upper middle class living.

Leftists come from the proletariat class which only knows how to threaten liquidation of commons to get what it wants.

It's really not hard to understand: ancaps have more to professionally lose than most leftists.

This isn't to say I find ancaps a particularly laudable, heroic group, but neither will I consider the degenerate leftist underclass, whose existence can't ever not be about writhing that they are and always will be the psychological underclass.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HLEfvGS8RUY&amp;t=3m56s

Pretty novel critique, actually.South Korea and Hong Kong are anything but culturally isolated.

Both are impositions of the West and Hong Kong is a trade hub.

&gt;That is some delicious word salad.

Scientific terms serve a purpose of information consolidation; I can define each of them.Yes, I believe I saw one of those articles, but then he went on to say something else I found ridiculous.

Do you have the link of the piece I'm thinking of?&gt;ought to be the libertarian position

Well, there are two major schools of libertarianism present right now: (1) low trust, cosmopolitan, bourgeois ethics, and (2) high trust, landed, aristocratic ethics.

Rothbard began a school of thought that championed the former, but began to turn against it later in his life.  Hoppe's work is an attempt at championing the latter as well, though he fell quite short of the mark, thinking he could pull it off voluntarily (at least if my understanding of his work is correct; actual Hoppeans can feel free to correct me).

Ron Paul was kind of a hybrid of the two schools, and Jeffrey Tucker and left-libertarians are an extreme version of (1).

Curt Doolittle can be seen as the apex moment the second school has reached, via his Propertarian framework, which finally scientifically states political philosophy generally and high trust liberalism specifically.  History is actually more on Curt's side than any libertarian figure in the history of the idea, especially regarding the figures of the past century, who are almost all bastards of classical liberal history.

Therefore, when you say, "what ought to be the libertarian position," it's important to clarify what kind of libertarianism you're talking about: are you talking about the kind advocated from the social fringes or the kind that has actually existed and existed as the richest economies in the world?Absolutely.As I explained to LowReady, though countries like Sweden and Denmark have considerable government budgets (and not every Northern European nation has a _very_ high government budget\u2014and in terms of just 'government spending money', it's not necessarily a bad thing: what is bad is rent-seeking and high transaction costs, not productive commons creation and regulation; markets owe their very existence to a commons), they more than make up for it with _extremely_ high business freedom and respect for property rights.

You can peruse [Heritage's ranking](http://www.heritage.org/index/), which is mainstream Republican and no propertarian theorists themselves (which if they were would mean they'd have a qualified evaluation of public expenditures and not demonize all of it).Irish Catholics certainly are no WASPs.&gt;finds the objections to be overrated

How can that be, when we're on the verge of the death of the republic?

Twenty more years and we're locked in as Brazil.

&gt;I find it interesting how you embrace supposed "monetary" measures when it backs your views (GDP differences between countries), yet run away from them when they don't. At least I'm consistent.

Oh, I assure you, it's more that what I said went way over your head.

It's okay, though, as Propertarianism is an extremely novel framework, which will take time to explain to ancaps.

&gt;Or, Northern Europeans are just more inclined to obey arbitrary rules.

The history of the Hajnal line certainly would appear accidental, then.

&gt;Which is what the evidence implies whether you want to accept it or not.

I guess if you're working with the low trust definition of libertarianism.&gt;they also don't vote as much as natives

That isn't the metric; the metric is the extent of absolute damage, after all is said and done.

Apparently, even illegals get voted for via absentee fraud.

&gt;They become more libertarian the longer they stay in the US.

As in legalize weed or as in lower taxes and spending?  And certainly not fast enough, regardless, as even third generation Latino immigrants still support an expansion in government services at 58%, significantly higher than European Americans.

&gt;Diversity reduces voter demand for redistribution.

It also leads to destruction of social capital, increase in social transaction costs, and gradual dissolution of a nation.

&gt;Hispanics aren't really that un-libertarian; in some ways (support of trade, immigration) they're more libertarian than whites.

Support of enriching themselves.

&gt;If you still think Hispanic immigration is bad, tax it.

Oh, I'd impose costs on criminals.

&gt;This is assuming Latino immigration has no effect on how everyone else votes. There's definitely evidence and argument to the contrary.

The Overton window has been shifted such that the Democrat party is no longer the party of the white working man, but the coalition of anti-whitey.Who would want to live in poor, low trust Levant/Somalia?&gt;What is optimal is what best serves the consumers.

Are you not an Austrian?  What's more, there are financially successful coops; my favorite beer is made by one.&gt;I've heard anarcho-capitalists say that the 1920s and the 1930s were the most free

Which ancap ever said this?  I could see them saying the early 1800s, but not the '20s and '30s, which even in the US took place beside the Fed and the tremendous credit expansion and collapse.Tax resistance without replacing state services is doomed to fail: people will look at you as hurting the commons, and in a way, you are.The joke's on the leftists who get their history through fiction and need it that way.&gt;nothing says "I'm an enlightened philosopher of individualist ideology" quite like pigeonholing people into stereotypes of race and demographic

Nothing says, "I'm a rational, scientific mind," like belief in the tabula rasa.&gt;'I intend to find out so leave me be'

This is the voluntaryist approach to governance, which reality and history has shown to not be adequate, due to both negative and positive social externalities, which make people willing to overturn voluntaryism for higher utility.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/"Leave me be, bro" isn't an imperative, bro.Thank you for bringing this to my attention.Not in her identity as 'woman', no.

An individual we in parallel call a woman can be heroic, but not as part of her identity as 'woman'.I'm not sure which orifice is flowing more: your eyes or your anus.lol ohf cowse dewd brehAnd yet that's what many libertarians think: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3p4oas/serious_question_what_is_the_difference_between/Mutualists' arguments tend to be that it wouldn't be in the self-interest of most people to alienate their own labor, by separating themselves from the means of production.

Of course, there are ways of taking down mutualists, still (diversity of time preferences, over whose existence they stomp their feet).It depends on what you mean by creative.  I think a number of issues are going on at once: 

* It's True that creative individuals are suspect of centralizing capitalism, as they should be, but

* It's also True many (though not all) so-called "creative types" are just making a crappy product few appreciate, giving them a base, ignoble interest in undermining freedom of choice.

With these two dynamics going on at once, there's a strong reason for non-business, non-STEM minds and vocations to be suspect of if not outright hostile toward capitalism.

Boy, if that introducing speaker isn't facile as he is obnoxious.

Edit: Pretty good way of upending hyperindividualism\u2014putting it in terms of its game theory rule violation and failure.Old perm man does.It means you will never get to be the woman you want\u2014sorry.&gt;what's the point?

It's mainly meant to disarm people who think that something is going awry because the races aren't performing equally in the aggregate.The State couldn't do that by itself.I like Curt's definition: 

&gt;COMMONS \u2013 Originally, meaning Land or resources belonging to or affecting the whole of a community. More articulately: any form of property to which members of a group share an interests, but where that interest is obtained by an unspecified membership in the group rather than by explicit possession of title.

&gt;I use this term to refer to both physical property and normative commons. The problem with commons is that without shares, even un-tradable shares, the ownership of the commons cannot be protected from confiscation by various means including immigration, or political confiscation.When one understands that a diasporic evolutionary strategy doesn't involve standing one's ground, but continuing in migration, then one understands why so many of these Jewish philosophers were mere critical theorists and pseudoscientists, nothing positive or scientific or that which opens itself to honest reciprocity and falsification.

These latter traits are much more common to the West, because of its different, much higher trust evolutionary history.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FMlGFGaN-6s

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-FyMrWbkL7Q&gt;political position

I was confused as to why [this](http://i.imgur.com/09zRVQG.jpg) wasn't a choice.Almost like they're stoking a conflict, but I doubt the ones doing it will enjoy the ultimate results.Actually, the standard deviations are not equal and Jewish representation in academia, business, and media are orders of magnitude greater than the projected numbers for that IQ territory, suggesting deep nepotism.

What's more, Jews do not have a high IQ for every kind of intelligence, most notably spatial reasoning (only 95, not even above 100; their talent is almost exclusively verbal).It depends on the mechanism of enforcing tit-for-tat: Northern Europeans' current methods are very, very suboptimal.

Hence, the creation of operational testimony as the answer.Hence, why Jews are in Europeans' lands and not the reverse: meritorious institutions came out on top, while they are riding the coat-tails of this built-up high trust, as the only way they ever got to experience these levels of capital accumulation (the Levant is very poor precisely because of low trust ethnocentrism).

Jews were very poor prior to European integration and even today still seek continual Western aid to Israel.Mere voluntaryism is not the basis of a high trust and therefore economically rich society.

If you outlaw retaliation toward reviled behavior but which does not violate the minimal NAP (lying by omission, abuse of information asymmetry), what you'll get is a very distrusting society, in fact not really a society as such, but a combination of subsocieties which do not trust one another, a ghetto, where the subsocieties that _do_ trust one another enforcing supra-NAP restrictions.

This fracturing leads to decreased economic velocity relative to an outbred, meritorious, trusting one, which has integrated the subsocieties into a scaled up, faster, richer economy.

Northern Europe beat the Levant precisely because it conquered and united the divisions.Inbreeding happens unconsciously due to geographic isolation and consciously only ever due to ethnocentrism (though this should be more precisely defined: it's general ethnocentrism in very numerically small populations and more accurately class/family-centrism in numerically large populations).A democratic solution?  I thought ancaps understood equal influence = regression to the lowest denominator?

Is not inequality of influence precisely what makes markets successful?Reddit's comment threading really is superb at organizing discussion.

For that, I would think the best use of this platform would be discussion; that really has been the only life and community this subreddit has ever had.

One can get newspam from platforms with inferior comment threading (FB, blogs, news sites, etc.)./u/capitalistchemist proposed [something like this for the weekends.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3ltpx9/an_experiment/)Ironically, that's all most ancaps ever do in merely complaining about the State.

Religiously chanting, "NAP! NAP! NAP!" isn't going to get you anywhere closer; put on your public choice boots.I've been here for quite a while and took part in the "good ol' days," where what was debated was moral realism vs. moral nihilism and deontological rhetoric vs. consequentialist rhetoric.

Many of the now prominent moral nihilists and economic consequentialists I turned so.  I say all of this to confirm I know what has changed here and there in the past five years, and nothing bad has come due to reactionary activity; reactionary activity is 90% of what sophisticated discussion does take place.

Now, if you don't like that and find their points easy to destroy, then do it and lead to an even more sophisticated environment.Who did I drive away?  There are no sophisticated anti-reactionaries here and there never were any (indeed, the 20 or so sophisticated minds I know who post here less are full-on shitlords today).

At best, we have a handful of sophisticated non-reactionaries, but who understand there is compelling evidence for perennial traditions.&gt;if the NRx's are driving most people away, where is the new ancap forum with good discussions? Molyneux? Liberty.me?

The basic bitch ancaps who don't yet understand anything but the economics of the individual, not of society, probably just echo it on gaming channels, a fitting fantasy for their social atomism.

There is no forum where sophisticated anti-reactionary ancap discussion takes place, because no such combination is possible.  That almost every neoreactionary is a former ancap who went on to read more and understand more about society speaks to why that movement toward sophistication takes you out of ancap.

Now, it is also True that it's possible that intellectual progression causes a minority of 'ancaps' to move into left-anarchism, because they gradually see they're forced to choose between shitlordism or why they were ever an 'ancap' in the first place: anti-social hierarchy.

Among the new faces, you can see where a person is likely going to end up, based on what of the ancap canon they stress and favor and how they present the system: the voluntaryists are where the leftists might ever come, where they do, and the economic consequentialists are almost exclusively where the shitlords come from.Nice rationalwiki source.  Might as well cite _The Onion_.Less frequent meaningful discussions, but the ones that do take place are more advanced than they were before.

Before, moral nihilism and moral realism were the major debating points.  Today, that fight is largely over, with moral appeals dead and buried as at least a rhetorical device.

However, while those fights were brewing, ancap was still very divorced from reality, whereas today we are having much better discussions at understanding public choice and the history of _actually existing libertarianism_.At this stage in our debates, we should make a poll on race realism / HBD; the questions could be: 

&gt;"Is race a useful term and heuristic?"

* No, race does not biologically exist and/or is merely a divisive political tool.

* No, evaluate the metric you actually care about (intelligence, crime, political views, etc.).

* At least somewhat, as social capital makes race matter even with meritorious naturalization.

* Yes, race is the most predictive criterion and social capital matters so much it should ultimately trump meritocracy, i.e. we should have a racialist nation and only a meritocracy from there.

&gt;"Are many of the claims by race realists and HBDers accurate?"

* No, studies have not been adequate or even point the other way.

* Yes, but largely academic, as meritocracy should still be the rule of the day, irrespective of "social capital," i.e. the individual shall always be sovereign and his rights not infringed for the sake of social externality arguments.

* Yes, and with political consequences, due to social capital; meritocracy should not be the final principle, but perpetuation of a race.

* Yes, but meritocracy can and should still be the rule of the day, as a meritocracy would still result in very high levels of social capital (i.e. still be mostly European).

Any other questions (or worthy amendments to the above two) would be welcome.

(And for anyone curious or misinformed, my views warrant the third answer to the first question and the final answer to the second question.)

Edit: Eh, I'll just make a thread for this, ennumerate the answers, and tally them.It seems many Europeans are against the immigration, just that there's tremendous control of what's allowed to be said of the issue, either by law or by moral shaming.

My guess is that the various states will just keep pushing it to the social breaking point, and with socially repressed people, the counter-force tends to be potent.The movement toward marxism over black nationalism can be interpreted as a subordination of blacks to Jews, in the revolt against the West.

The last thing that is wanted of the most intelligent of the minorities is a peaceful, separated pluralism, rather than a violent attrition of the majority, using the fodder first.&gt;I think it's a historical fact that the black community and families were much better off prior to white intervention. 

Are you referring to pre-colonial Africa?Rothbard was more just wanting to engender _any_ kind of decentralism.The Ashkenazi are not really that Middle Eastern in the first place.

The ones with genetics more of that area are far less intelligent.&gt;Money makes you dumb

Is this really the rhetoric an ancap wants to use?&gt; Each player punishes each defection individually discouraging defection.

Your sentence's meaning is ambiguous: Are punishments made isolated individual to individual or collective to individual?&gt;you're labelling huge swathes of people as "you're black so you're dumb" or "you're nordic so you're better"

I don't know of anyone here who literally believes that.  That said, this should be compelling information to digest, given that most ancaps are white.  You now know why (I more mean the cultural history of high trust than just intelligence here, though; the Chinese aren't unintelligent, but are largely anti-libertarian).Show me one.  What's more, one of the best HBDers out there is Jamaican.I don't have anything against Ashkenazi practicing the Western evo strat.

This, as a rule, exists whenever they practice the natural sciences, which demands operational testimony via thorough journal documentation and peer-review.

The problem enters in, however, when Ashkenazi enter fields not as easily operationalized, like social science (Freud, Boas, Frankfurt School).And the subsequent destitute poverty.I was more just linking to a comment, rather than retyping all of it.

humanispherian&gt;So the argument is that those who specialize in construction and building factories would then chose to work the factory themselves; instead of moving on and constructing more factories in other places?

Well, that specialization of labor is the result of a diversity of time preferences, which many market socialists seem to think is only the artificial result of state policies.

They think that most capital would be decentrally owned in a stateless system.

On one level, they're right that capitalism and the modern centralized state exist in parallel not accidentally, but they're fooling themselves if they think the modern state came into being by some anti-economical accident.&gt;not a serious argument; statement of exasperation

And you'd be right that this is all you post.Hmm, might that then be the cause for the non-correspondence of this test with reality?

In reality, the build-up of high trust is extremely expensive (defection has to be almost universally punished before it becomes profitable to invest/trust, making this individual to individual method unrealistic).

And the mechanisms of this build-up are not perfect, but rely on clunky social, moral, and cultural mechanisms.  Due to this, I can see it being possible for years, decades, or even a century to go by, with institutions that took a thousand years to build being exploited.

That's essentially what we've witnessed in European history, with more than a few incidents where low trust rule-breakers were expelled (Jews and gypsies have been banished from countries something like 80-100 times).

We seem to be undergoing another cycle of this, but on a greater scale and involving more ethnocentric minorities.&gt;when in fact it's largely inherent to the genre

You choose to post 'news'.If states have that much power, how do they ever collapse?

If they have that much power, why do economies buck government control?D to the first question seems to necessitate C to the second question.&gt;"Social Capital" is unquantifiable.

Couldn't we get some sense of its scale, however, in examining the capital stock and economic velocity of various locations?Elites have been overturned before, yes.

Anyways, to address your question, the SJWs have zero martial clout; they are going nowhere and mean nothing.

The real fight is between the State and the Nation, i.e. anti-Nation social parasite state actors vs. meritocrats and nationalists.It'd be more efficient to link me to the papers that deal with the political economics, not the economics where the politics stays the same or becomes even more pro-market\u2014I obviously understand economic theory plenty fine to realize this latter would result in a major improvement.&gt;For Q2: Show me the genes that back up your claims

Two things: 

* We [have associated some SNPs with intelligence](http://www.eupedia.com/genetics/psychological_traits_snp.shtml).

* Needing to know the direct mechanism is not a practical ground for objection in many areas of science; knowing that a bundle of traits rigorously follow a pattern is enough for some action to take place.

  If we required an extremely rigorous standard for everything, many life-saving medicines, for example, would not be prescribed, medicines whose successful function we still don't fully understand at present, same with many chemical reactions, whose mechanism we still don't fully understand, but whose products keep following a rigorous pattern.

&gt;I don't even think merit should trump the rights of the individual.

Well, if you believe in a free market, then you do believe in merit guiding the level of influence a given individual has in directing capital.

&gt;This is all irrelevant, the age of AI is coming. I just hope they just don't treat us the way you all treat black people, as we will certainly be dumber than them.

Europeans improved blacks.  I see no reason not wanting AI to do the same with us, and in truth, it's more probable that we will integrate them into us, not create separate entities.Where the politics either remains the same or becomes even more libertarian.

Unfortunately, that doesn't seem to be the result, examining sociobiology and observing history.The benefit with this is that I can associate answers with the accounts that gave them and also bypass people taking the survey multiple times via some workaround.

With regard to this not being a closed ballot, I don't quite mind, as I think people should learn to stand on their own two feet.  Taking place in public also makes people more accountable to a coherent worldview, and it's fine if someone wants to say their views have changed since then, too.&gt;What if the benefits gained from worse politics are small compared to the benefits of increased labor mobility? 

If that were True, a country's size would be a greater predictor of its economic wealth than its political views, but of course, it isn't, as Japan, Hong Kong, Singapore, Britain, etc. etc. have shown to India and China.

Social trust can result in widely different wealth levels even where IQ is similar (see Japan and the West contra China and Russia).I'm not sure Cialis was ever a supporter of any particular race as the best; he's also a product of multiple continental races, if I remember correctly.

The issue of Western Europeans and East Asians is an interesting demonstration that IQ is not everything, but that behavior and cultural history in shaping behavioral genes matter just as much if not more.

Finally, Cialis is a meritocrat like me, which means we don't favor racial bans, but meritorious naturalization (just with the understanding that 50-90% of minorities couldn't pass the merit test, banning some Europeans, too).&gt;Being part of a hypocritical superior race would, by default, be part of having greater merit.

What is a 'hypocritical superior race', and why would identifying with it necessitate merit?

&gt;if you understand race is merit

You're saying phenotypic identification always correlates to superior performance in some way?&gt;Labor mobility not the simply the size of the labor force.

Nations of larger size, where geography is not too immobilizing (I admit it may be in certain mountainous areas), will enjoy this larger mobility (after all, it's the national _boundaries_ you guys are focusing on here).

Surely, you can see how mobility eventually doesn't mean that much, when intelligence drops enough and political views are sufficiently illiberal, and I can see how it helps coordinate more efficiently where the politics is libertarian.I think I did on one of my playthroughs way back when.

I was sympathetic to the Roman-inspired Imperials, too, however\u2014I find both the Vikings and the Romans as great civilizations, culturally and militarily.

The one problem with the Imperials is I recall they were being undermined by anti-human elves, and that was the deciding factor for me choosing the Stormcloaks.  I don't know that much about the Elder Scrolls lore, though.Given how much blacks weigh down US statistics (crime, income, assets, educational attainment, intelligence, etc.), it'd be beneficial in factoring them out when comparing US governance to Sweden governance.

For example, when black crime rate is taken out of the picture, the US is as safe as Norway.Not how what works?Ah, yes, E7ernal, ever the revolutionary in thought here.In 2009, &lt; 0.005% of Swedish citizens were of African origin, including either place of birth or actual ethnicity (and most of these are ethnic Swedes whose parents happened to be in Africa during the birthing).&gt; As I said, meritocratic or isolationistic solutions are, at best, temporary.

How is a meritocracy ever only a temporary solution and not the one that should be continually adopted?

&gt;The US had strict voting standards at it's outset (white male landowner), and that didn't even last 150 years. Borders usually don't even last that long. The Berlin wall held for what? 30 years?

Why is this a reason to not put forward positives as they should occur and defend them where possible?

&gt;comparative advantage also leads me to think that even low-skilled labor is valuable. So I'm not comfortable simply dismissing it.

Who's dismissing international trade here?  Indeed, the instance of international trade, as opposed to intranational trade, is precisely where further cooperation isn't yet possible, but limited economic cooperation is.

If political integration occurs prematurely, then you end up with a circumstance _less_ productive than separation, but with international trade.One can obviously get some sense of the power of social capital, by contrasting Western Europe with Eastern Europe.I would answer it in passing, but there is of course the added benefit of clarifying my position to those still not in the know.&gt; Eventually, people's opinions can/will change, and so will the support for the meritocratic policy. As I said, restrictive voting didn't last, it was never going to last.

Do you see this as the result of the r/K cycle or some other mechanism?

I think one way the r/K cycle can plausibly be gotten over is via paying off the underclasses to not breed.

&gt;Encouraging rationality

What meaningful manifestation does that even have, outside perceived value?

&gt;You are dismissing international trade in labor.

I don't dismiss international trade in labor where it doesn't change the politics.&gt;If I recall you support some sort of minarchist aristocracy.

Well, taxation is not ideal, but I'm not categorically opposed to it either.

As far as deportation and defense, it's what you'd expect.  If a more exotic solution presented itself as more efficient, then fine there, too.&gt; The costs of such eugenic guesswork are relatively unknown though.

Given that population size seems relatively much less important to economic wealth than political and moral views and intelligence, I feel confident encouraging of eugenics and discouraging of dysgenics is the way to go, even if it depressed population growth on net.

Looking at modern dysgenics in the West, via welfare-insulated breeding and poor immigration, and the resultant change in politics and economies, the evidence appears to support me.

&gt;The market itself is a mechanism of encouraging rationality.

How, outside of mere pursuit of perceived value?

&gt;But your view is that it does change politics.

It conceivably couldn't via disbarring of citizenship and potentially even limiting cultural contact.

&gt;Bad politics are just another cost

And it's quite clear just how enormous a cost it can be: it can be the difference between being the richest country, to being the poorest, to being an extinct subpopulation.&gt; an individualist ideology is a part of what the mostly European meritocratic marketplace created

Indeed, hence the present difficulties, but [as I argued here](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3iaxks/on_white_nationalismor_why_wn_should_not_be/), the solution isn't to give up on the Western evo strat, but to further entrench it, to demand operational testimony to an even more rigorous degree, which will ferret out the ethnocentric liars while simultaneously keeping the increased productivity that comes from having a meritocracy.Yeah, I didn't crawl out of the womb able to talk about, for example,  the theory-laden nature of science, and there certainly was a time where I thought it was only due to historical treatment (particularly the past half century) that blacks were in the state they were in.  They call it the red pill for a reason, eh?Good summary.  Now that I see it put that way, that immediately makes me think of the gradual Christening of Scandinavia, a real shame, given how debilitating and emasculating the religion.

Of course, a strong people aren't conquered by a weaker mind virus without having first lost strength.You're referring to pathological altruism?  My present theory is that's derived from the hunter-gatherer genetic influence, not something at the core of the Western way of life, which is more derived from the Indo-Europeans, not the communistic hunter-gatherer Proto-Europeans.

I have heard other theories, however, where pathological altruism is more a misplaced outlet for heroic displays, which if True would not neatly divorce itself from the IEs, a people whose existence was always concerned with heroism.

In the first case, the solution is to bias toward breeding out that wimpish communist suicidalism, in the second case, a more conscious understanding of what's heroic and what actually isn't, but good luck getting many dumb and naive people to do that, hence a general stress on eugenic breeding and in either event.

Edit: I suppose it sounds like I'm offering only biologically based intelligence as the solution, when individual biologically based intelligence doesn't seem to be at the heart of the West's economic success as much as the social institutions Western Europeans were behavorially tempered into having, so thus the probable need for an institutional change.

Well, maybe Curt's more explicit operational testimony is that, but I don't see how that isn't what the IEs were categorically already doing, only potentially differing in degree of sophistication (intelligence).Yes, it sounds like you're just saying what many of us have said about Northern Europe.

There enters a problem, however, with your model in witnessing quite clearly the US being abused by ethnocentric minorities.&gt;most bums would not enjoy living there

Yeah, my existence isn't for them; I desire a system which gradually purges genetic mistakes, while rewarding genetic successes.  These measures do not have to be extreme or even violent, but should be there.

Were I forced to treat everyone reproductively identically, then I'd gradually favor the r strategy, which tends to be low quality offspring.

Edit: Now, of course, it's theoretically possible that some r-K combination is the theoretical optimum at any given point in time and I'm fine with that, so long as a hierarchy in human worth is observed and respected.Well, one theory is that Anglos simply went too far in whittling down the family to the ANF, and then on to feminism, and then on to single motherhood\u2014that we should let this subpopulation or a chunk of it push itself out of sustainable existence.

That could be one solution, and to be honest, I have a very hard time seeing how the hyperindividualist Anglos can be saved.  They were always a people too isolated for their own good; in an internal cultural miracle, they ended up conquering the world, but didn't know how to run it.

It's like it was a radical mistiming, where a high trust culture was built-up over thousands of years and then was in the span of a couple hundred years fast-forwarded into interfacing with low trust cultures it wasn't adapted to.

So, it appears the West is undergoing a process where it is relearning mechanisms of detecting and punishing low trust behavior.  The great danger however is that technology is exponential and created that mistiming; maybe then the solution will also come from technology, especially considering that evolutionary psych happens too slowly for this.It's also possible we've intimidated some, but even more probable that a large chunk simply avoid issues which they know they're not educated on, moving on to cop articles, not this matter.Because tax is theft and police are the devil incarnate never gets old.

Philosophy of History is also a child's topic, I hear.Well, operational testimony is itself inspired by computer science, which is operational mathematics incarnate (execution of code is itself an existence proof).

Thus, it's not inconceivable OT happens through it and ramps up alongside politically transformative compsci.

I don't see what's purely masturbatory about understanding the arc of history and what factors have caused what libertarianism has existed to exist.

It would seem what is purely masturbatory deliberately avoiding a more nuanced understanding of libertarian history, for the feel-good, but anti-social voluntaryism.Even so, 'race' doesn't indicate a vertical distribution of clones, but rather a normal distribution.

I will agree, however, that there is still some reproductive worth even to the seemingly lower performing, as their reason for lower performance can be simply due to gene amplification and silencing, meaning they can still bear high performing progeny when the chromosomal combination almost assuredly happens differently.

But, it's also possible there are just poor alleles which should not be multiplied indiscriminately.&gt;We're not just dealing with race, NRx, Doolittle, and other topics, but with the very survival of AnCap itself.

I'm glad someone else realizes exactly what I'm doing; this isn't about griefing.

&gt;As I've shown before, traffic to our websites is collapsing. Vanilla AnCap is close to irrelevance, and they'll need to evolve if they don't want their ideological inheritance to die with Rand Paul's campaign.

Indeed and very well-said.  What would otherwise happen is they collapse into an obscure Bitcoin subculture, and to some extent they already have.

Thank God we found a way to reconnect with the arc of history.  Now, we're in a much better place to evaluate what works and what doesn't, purging anti-social liabilities as a consequence.

It was borderline criminal that we were separated from the Anglo-Saxon tradition for this voluntaryist parasitism.I was referring to an economic division of labor, whose equilibrium of course will fluctuate.This is the last volley that can be cast my way\u2014presume I'm typing from a basement and that it takes sooo long to counter many of your guys' comments.

When I know this is what I'm reducing the voluntaryists to, I know I'm winning.&gt;No the early 20th century US.

So, then not without white intervention.As I said in the original comment: C, D.You think ethnocentrism is equal among ethnicities?By this approach, 'the market' has no grounding in actual reality either.Because [the libertarianism that actually existed wasn't based on voluntaryism, but high trust.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/)&gt;Costs are internalized. People pay for bad beliefs.

It sounds like you're saying what's rational is what's predictive, but this only describes valuation of means, not ends.

&gt;If mere genetics were the ultimate determination of institutions, we would not see such stark differences between North and South Korea

N. and S. Korea are quite clearly the result of a proxy war by two much larger powers, similarly with W. and E. Germany.

I don't know how you can with a straight face claim these different states spontaneously formed.

&gt; it's also clear how enormous a benefit it can be (which you have admitted)

Ah, but the implication then is a great opportunity cost.&gt;In fact, that was my point: institutions matter, not merely genetics.

You're claiming the N. and S. Koreans had identical subpopulation breeding patterns post-Korean war?

Moreover, continual engagement with the West helps keep Japan, Hong Kong, Singapore, and South Korea on the classically liberal path, which they very well may not be on without us.

&gt;it's basis is clearly weak given the counter-evidence

What is the counter-evidence?  Northern Europeans have brought classical republics everywhere they've gone.

&gt;Implication?

If there's a great benefit to getting politics right, then there's a great loss in not.&gt;They stalk about in our midst as living reproaches, as warnings to us\u2014as though health, fitness, strength, pride, the sensation of power, were really vicious things in themselves, for which one would have some day to do penance, bitter penance.

&gt;Oh, how they themselves are ready in their hearts to exact penance, how they thirst after being hangmen!

&gt;Among them is an abundance of revengeful ones disguised as judges, who ever mouth the word righteousness like a venomous spittle\u2014with mouth, I say, always pursed, always ready to spit at everything, which does not wear a discontented look, but is of good cheer as it goes on its way.&gt;Just critiquing your word choice.

Why should I care that I'm relying on subjective preference?&gt;The only significant difference after the war were the institutions in play. This is as close to a controlled experiment as we can get, and it turns out institutions do matter. A lot.

External imposition can obviously matter; Hong Kong is another example.

The question is what governs that inertia after the external influence has reduced its intervention.

&gt;you are claiming that institutions are entirely based off of the genetic composition of the populace

Obviously, what's implied is that the populace is able to practice their evo strat without an even stronger force suppressing it.

&gt;If cultural homogeneity was really that crucial to libertarianism

You're taking a few leaps, going from one to the other: homogeneity concerns social capital, which deals with a society's ability to cohere and construct commons.  Libertarianism has more specific requirements, requirements which cannot be achieved if there isn't sufficient social capital, but requirements that will not automatically be fulfilled if social capital is present.

&gt;we would expect the EU to be significantly more libertarian than the US. If anything, the opposite is True.

Northern Europe is indeed relatively free and approximately equal to the US' economic freedom index.

What's more, government intervention is greater where social capital is lower.

&gt;But there is also an opportunity cost in not importing labor, and having all of those workers in places where their product is relatively low.

It's all relative, and as I said political enfranchisment is a separate phenomenon.Modern secular-humanism is just a continuation of humanist Christianity.Is one just as incidentally a Democrat or Republican as one is a Rothbardian?NAP worship and social atomism are not accidentally linked.

Ancaps can say he failed to practice his beliefs, but that many ancaps are quirky introverts makes this an issue worth addressing.

If a person, even an 'ancap', becomes socially estranged and miserable enough, they will give up the behavioral restrictions and lash out, which is exactly what happened here.Thanks, doctor.This guy appears a suffering introvert.

The reactionaries here are the few not asocial members; understanding anything beyond the economics of the individual is an example of _pro_-sociality, not anti-.Nothing but the hardest-hitting news, brought to you by Anenome.Do you have data on this for every location where blacks score poorly?Gun control or their easy access is not as predictive a variable for gun homicide as race is.But, also one of great poverty.&gt;There wasn't ever really any period of competition between rights enforcement agencies.

Viable competitors don't need a period of 'fair competition'; if the economics are there, the economics are there.

&gt;Governments will use violence to prevent competing Rights Enforcement Agencies from taking root.

David Friedman doesn't find it theoretically impossible a PDA tries to do the same, and on a certain level PDAs will always conflict in principles and views and try to crowd each other out.

&gt;Governments also assume consent on the basis of mere geography or lineage, which a proper rights-enforcement agency wouldn't do.

So, your PDAs have a limited conception of property?Self-referential appeals have no basis in a rigorous conception of anarcho-capitalism.

This is why the consequentialist branch sucked up what brains existed.The same thing: white nationalism in particular (which probably needs to be said on this forum is only a sliver subset of "NRx") has undergone three waves, starting with the neo-Nazis, then David Duke / Pat Buchanan, now Jared Taylor / Richard Spencer, each stage becoming less anti-social.

This third phase is more what you see on this forum and where libertarianism is intersecting it, scooping up many 20- and 30-somethings, as the future of the American Right.

Though WN has undergone various phases (and as I've said, I'm not a WN in principle, but a meritocrat), the previous phases are still alive, just not holding the intellectual momentum (e.g. outright neo-Nazis still exist, but are nothing but an obscure, degenerate subculture for anti-social punks, contrasted with the burgeoning AmRen/NPI version of WN, which is much more Anglo-Saxon, peaceful, polite, well-to-do, middle-class, and educated.).

But, what this means is it's entirely possible someone who counts among the alt-right becomes lost in a world that isn't anything like they want it to be, coupled with social isolation and misery, and criminally acts out, in which case I would say the same thing; many of these utopian ideologies harbor anti-social versions, some more than others.

For example, if someone _seriously_ fantasizes about monarchy and extreme sociotechnological regression, it's entirely possible there's something quirky about them and potentially set off over time.  Myself and those around me, however, have a much more grounded philosophy, because it taps into the entire Western historical arc and does not seek a technological regression, but continued technological progress, only re-couched in important traditions.

Nature will do that re-couching one way or the other, of that I'm certain, but perhaps we can pro-actively move in that direction; certainly at least when such a move occurs, we'll be able to make sense of what's going on and why, and be able to react to it in our personal lives and for those about whom we care.Then, how could ethnocentric minorities not be exploiting a meritocracy with poor detection and enforcement methods?&gt;the relationship between reactionary ideologies and anarcho-capitalism

Are you yet familiar with Curt Doolittle's version of libertarianism and [critique of ancap](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/)?

The "link between ancap and reaction" is more that the ancap movement hijacked the Anglo-Saxon, high trust tradition, and many of us are returning to and re-establishing those roots.

That libertarianism and social conservatism should be linked has to do with fundamental sociological matters, where the aristocratic class creates the foundation for markets and then conserves them.

In this way, I regard it as a measure of intelligence and emotional maturity whether a libertarian has conservative or liberal social views, as the latter erodes his system posthaste, making him either stupid or emotionally adolescent\u2014or both.&gt;I think you're unnecessarily vulgar about these sorts of things

It's just always been my style\u2014ask the people who knew the ex_logica days\u2014and while a part of me imagines there might be some marginal value in being a little more empathetic, I realize my personality isn't going to realistically change by now.

I come from a very cold genetic background, a family of reflexive debaters and unfeeling interrogators.  That genetic profile certainly equipped me to go logical marathons most can't, but obviously it doesn't make for the most romantic of evenings.  (\uffe3 \u00b3\uffe3)

For a time, a few women thought I might be autistic, but I didn't even register on the spectrum at all, leading me to consider myself a psychopath or borderline, but to no avail there either.

As self-serving as it may be to say it, I think when your IQ is 3+ standard deviations away from some people, it's nearly impossible to care to want to relate to them; you start to look at them as livestock or even furniture.

&gt;I still think secular Jewish people are an extreme net benefit for the United States.

I have secular Jew friends whom I do not hate, but value greatly.  A couple of the professors in my advanced science classes were Ashkenazi.  If anything, I at least thoroughly enjoy their humor.  Rape is the single greatest dispossession of female societal power, as the greatest female resource is giving access to sex.

Thus, when a woman is greatly incensed, that's her go-to ultimate slur.  Moreover, precisely because sexual matters are a woman's channel of power, she will not only create a bulwark against rape, but try to push her power from there, shaming any amount of privatized gain (e.g. ogling).

&gt;I know that many early anthropologists and sociologists like Margaret Mead thought that they had discovered cultures without rape due to their lack of "alienation" or some shit.

All examined societies have been patriarchal.  A choice few have been matrilineal, but still were patriarchal, and even these are rare: the common is both patrilineage and patriarchy, given the evolutionary history of hominids, which are dominated by so-called 'Demonic Males'.

Even the kinder bonobos still have patriarchal tendencies, and boy if the Chimpanzees aren't ultimate shitlords.&gt;We are simply closer in time to real historical circumstances where rape was held to be legally and morally justifiable

This is presuming a linear historical arc over this, which does not exist.  Significant shaming of rape is mostly a Western phenomenon, what's more, even today.

&gt;The worry is that western society overlooks some deficiency in its notion(s) of consent in a particular circumstance.

The abolition of marriage, which many feminists wanted, accomplished that well enough.

&gt;the widespread social acceptance of sexual violence

What evidence do you have for that?

&gt;black Americans over the last two centuries were likely more concerned with the social justifications of lynchings than rape

Are you aware that more Afrikaner farmers have been murdered since the end of Apartheid than all the blacks that were ever lynched in the South?

And that's assuming they weren't lynched for an actual violent crime, which we know blacks are genetically predisposed to at much higher rates, meaning probably some of those lynchings were indeed of a murderous rapist.It's [_NITCH!_](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MDEIuvxhvKI)_Grandma's kisses._&gt;Not sure why you're downvoted.

Should be pretty obvious: I didn't write a comment that was as emotionally protective as was needed.

&gt;That link and the personalities attracted to this philosophy aren't fundamentally bad, but they can lead to bad consequences.

Sure, many of the past mass murderers may have actually been tremendous heroes under different circumstances (consider how the willingness to be terrible can also lead to the willingness for the truly heroic\u2014both require some near-psychopathic lack of fear of death and danger); it's a testament to how difficult social problems can be, and how important it is to fix them.

Simmel was right about who the Individual is to Society, and how tortuous his task is.

&gt;Ancaps should make more of an effort to reach out to each other to form bonds that can supplement those who have few.

Well, as much as these holier-than-thou types may want to spit on a deviant apostate like me, I've done that much more than most here, acting as a father to many wayward souls and kindred spirits, and I did it for years before I was an ancap, too.

It's a cheap punch to throw that I'm the anti-social asshole, when I've been more of a patriarch to growing men, to talented, but estranged men throughout my entire life than probably anyone here.

&gt;They have everything from Neo-Nazi fascists (Golden Dawn, Jobbik, Pravy Sektor)

Those are Eastern and Southern European nationalist groups, groups which are much more ethnocentric and much less meritocratic than Western Europe and the US.

By all means, I wouldn't raise a finger to these men, in defending their homelands and way of life from those right on their doorsteps, but let's not compare apples to oranges here either.

&gt;Our job is going to be to tame the ENR and lead them

Well, the US shouldn't subjugate Europe, but diplomatically negotiate, respecting the uninfringible right to their local needs and interests.  They obviously face much more existentially serious threats than we do over here.

&gt;We need to educate them, disenfranchise them, achieve parallel victories, and bleed them of their talent, because you and I both know the future is not in fascist punks.

Sure, and that's psychological territory I have a talent in, spending most my life the captain in contact sports with meatheads; I'd go out to parties with them, understand their minds, their needs, and incidentally get them deathly loyal to me, not that I was trying to manipulate them: it was just the natural order, to whose existence anyone in high level sports or the military can testify.

The complication, though, is that that's only a factor in Europe: the American neo-Nazis have laughably no clout in the first place, precisely because we are such an Anglo-heavy country, and hence hyperindividualist.

&gt;we play hard ball

No, not necessary.  I've never met a meathead I couldn't eventually bring my way, and once more I have never manipulated a single one of them: I come from their same psychological background, which is how I was never found as a fake, because I never was one.As far as I can understand it women individually are K and men individually r, but when you factor in society, women revert to r, because they have a social shaming apparatus capable of exporting the costs of raising children on to society.

I think how this might be made sense of is thus: almost all women take care of their children regardless, and when they have the opportunity to export costs on to society, they take every chance to.

This has the next effect of an r strategy.

Now, take the male r strategy of spread his seed.  Well, if he's not even there to shame society through an evolutionary construct to take care of his kids because "it's right," then the ultimate effect is a much more eugenically stressed path, rather than one where society must save every last little tadpole.

Some might think men breed in r strat, which probably is right, but men do not _raise_ in r straight, but rather k strat; whereas women do the exact opposite: breed K, but raise r.My view of the matter in a nut(sack):

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ltO8_FJbRUwSignal received!&gt;the fucking moon

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oZGSuzCKbko&gt;What is optimal is what best serves the consumers.

Are you not an Austrian?  What's more, there are financially successful coops; my favorite beer is made by one.&gt;I've heard anarcho-capitalists say that the 1920s and the 1930s were the most free

Which ancap ever said this?  I could see them saying the early 1800s, but not the '20s and '30s, which even in the US took place beside the Fed and the tremendous credit expansion and collapse.Tax resistance without replacing state services is doomed to fail: people will look at you as hurting the commons, and in a way, you are.The joke's on the leftists who get their history through fiction and need it that way.&gt;nothing says "I'm an enlightened philosopher of individualist ideology" quite like pigeonholing people into stereotypes of race and demographic

Nothing says, "I'm a rational, scientific mind," like belief in the tabula rasa.&gt;'I intend to find out so leave me be'

This is the voluntaryist approach to governance, which reality and history has shown to not be adequate, due to both negative and positive social externalities, which make people willing to overturn voluntaryism for higher utility.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/"Leave me be, bro" isn't an imperative, bro.Thank you for bringing this to my attention.Not in her identity as 'woman', no.

An individual we in parallel call a woman can be heroic, but not as part of her identity as 'woman'.I'm not sure which orifice is flowing more: your eyes or your anus.lol ohf cowse dewd brehAnd yet that's what many libertarians think: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3p4oas/serious_question_what_is_the_difference_between/Mutualists' arguments tend to be that it wouldn't be in the self-interest of most people to alienate their own labor, by separating themselves from the means of production.

Of course, there are ways of taking down mutualists, still (diversity of time preferences, over whose existence they stomp their feet).It depends on what you mean by creative.  I think a number of issues are going on at once: 

* It's True that creative individuals are suspect of centralizing capitalism, as they should be, but

* It's also True many (though not all) so-called "creative types" are just making a crappy product few appreciate, giving them a base, ignoble interest in undermining freedom of choice.

With these two dynamics going on at once, there's a strong reason for non-business, non-STEM minds and vocations to be suspect of if not outright hostile toward capitalism.

Boy, if that introducing speaker isn't facile as he is obnoxious.

Edit: Pretty good way of upending hyperindividualism\u2014putting it in terms of its game theory rule violation and failure.Old perm man does.It means you will never get to be the woman you want\u2014sorry.&gt;what's the point?

It's mainly meant to disarm people who think that something is going awry because the races aren't performing equally in the aggregate.The State couldn't do that by itself.I like Curt's definition: 

&gt;COMMONS \u2013 Originally, meaning Land or resources belonging to or affecting the whole of a community. More articulately: any form of property to which members of a group share an interests, but where that interest is obtained by an unspecified membership in the group rather than by explicit possession of title.

&gt;I use this term to refer to both physical property and normative commons. The problem with commons is that without shares, even un-tradable shares, the ownership of the commons cannot be protected from confiscation by various means including immigration, or political confiscation.When one understands that a diasporic evolutionary strategy doesn't involve standing one's ground, but continuing in migration, then one understands why so many of these Jewish philosophers were mere critical theorists and pseudoscientists, nothing positive or scientific or that which opens itself to honest reciprocity and falsification.

These latter traits are much more common to the West, because of its different, much higher trust evolutionary history.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FMlGFGaN-6s

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-FyMrWbkL7Q&gt;political position

I was confused as to why [this](http://i.imgur.com/09zRVQG.jpg) wasn't a choice.Almost like they're stoking a conflict, but I doubt the ones doing it will enjoy the ultimate results.Actually, the standard deviations are not equal and Jewish representation in academia, business, and media are orders of magnitude greater than the projected numbers for that IQ territory, suggesting deep nepotism.

What's more, Jews do not have a high IQ for every kind of intelligence, most notably spatial reasoning (only 95, not even above 100; their talent is almost exclusively verbal).It depends on the mechanism of enforcing tit-for-tat: Northern Europeans' current methods are very, very suboptimal.

Hence, the creation of operational testimony as the answer.Hence, why Jews are in Europeans' lands and not the reverse: meritorious institutions came out on top, while they are riding the coat-tails of this built-up high trust, as the only way they ever got to experience these levels of capital accumulation (the Levant is very poor precisely because of low trust ethnocentrism).

Jews were very poor prior to European integration and even today still seek continual Western aid to Israel.Mere voluntaryism is not the basis of a high trust and therefore economically rich society.

If you outlaw retaliation toward reviled behavior but which does not violate the minimal NAP (lying by omission, abuse of information asymmetry), what you'll get is a very distrusting society, in fact not really a society as such, but a combination of subsocieties which do not trust one another, a ghetto, where the subsocieties that _do_ trust one another enforcing supra-NAP restrictions.

This fracturing leads to decreased economic velocity relative to an outbred, meritorious, trusting one, which has integrated the subsocieties into a scaled up, faster, richer economy.

Northern Europe beat the Levant precisely because it conquered and united the divisions.Inbreeding happens unconsciously due to geographic isolation and consciously only ever due to ethnocentrism (though this should be more precisely defined: it's general ethnocentrism in very numerically small populations and more accurately class/family-centrism in numerically large populations).A democratic solution?  I thought ancaps understood equal influence = regression to the lowest denominator?

Is not inequality of influence precisely what makes markets successful?Reddit's comment threading really is superb at organizing discussion.

For that, I would think the best use of this platform would be discussion; that really has been the only life and community this subreddit has ever had.

One can get newspam from platforms with inferior comment threading (FB, blogs, news sites, etc.)./u/capitalistchemist proposed [something like this for the weekends.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3ltpx9/an_experiment/)Ironically, that's all most ancaps ever do in merely complaining about the State.

Religiously chanting, "NAP! NAP! NAP!" isn't going to get you anywhere closer; put on your public choice boots.I've been here for quite a while and took part in the "good ol' days," where what was debated was moral realism vs. moral nihilism and deontological rhetoric vs. consequentialist rhetoric.

Many of the now prominent moral nihilists and economic consequentialists I turned so.  I say all of this to confirm I know what has changed here and there in the past five years, and nothing bad has come due to reactionary activity; reactionary activity is 90% of what sophisticated discussion does take place.

Now, if you don't like that and find their points easy to destroy, then do it and lead to an even more sophisticated environment.Who did I drive away?  There are no sophisticated anti-reactionaries here and there never were any (indeed, the 20 or so sophisticated minds I know who post here less are full-on shitlords today).

At best, we have a handful of sophisticated non-reactionaries, but who understand there is compelling evidence for perennial traditions.&gt;if the NRx's are driving most people away, where is the new ancap forum with good discussions? Molyneux? Liberty.me?

The basic bitch ancaps who don't yet understand anything but the economics of the individual, not of society, probably just echo it on gaming channels, a fitting fantasy for their social atomism.

There is no forum where sophisticated anti-reactionary ancap discussion takes place, because no such combination is possible.  That almost every neoreactionary is a former ancap who went on to read more and understand more about society speaks to why that movement toward sophistication takes you out of ancap.

Now, it is also True that it's possible that intellectual progression causes a minority of 'ancaps' to move into left-anarchism, because they gradually see they're forced to choose between shitlordism or why they were ever an 'ancap' in the first place: anti-social hierarchy.

Among the new faces, you can see where a person is likely going to end up, based on what of the ancap canon they stress and favor and how they present the system: the voluntaryists are where the leftists might ever come, where they do, and the economic consequentialists are almost exclusively where the shitlords come from.Nice rationalwiki source.  Might as well cite _The Onion_.Less frequent meaningful discussions, but the ones that do take place are more advanced than they were before.

Before, moral nihilism and moral realism were the major debating points.  Today, that fight is largely over, with moral appeals dead and buried as at least a rhetorical device.

However, while those fights were brewing, ancap was still very divorced from reality, whereas today we are having much better discussions at understanding public choice and the history of _actually existing libertarianism_.At this stage in our debates, we should make a poll on race realism / HBD; the questions could be: 

&gt;"Is race a useful term and heuristic?"

* No, race does not biologically exist and/or is merely a divisive political tool.

* No, evaluate the metric you actually care about (intelligence, crime, political views, etc.).

* At least somewhat, as social capital makes race matter even with meritorious naturalization.

* Yes, race is the most predictive criterion and social capital matters so much it should ultimately trump meritocracy, i.e. we should have a racialist nation and only a meritocracy from there.

&gt;"Are many of the claims by race realists and HBDers accurate?"

* No, studies have not been adequate or even point the other way.

* Yes, but largely academic, as meritocracy should still be the rule of the day, irrespective of "social capital," i.e. the individual shall always be sovereign and his rights not infringed for the sake of social externality arguments.

* Yes, and with political consequences, due to social capital; meritocracy should not be the final principle, but perpetuation of a race.

* Yes, but meritocracy can and should still be the rule of the day, as a meritocracy would still result in very high levels of social capital (i.e. still be mostly European).

Any other questions (or worthy amendments to the above two) would be welcome.

(And for anyone curious or misinformed, my views warrant the third answer to the first question and the final answer to the second question.)

Edit: Eh, I'll just make a thread for this, ennumerate the answers, and tally them.It seems many Europeans are against the immigration, just that there's tremendous control of what's allowed to be said of the issue, either by law or by moral shaming.

My guess is that the various states will just keep pushing it to the social breaking point, and with socially repressed people, the counter-force tends to be potent.The movement toward marxism over black nationalism can be interpreted as a subordination of blacks to Jews, in the revolt against the West.

The last thing that is wanted of the most intelligent of the minorities is a peaceful, separated pluralism, rather than a violent attrition of the majority, using the fodder first.&gt;I think it's a historical fact that the black community and families were much better off prior to white intervention. 

Are you referring to pre-colonial Africa?Rothbard was more just wanting to engender _any_ kind of decentralism.The Ashkenazi are not really that Middle Eastern in the first place.

The ones with genetics more of that area are far less intelligent.&gt;Money makes you dumb

Is this really the rhetoric an ancap wants to use?&gt; Each player punishes each defection individually discouraging defection.

Your sentence's meaning is ambiguous: Are punishments made isolated individual to individual or collective to individual?&gt;you're labelling huge swathes of people as "you're black so you're dumb" or "you're nordic so you're better"

I don't know of anyone here who literally believes that.  That said, this should be compelling information to digest, given that most ancaps are white.  You now know why (I more mean the cultural history of high trust than just intelligence here, though; the Chinese aren't unintelligent, but are largely anti-libertarian).Show me one.  What's more, one of the best HBDers out there is Jamaican.I don't have anything against Ashkenazi practicing the Western evo strat.

This, as a rule, exists whenever they practice the natural sciences, which demands operational testimony via thorough journal documentation and peer-review.

The problem enters in, however, when Ashkenazi enter fields not as easily operationalized, like social science (Freud, Boas, Frankfurt School).And the subsequent destitute poverty.I was more just linking to a comment, rather than retyping all of it.

humanispherian&gt;So the argument is that those who specialize in construction and building factories would then chose to work the factory themselves; instead of moving on and constructing more factories in other places?

Well, that specialization of labor is the result of a diversity of time preferences, which many market socialists seem to think is only the artificial result of state policies.

They think that most capital would be decentrally owned in a stateless system.

On one level, they're right that capitalism and the modern centralized state exist in parallel not accidentally, but they're fooling themselves if they think the modern state came into being by some anti-economical accident.&gt;not a serious argument; statement of exasperation

And you'd be right that this is all you post.Hmm, might that then be the cause for the non-correspondence of this test with reality?

In reality, the build-up of high trust is extremely expensive (defection has to be almost universally punished before it becomes profitable to invest/trust, making this individual to individual method unrealistic).

And the mechanisms of this build-up are not perfect, but rely on clunky social, moral, and cultural mechanisms.  Due to this, I can see it being possible for years, decades, or even a century to go by, with institutions that took a thousand years to build being exploited.

That's essentially what we've witnessed in European history, with more than a few incidents where low trust rule-breakers were expelled (Jews and gypsies have been banished from countries something like 80-100 times).

We seem to be undergoing another cycle of this, but on a greater scale and involving more ethnocentric minorities.&gt;when in fact it's largely inherent to the genre

You choose to post 'news'.If states have that much power, how do they ever collapse?

If they have that much power, why do economies buck government control?D to the first question seems to necessitate C to the second question.&gt;"Social Capital" is unquantifiable.

Couldn't we get some sense of its scale, however, in examining the capital stock and economic velocity of various locations?Elites have been overturned before, yes.

Anyways, to address your question, the SJWs have zero martial clout; they are going nowhere and mean nothing.

The real fight is between the State and the Nation, i.e. anti-Nation social parasite state actors vs. meritocrats and nationalists.It'd be more efficient to link me to the papers that deal with the political economics, not the economics where the politics stays the same or becomes even more pro-market\u2014I obviously understand economic theory plenty fine to realize this latter would result in a major improvement.&gt;For Q2: Show me the genes that back up your claims

Two things: 

* We [have associated some SNPs with intelligence](http://www.eupedia.com/genetics/psychological_traits_snp.shtml).

* Needing to know the direct mechanism is not a practical ground for objection in many areas of science; knowing that a bundle of traits rigorously follow a pattern is enough for some action to take place.

  If we required an extremely rigorous standard for everything, many life-saving medicines, for example, would not be prescribed, medicines whose successful function we still don't fully understand at present, same with many chemical reactions, whose mechanism we still don't fully understand, but whose products keep following a rigorous pattern.

&gt;I don't even think merit should trump the rights of the individual.

Well, if you believe in a free market, then you do believe in merit guiding the level of influence a given individual has in directing capital.

&gt;This is all irrelevant, the age of AI is coming. I just hope they just don't treat us the way you all treat black people, as we will certainly be dumber than them.

Europeans improved blacks.  I see no reason not wanting AI to do the same with us, and in truth, it's more probable that we will integrate them into us, not create separate entities.Where the politics either remains the same or becomes even more libertarian.

Unfortunately, that doesn't seem to be the result, examining sociobiology and observing history.The benefit with this is that I can associate answers with the accounts that gave them and also bypass people taking the survey multiple times via some workaround.

With regard to this not being a closed ballot, I don't quite mind, as I think people should learn to stand on their own two feet.  Taking place in public also makes people more accountable to a coherent worldview, and it's fine if someone wants to say their views have changed since then, too.&gt;What if the benefits gained from worse politics are small compared to the benefits of increased labor mobility? 

If that were True, a country's size would be a greater predictor of its economic wealth than its political views, but of course, it isn't, as Japan, Hong Kong, Singapore, Britain, etc. etc. have shown to India and China.

Social trust can result in widely different wealth levels even where IQ is similar (see Japan and the West contra China and Russia).I'm not sure Cialis was ever a supporter of any particular race as the best; he's also a product of multiple continental races, if I remember correctly.

The issue of Western Europeans and East Asians is an interesting demonstration that IQ is not everything, but that behavior and cultural history in shaping behavioral genes matter just as much if not more.

Finally, Cialis is a meritocrat like me, which means we don't favor racial bans, but meritorious naturalization (just with the understanding that 50-90% of minorities couldn't pass the merit test, banning some Europeans, too).&gt;Being part of a hypocritical superior race would, by default, be part of having greater merit.

What is a 'hypocritical superior race', and why would identifying with it necessitate merit?

&gt;if you understand race is merit

You're saying phenotypic identification always correlates to superior performance in some way?&gt;Labor mobility not the simply the size of the labor force.

Nations of larger size, where geography is not too immobilizing (I admit it may be in certain mountainous areas), will enjoy this larger mobility (after all, it's the national _boundaries_ you guys are focusing on here).

Surely, you can see how mobility eventually doesn't mean that much, when intelligence drops enough and political views are sufficiently illiberal, and I can see how it helps coordinate more efficiently where the politics is libertarian.I think I did on one of my playthroughs way back when.

I was sympathetic to the Roman-inspired Imperials, too, however\u2014I find both the Vikings and the Romans as great civilizations, culturally and militarily.

The one problem with the Imperials is I recall they were being undermined by anti-human elves, and that was the deciding factor for me choosing the Stormcloaks.  I don't know that much about the Elder Scrolls lore, though.Given how much blacks weigh down US statistics (crime, income, assets, educational attainment, intelligence, etc.), it'd be beneficial in factoring them out when comparing US governance to Sweden governance.

For example, when black crime rate is taken out of the picture, the US is as safe as Norway.Not how what works?Ah, yes, E7ernal, ever the revolutionary in thought here.In 2009, &lt; 0.005% of Swedish citizens were of African origin, including either place of birth or actual ethnicity (and most of these are ethnic Swedes whose parents happened to be in Africa during the birthing).&gt; As I said, meritocratic or isolationistic solutions are, at best, temporary.

How is a meritocracy ever only a temporary solution and not the one that should be continually adopted?

&gt;The US had strict voting standards at it's outset (white male landowner), and that didn't even last 150 years. Borders usually don't even last that long. The Berlin wall held for what? 30 years?

Why is this a reason to not put forward positives as they should occur and defend them where possible?

&gt;comparative advantage also leads me to think that even low-skilled labor is valuable. So I'm not comfortable simply dismissing it.

Who's dismissing international trade here?  Indeed, the instance of international trade, as opposed to intranational trade, is precisely where further cooperation isn't yet possible, but limited economic cooperation is.

If political integration occurs prematurely, then you end up with a circumstance _less_ productive than separation, but with international trade.One can obviously get some sense of the power of social capital, by contrasting Western Europe with Eastern Europe.I would answer it in passing, but there is of course the added benefit of clarifying my position to those still not in the know.&gt; Eventually, people's opinions can/will change, and so will the support for the meritocratic policy. As I said, restrictive voting didn't last, it was never going to last.

Do you see this as the result of the r/K cycle or some other mechanism?

I think one way the r/K cycle can plausibly be gotten over is via paying off the underclasses to not breed.

&gt;Encouraging rationality

What meaningful manifestation does that even have, outside perceived value?

&gt;You are dismissing international trade in labor.

I don't dismiss international trade in labor where it doesn't change the politics.&gt;If I recall you support some sort of minarchist aristocracy.

Well, taxation is not ideal, but I'm not categorically opposed to it either.

As far as deportation and defense, it's what you'd expect.  If a more exotic solution presented itself as more efficient, then fine there, too.&gt; The costs of such eugenic guesswork are relatively unknown though.

Given that population size seems relatively much less important to economic wealth than political and moral views and intelligence, I feel confident encouraging of eugenics and discouraging of dysgenics is the way to go, even if it depressed population growth on net.

Looking at modern dysgenics in the West, via welfare-insulated breeding and poor immigration, and the resultant change in politics and economies, the evidence appears to support me.

&gt;The market itself is a mechanism of encouraging rationality.

How, outside of mere pursuit of perceived value?

&gt;But your view is that it does change politics.

It conceivably couldn't via disbarring of citizenship and potentially even limiting cultural contact.

&gt;Bad politics are just another cost

And it's quite clear just how enormous a cost it can be: it can be the difference between being the richest country, to being the poorest, to being an extinct subpopulation.&gt; an individualist ideology is a part of what the mostly European meritocratic marketplace created

Indeed, hence the present difficulties, but [as I argued here](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3iaxks/on_white_nationalismor_why_wn_should_not_be/), the solution isn't to give up on the Western evo strat, but to further entrench it, to demand operational testimony to an even more rigorous degree, which will ferret out the ethnocentric liars while simultaneously keeping the increased productivity that comes from having a meritocracy.Yeah, I didn't crawl out of the womb able to talk about, for example,  the theory-laden nature of science, and there certainly was a time where I thought it was only due to historical treatment (particularly the past half century) that blacks were in the state they were in.  They call it the red pill for a reason, eh?Good summary.  Now that I see it put that way, that immediately makes me think of the gradual Christening of Scandinavia, a real shame, given how debilitating and emasculating the religion.

Of course, a strong people aren't conquered by a weaker mind virus without having first lost strength.You're referring to pathological altruism?  My present theory is that's derived from the hunter-gatherer genetic influence, not something at the core of the Western way of life, which is more derived from the Indo-Europeans, not the communistic hunter-gatherer Proto-Europeans.

I have heard other theories, however, where pathological altruism is more a misplaced outlet for heroic displays, which if True would not neatly divorce itself from the IEs, a people whose existence was always concerned with heroism.

In the first case, the solution is to bias toward breeding out that wimpish communist suicidalism, in the second case, a more conscious understanding of what's heroic and what actually isn't, but good luck getting many dumb and naive people to do that, hence a general stress on eugenic breeding and in either event.

Edit: I suppose it sounds like I'm offering only biologically based intelligence as the solution, when individual biologically based intelligence doesn't seem to be at the heart of the West's economic success as much as the social institutions Western Europeans were behavorially tempered into having, so thus the probable need for an institutional change.

Well, maybe Curt's more explicit operational testimony is that, but I don't see how that isn't what the IEs were categorically already doing, only potentially differing in degree of sophistication (intelligence).Yes, it sounds like you're just saying what many of us have said about Northern Europe.

There enters a problem, however, with your model in witnessing quite clearly the US being abused by ethnocentric minorities.&gt;most bums would not enjoy living there

Yeah, my existence isn't for them; I desire a system which gradually purges genetic mistakes, while rewarding genetic successes.  These measures do not have to be extreme or even violent, but should be there.

Were I forced to treat everyone reproductively identically, then I'd gradually favor the r strategy, which tends to be low quality offspring.

Edit: Now, of course, it's theoretically possible that some r-K combination is the theoretical optimum at any given point in time and I'm fine with that, so long as a hierarchy in human worth is observed and respected.Well, one theory is that Anglos simply went too far in whittling down the family to the ANF, and then on to feminism, and then on to single motherhood\u2014that we should let this subpopulation or a chunk of it push itself out of sustainable existence.

That could be one solution, and to be honest, I have a very hard time seeing how the hyperindividualist Anglos can be saved.  They were always a people too isolated for their own good; in an internal cultural miracle, they ended up conquering the world, but didn't know how to run it.

It's like it was a radical mistiming, where a high trust culture was built-up over thousands of years and then was in the span of a couple hundred years fast-forwarded into interfacing with low trust cultures it wasn't adapted to.

So, it appears the West is undergoing a process where it is relearning mechanisms of detecting and punishing low trust behavior.  The great danger however is that technology is exponential and created that mistiming; maybe then the solution will also come from technology, especially considering that evolutionary psych happens too slowly for this.It's also possible we've intimidated some, but even more probable that a large chunk simply avoid issues which they know they're not educated on, moving on to cop articles, not this matter.Because tax is theft and police are the devil incarnate never gets old.

Philosophy of History is also a child's topic, I hear.Well, operational testimony is itself inspired by computer science, which is operational mathematics incarnate (execution of code is itself an existence proof).

Thus, it's not inconceivable OT happens through it and ramps up alongside politically transformative compsci.

I don't see what's purely masturbatory about understanding the arc of history and what factors have caused what libertarianism has existed to exist.

It would seem what is purely masturbatory deliberately avoiding a more nuanced understanding of libertarian history, for the feel-good, but anti-social voluntaryism.Even so, 'race' doesn't indicate a vertical distribution of clones, but rather a normal distribution.

I will agree, however, that there is still some reproductive worth even to the seemingly lower performing, as their reason for lower performance can be simply due to gene amplification and silencing, meaning they can still bear high performing progeny when the chromosomal combination almost assuredly happens differently.

But, it's also possible there are just poor alleles which should not be multiplied indiscriminately.&gt;We're not just dealing with race, NRx, Doolittle, and other topics, but with the very survival of AnCap itself.

I'm glad someone else realizes exactly what I'm doing; this isn't about griefing.

&gt;As I've shown before, traffic to our websites is collapsing. Vanilla AnCap is close to irrelevance, and they'll need to evolve if they don't want their ideological inheritance to die with Rand Paul's campaign.

Indeed and very well-said.  What would otherwise happen is they collapse into an obscure Bitcoin subculture, and to some extent they already have.

Thank God we found a way to reconnect with the arc of history.  Now, we're in a much better place to evaluate what works and what doesn't, purging anti-social liabilities as a consequence.

It was borderline criminal that we were separated from the Anglo-Saxon tradition for this voluntaryist parasitism.I was referring to an economic division of labor, whose equilibrium of course will fluctuate.This is the last volley that can be cast my way\u2014presume I'm typing from a basement and that it takes sooo long to counter many of your guys' comments.

When I know this is what I'm reducing the voluntaryists to, I know I'm winning.&gt;No the early 20th century US.

So, then not without white intervention.As I said in the original comment: C, D.You think ethnocentrism is equal among ethnicities?By this approach, 'the market' has no grounding in actual reality either.Because [the libertarianism that actually existed wasn't based on voluntaryism, but high trust.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/)&gt;Costs are internalized. People pay for bad beliefs.

It sounds like you're saying what's rational is what's predictive, but this only describes valuation of means, not ends.

&gt;If mere genetics were the ultimate determination of institutions, we would not see such stark differences between North and South Korea

N. and S. Korea are quite clearly the result of a proxy war by two much larger powers, similarly with W. and E. Germany.

I don't know how you can with a straight face claim these different states spontaneously formed.

&gt; it's also clear how enormous a benefit it can be (which you have admitted)

Ah, but the implication then is a great opportunity cost.&gt;In fact, that was my point: institutions matter, not merely genetics.

You're claiming the N. and S. Koreans had identical subpopulation breeding patterns post-Korean war?

Moreover, continual engagement with the West helps keep Japan, Hong Kong, Singapore, and South Korea on the classically liberal path, which they very well may not be on without us.

&gt;it's basis is clearly weak given the counter-evidence

What is the counter-evidence?  Northern Europeans have brought classical republics everywhere they've gone.

&gt;Implication?

If there's a great benefit to getting politics right, then there's a great loss in not.&gt;They stalk about in our midst as living reproaches, as warnings to us\u2014as though health, fitness, strength, pride, the sensation of power, were really vicious things in themselves, for which one would have some day to do penance, bitter penance.

&gt;Oh, how they themselves are ready in their hearts to exact penance, how they thirst after being hangmen!

&gt;Among them is an abundance of revengeful ones disguised as judges, who ever mouth the word righteousness like a venomous spittle\u2014with mouth, I say, always pursed, always ready to spit at everything, which does not wear a discontented look, but is of good cheer as it goes on its way.&gt;Just critiquing your word choice.

Why should I care that I'm relying on subjective preference?&gt;The only significant difference after the war were the institutions in play. This is as close to a controlled experiment as we can get, and it turns out institutions do matter. A lot.

External imposition can obviously matter; Hong Kong is another example.

The question is what governs that inertia after the external influence has reduced its intervention.

&gt;you are claiming that institutions are entirely based off of the genetic composition of the populace

Obviously, what's implied is that the populace is able to practice their evo strat without an even stronger force suppressing it.

&gt;If cultural homogeneity was really that crucial to libertarianism

You're taking a few leaps, going from one to the other: homogeneity concerns social capital, which deals with a society's ability to cohere and construct commons.  Libertarianism has more specific requirements, requirements which cannot be achieved if there isn't sufficient social capital, but requirements that will not automatically be fulfilled if social capital is present.

&gt;we would expect the EU to be significantly more libertarian than the US. If anything, the opposite is True.

Northern Europe is indeed relatively free and approximately equal to the US' economic freedom index.

What's more, government intervention is greater where social capital is lower.

&gt;But there is also an opportunity cost in not importing labor, and having all of those workers in places where their product is relatively low.

It's all relative, and as I said political enfranchisment is a separate phenomenon.Modern secular-humanism is just a continuation of humanist Christianity.Is one just as incidentally a Democrat or Republican as one is a Rothbardian?NAP worship and social atomism are not accidentally linked.

Ancaps can say he failed to practice his beliefs, but that many ancaps are quirky introverts makes this an issue worth addressing.

If a person, even an 'ancap', becomes socially estranged and miserable enough, they will give up the behavioral restrictions and lash out, which is exactly what happened here.Thanks, doctor.This guy appears a suffering introvert.

The reactionaries here are the few not asocial members; understanding anything beyond the economics of the individual is an example of _pro_-sociality, not anti-.Nothing but the hardest-hitting news, brought to you by Anenome.Do you have data on this for every location where blacks score poorly?Gun control or their easy access is not as predictive a variable for gun homicide as race is.But, also one of great poverty.&gt;There wasn't ever really any period of competition between rights enforcement agencies.

Viable competitors don't need a period of 'fair competition'; if the economics are there, the economics are there.

&gt;Governments will use violence to prevent competing Rights Enforcement Agencies from taking root.

David Friedman doesn't find it theoretically impossible a PDA tries to do the same, and on a certain level PDAs will always conflict in principles and views and try to crowd each other out.

&gt;Governments also assume consent on the basis of mere geography or lineage, which a proper rights-enforcement agency wouldn't do.

So, your PDAs have a limited conception of property?Self-referential appeals have no basis in a rigorous conception of anarcho-capitalism.

This is why the consequentialist branch sucked up what brains existed.The same thing: white nationalism in particular (which probably needs to be said on this forum is only a sliver subset of "NRx") has undergone three waves, starting with the neo-Nazis, then David Duke / Pat Buchanan, now Jared Taylor / Richard Spencer, each stage becoming less anti-social.

This third phase is more what you see on this forum and where libertarianism is intersecting it, scooping up many 20- and 30-somethings, as the future of the American Right.

Though WN has undergone various phases (and as I've said, I'm not a WN in principle, but a meritocrat), the previous phases are still alive, just not holding the intellectual momentum (e.g. outright neo-Nazis still exist, but are nothing but an obscure, degenerate subculture for anti-social punks, contrasted with the burgeoning AmRen/NPI version of WN, which is much more Anglo-Saxon, peaceful, polite, well-to-do, middle-class, and educated.).

But, what this means is it's entirely possible someone who counts among the alt-right becomes lost in a world that isn't anything like they want it to be, coupled with social isolation and misery, and criminally acts out, in which case I would say the same thing; many of these utopian ideologies harbor anti-social versions, some more than others.

For example, if someone _seriously_ fantasizes about monarchy and extreme sociotechnological regression, it's entirely possible there's something quirky about them and potentially set off over time.  Myself and those around me, however, have a much more grounded philosophy, because it taps into the entire Western historical arc and does not seek a technological regression, but continued technological progress, only re-couched in important traditions.

Nature will do that re-couching one way or the other, of that I'm certain, but perhaps we can pro-actively move in that direction; certainly at least when such a move occurs, we'll be able to make sense of what's going on and why, and be able to react to it in our personal lives and for those about whom we care.Then, how could ethnocentric minorities not be exploiting a meritocracy with poor detection and enforcement methods?&gt;the relationship between reactionary ideologies and anarcho-capitalism

Are you yet familiar with Curt Doolittle's version of libertarianism and [critique of ancap](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/)?

The "link between ancap and reaction" is more that the ancap movement hijacked the Anglo-Saxon, high trust tradition, and many of us are returning to and re-establishing those roots.

That libertarianism and social conservatism should be linked has to do with fundamental sociological matters, where the aristocratic class creates the foundation for markets and then conserves them.

In this way, I regard it as a measure of intelligence and emotional maturity whether a libertarian has conservative or liberal social views, as the latter erodes his system posthaste, making him either stupid or emotionally adolescent\u2014or both.&gt;I think you're unnecessarily vulgar about these sorts of things

It's just always been my style\u2014ask the people who knew the ex_logica days\u2014and while a part of me imagines there might be some marginal value in being a little more empathetic, I realize my personality isn't going to realistically change by now.

I come from a very cold genetic background, a family of reflexive debaters and unfeeling interrogators.  That genetic profile certainly equipped me to go logical marathons most can't, but obviously it doesn't make for the most romantic of evenings.  (\uffe3 \u00b3\uffe3)

For a time, a few women thought I might be autistic, but I didn't even register on the spectrum at all, leading me to consider myself a psychopath or borderline, but to no avail there either.

As self-serving as it may be to say it, I think when your IQ is 3+ standard deviations away from some people, it's nearly impossible to care to want to relate to them; you start to look at them as livestock or even furniture.

&gt;I still think secular Jewish people are an extreme net benefit for the United States.

I have secular Jew friends whom I do not hate, but value greatly.  A couple of the professors in my advanced science classes were Ashkenazi.  If anything, I at least thoroughly enjoy their humor.  Rape is the single greatest dispossession of female societal power, as the greatest female resource is giving access to sex.

Thus, when a woman is greatly incensed, that's her go-to ultimate slur.  Moreover, precisely because sexual matters are a woman's channel of power, she will not only create a bulwark against rape, but try to push her power from there, shaming any amount of privatized gain (e.g. ogling).

&gt;I know that many early anthropologists and sociologists like Margaret Mead thought that they had discovered cultures without rape due to their lack of "alienation" or some shit.

All examined societies have been patriarchal.  A choice few have been matrilineal, but still were patriarchal, and even these are rare: the common is both patrilineage and patriarchy, given the evolutionary history of hominids, which are dominated by so-called 'Demonic Males'.

Even the kinder bonobos still have patriarchal tendencies, and boy if the Chimpanzees aren't ultimate shitlords.&gt;We are simply closer in time to real historical circumstances where rape was held to be legally and morally justifiable

This is presuming a linear historical arc over this, which does not exist.  Significant shaming of rape is mostly a Western phenomenon, what's more, even today.

&gt;The worry is that western society overlooks some deficiency in its notion(s) of consent in a particular circumstance.

The abolition of marriage, which many feminists wanted, accomplished that well enough.

&gt;the widespread social acceptance of sexual violence

What evidence do you have for that?

&gt;black Americans over the last two centuries were likely more concerned with the social justifications of lynchings than rape

Are you aware that more Afrikaner farmers have been murdered since the end of Apartheid than all the blacks that were ever lynched in the South?

And that's assuming they weren't lynched for an actual violent crime, which we know blacks are genetically predisposed to at much higher rates, meaning probably some of those lynchings were indeed of a murderous rapist.It's [_NITCH!_](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MDEIuvxhvKI)_Grandma's kisses._&gt;Not sure why you're downvoted.

Should be pretty obvious: I didn't write a comment that was as emotionally protective as was needed.

&gt;That link and the personalities attracted to this philosophy aren't fundamentally bad, but they can lead to bad consequences.

Sure, many of the past mass murderers may have actually been tremendous heroes under different circumstances (consider how the willingness to be terrible can also lead to the willingness for the truly heroic\u2014both require some near-psychopathic lack of fear of death and danger); it's a testament to how difficult social problems can be, and how important it is to fix them.

Simmel was right about who the Individual is to Society, and how tortuous his task is.

&gt;Ancaps should make more of an effort to reach out to each other to form bonds that can supplement those who have few.

Well, as much as these holier-than-thou types may want to spit on a deviant apostate like me, I've done that much more than most here, acting as a father to many wayward souls and kindred spirits, and I did it for years before I was an ancap, too.

It's a cheap punch to throw that I'm the anti-social asshole, when I've been more of a patriarch to growing men, to talented, but estranged men throughout my entire life than probably anyone here.

&gt;They have everything from Neo-Nazi fascists (Golden Dawn, Jobbik, Pravy Sektor)

Those are Eastern and Southern European nationalist groups, groups which are much more ethnocentric and much less meritocratic than Western Europe and the US.

By all means, I wouldn't raise a finger to these men, in defending their homelands and way of life from those right on their doorsteps, but let's not compare apples to oranges here either.

&gt;Our job is going to be to tame the ENR and lead them

Well, the US shouldn't subjugate Europe, but diplomatically negotiate, respecting the uninfringible right to their local needs and interests.  They obviously face much more existentially serious threats than we do over here.

&gt;We need to educate them, disenfranchise them, achieve parallel victories, and bleed them of their talent, because you and I both know the future is not in fascist punks.

Sure, and that's psychological territory I have a talent in, spending most my life the captain in contact sports with meatheads; I'd go out to parties with them, understand their minds, their needs, and incidentally get them deathly loyal to me, not that I was trying to manipulate them: it was just the natural order, to whose existence anyone in high level sports or the military can testify.

The complication, though, is that that's only a factor in Europe: the American neo-Nazis have laughably no clout in the first place, precisely because we are such an Anglo-heavy country, and hence hyperindividualist.

&gt;we play hard ball

No, not necessary.  I've never met a meathead I couldn't eventually bring my way, and once more I have never manipulated a single one of them: I come from their same psychological background, which is how I was never found as a fake, because I never was one.As far as I can understand it women individually are K and men individually r, but when you factor in society, women revert to r, because they have a social shaming apparatus capable of exporting the costs of raising children on to society.

I think how this might be made sense of is thus: almost all women take care of their children regardless, and when they have the opportunity to export costs on to society, they take every chance to.

This has the next effect of an r strategy.

Now, take the male r strategy of spread his seed.  Well, if he's not even there to shame society through an evolutionary construct to take care of his kids because "it's right," then the ultimate effect is a much more eugenically stressed path, rather than one where society must save every last little tadpole.

Some might think men breed in r strat, which probably is right, but men do not _raise_ in r straight, but rather k strat; whereas women do the exact opposite: breed K, but raise r.My view of the matter in a nut(sack):

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ltO8_FJbRUwSignal received!&gt;the fucking moon

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oZGSuzCKbkoI'm speaking on the thousands of years scale: Somalia has always been poor, because of it's low trust law.

It's a prime example why anarcho-capitalism would not be anarcho in any meaningful sense, were it to even exist.

It's not an accident the wealthy libertarianism the world _has_ seen was and needed to be high trust, which required social conservatism, not cosmopolitanism.Your analysis is, once again, too individualistic.  Monogamous institutions don't exist because of ugly women.

Speaking of divisions of labor, it'd be beneficial for ancaps to have a broader understanding of society, rather than just monetized phenomena: 


&gt;The tea party movement relies upon sentimental arguments rather than rational arguments because conservatism lacks a rational social science to compete with marxism.

&gt;While conservatives and libertarians have tried for over a hundred years, they have so far failed to articulate a social science that can compete with the combination of marxist sentiments, democratic secular humanism, and mathematical positivism.

&gt;This is partly due to inter-temporal complexity, and our over-reliance on the analysis of money and redistribution rather than the status economy \u2013 an economy that humans are far more sensitive to than the monetary economy. (Intertemporal complexity is too complicated for here. But in general, conservatism is a longer time preference, that puts greatest emphasis on group persistence \u2013 it is a capitalization strategy for the future.) -- Curt Doolittle

Full article: http://www.propertarianism.com/2010/08/30/the-bipolarity-of-class/

Another important realization from him: 

&gt;\u201cCAPITALISM IS A REBELLION MOVEMENT BY THE MIDDLE CLASS\u201d \u2013 (from capitalism \u2013 concise library of liberty) The emergence of capitalism is often mistakenly linked to a Puritan work ethic. But the same attitudes toward work and savings are exhibited by Jews and Japanese, whose value systems contain no Calvinist component.

&gt;Moreover, Scotland in the seventeenth century was simultaneously orthodox Calvinist and economically stagnant. A better explanation of the Puritans\u2019 diligence is that by refusing to swear allegiance to the established Church of England, they were barred from activities and professions to which they otherwise might have been drawn\u2014landownership, law, the military, civil service, universities\u2014 and so they focused on trade and commerce.

&gt;A similar pattern of exclusion or ostracism explains why Jews and other racial and religious minorities in other countries and later centuries tended to concentrate on retail businesses and money lending.

&gt;Thus, libertarian sentiments in protestants and jews are \u2018landless\u2019 sentiments. The organizing principles needed to hold land are different from (and more costly than) the organizing principles of diasporic minorities./u/chuckberry_Cash your winnings, before it's too late; let the naive libertarians hold the bag.

Edit for your edit: the problem with attempting that extrapolation is that it doesn't take into account the social and cultural circumstances Bitcoin was in back then; today, Bitcoin doesn't have that kind of novelty and steam anymore.

Bitcoin was always just a modestly better gambling device, precisely because it involved liquidating its cultural capital, and that largely has finished.&gt;Pretty much all marxists have read Marx, but I don't personally know of any conservative who has read anything by Burke.

Very well-said.  This sentence certifies that you fully understand the matter (though, it should be said Burke is no Marx; Doolittle will be the conservatives' actual Marx).

At some point, the handful of ancaps like you, on the fence, need to be negotiated with on more reasonable, diplomatic terms, but for the time being, you guys will have to expand your understanding of what the alt-right actually is (conflating us with neo-Nazis is like five dimensions of stupidity), before we can have a more substantive conversation, because we're already post-NRx, while you guys are calling us "NRxers," all the while getting that wrong, too, by conflating it with mere WN.http://i.imgur.com/ltFJw0T.jpgHe doesn't even make eye contact with the black waitress.

He clearly knows her to be beneath him.  What a racist.I want to sometimes, for the hilarious fun, like making cross-eyed faces.&gt; it failed miserably

You mean Hispanic immigration, which has already made left-libertarianism stillborn, too.The ancap movement itself seems to be in a tailspin; it's morbidly amusing the pressure that's put on it, but it had to be this way for an incomplete ideology.Never lose, never choose to.Most of all what people say is, "Me likey."&gt; rather than rely on shifty sociological models such as "social capital"

Who is relying on only social capital, but who also is thinking they can go without it?

&gt;you unfairly assume large costs and small benefits

GDP figures don't testify?&gt;Did you know Doolittle even uses the Jewish definition for "commons"?

All I see in that is that you are using the Jewish definition and then saying Curt meets it.

It wouldn't surprise me for you to do that, too, given that you're behaving exactly as the priesthood who degenerated from the warrior caste did: 

&gt;There is from the outset a certain diseased taint in such **sacerdotal** aristocracies, and in the habits which prevail in such societies\u2014habits which, averse as they are to action, constitute a compound of introspection and explosive emotionalism, as a result of which there appears that introspective morbidity and **neurasthenia** [who does that sound like?], which adheres almost inevitably to all priests at all times.

&gt;With regard, however, to the remedy which they themselves have invented for this disease\u2014the philosopher has no option but to state, that it has proved itself in its effects a hundred times more dangerous than the disease, from which it should have been the deliverer.

--

&gt;The reader will have already surmised with what ease the priestly mode of valuation can branch off from the knightly aristocratic mode, and then develop into the very antithesis of the latter: special impetus is given to this opposition, by every occasion when the castes of the priests and warriors confront each other with mutual jealousy and cannot agree over the prize.

&gt;The knightly-aristocratic values are based on a careful cult of the physical, on a flowering, rich, and even effervescing healthiness, that goes considerably beyond what is necessary for maintaining life, on war, adventure, the chase, the dance, the tourney\u2014on everything, in fact, which is contained in strong, free, and joyous action.

&gt;The priestly-aristocratic mode of valuation is\u2014we have seen\u2014based on other hypotheses: it is bad enough for this class when it is a question of war! Yet the priests are, as is notorious, the worst enemies\u2014why? Because they are the weakest.

&gt;Their weakness causes their hate to expand into a monstrous and sinister shape, a shape which is most crafty and most poisonous. The really great haters in the history of the world have always been priests, who are also the cleverest haters.

And who were the best priests?  The Jews.

In opposing _in toto_ the physical, the real, labor, supply, economy, etc., you have chosen your side with the priests, and once more we know who were the best at this anti-physical game, so it's strange you paint others with that brush.

&gt;What does operationalism have to do with the Truth?

Operationalism is just a means of communication, dissemination of what is disseminated; there is nothing compromised about it.

&gt;this exact same mistake by prioritising the sensual over the True

And there you have it.

&gt;stop talking like this guy is part of the right

Why should I respect a degenerated priest psychology?2007 financial crisis, which also coincided with coming of age and filling out my political views with formal readings.

Feels weird on some levels that it's been almost a decade, but appropriate on other levels."Guy said something I disagree with, come look."This just underscores my point about needing to guard against the erosion of those better institutions.&gt;As an ideology, Anarcho-Capitalism accomplishes everything it set out to accomplish (namely, proposing a society based nonaggression and property rights). Everything else is essentially irrelevant.

Not when that's a faulty starting point.  Here's where I think the ancap movement was a success, and I like the way Curt formulated it here: 

&gt;ANARCHO CAPITALISM (politics)\u2013 **A research program** that seeks to define a set of institutions and methods whereby all social cooperation is voluntary. See HOPPE. A system that relies upon privatization of Justice, Defense, Police, Money, Banking, Insurance, Emergency, and Health Services that are generally under management by the government. These systems depend on a limited asymmetry, and widespread investment in a SOCIAL ORDER PORTFOLIO despite asymmetry of returns on that investment in favor of the wealthy. ( Doolittle.)

&gt;The Anarcho Capitalist argument is that price reductions are sufficient compensation, which while a logical statement, is not a benefit that is perceptible by the population such prices supposedly benefit. Since price change is not perceptible, and is often offset by increases in materialistic status signals, which are entirely perceptible (or they would have no value), then the lower half of the populace will perceive itself as falling behind \u2013 failing to obtain a return on their investment. Furthermore, they cannot cooperate to ACT upon those prices, they will seek to minimize their contribution to the SOCIAL ORDER PORTFOLIO, or actively to steal from it. **Anarcho Capitalism is a highly beneficial research program, and has developed a number of advancements in political science: largely the means of privatization of public services.**

The ancap movement succeeded at moving the discussion toward replacing state services, but it failed in [how to get there, what it would look like, and what the starting point should be.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/)And the rest of the world is much poorer.http://i.imgur.com/tz7pHAZ.jpg

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YeqNGqOCbNsIn truth, we really shouldn't refer to ourselves as singular global terms and then pretend we move in a linear line away from them.

I still have libertarian sentiments, but they exist for masculine reasons (as they always did, really), rather than feminine moralizing.

My progression, as I've said before, is really nothing but coming to better understand how to articulate and couch my values; my values never changed.

If one can ascertain to a high degree another's values, one can often point the structural way; the present me could turn the 17 year old me into what I am today in the course of a year or two.&gt;It doesn't fail. Nonaggression and property rights are mostly unconcerned with political strategy. Marxists also disagree on how to achieve Communist Utopia. Does that (by itself) make Marxism a failed ideology?

The point is that your starting principle invalidates your system ever coming into existence\u2014voluntaryism (i.e. direct suppression of retaliation) vs. suppression of behavior which demonstrably causes retaliation to be worth it.

&gt;David Friedman

David is no where on the level propertarians have gone so far.  His work is a marginal improvement on Rothbard's, but no where near the astronomical improvements that Curt made on both Rothbard and Hoppe.

As for the rest of your comment, it's clear you don't understand what I'm exactly saying, otherwise you wouldn't verbally wander into irrelevance.Absolute nuclear family\u2014just the core family, with little to no grandparent involvement.

Traditional family is where the grandparents are heavily involved, and then there's an extended family model from here where aunts and uncles are constantly involved as well.

These models correspond with individualism, trust, and nepotism levels.Not many Chinese libertarians, to regenerate the liquidated cultural capital.

&gt;I was under the impression that the previous bubble was caused by them, and that it collapsed at about the time they made it hard to buy.

Regardless of the method, the cultural capital has been mostly depleted with Bitcoin, reducing it to a generic gambling device now.&gt; Everything is profane for you, just like it is for Curt.

What's interesting here is that you're the only one using that term: you're saying my worldview is profane, thus _you_ are bringing the profane; I merely see you as weak, but real, and not evil.  Your words are laced with the venom of 'evil'.

It is you who speak and spit hatred, while I indifferently shrug off your hysteria; you've known from our very first engagements I was the stronger, more durable psychology; it is how I saw through Stirner instantly, whereas you did anything but, my nihilist-priest friend.

&gt;There is not one Indo-European native mytho-cosmology that sees a profane world, only the Jews have that sacred/profane dichotomy in their myths.

Ah, and what does that make you, "profane"-spitter?

&gt;The guys above have all outdone him.

Show me.

&gt;you'll have to call all the Conservative Revolutionary Movement a bunch of Jewish priests too as well as everyone in the Traditionalist movement

I have already described the psychological degeneracy that exists among the mere regressivists.

&gt;You are only seeing logic in the light of day, it is floating in the air, you are missing the darkness of the Mystical realm.

The interesting thing here is that it's you who is clinging to Being.Not specifically, no, as social capital more specifically refers to network effects and transaction costs.

When I say cultural capital, think more of brand, reputation, and expectation.He didn't say that; he's just saying there are more rational detection methods of problem individuals than skin tone.That's still an independent matter 

You seem to be of the opinion that the mere existence of social capital economically justifies racialist states in all cases.&gt;It can not ever be shown

This is the core priest tactic vs. the warrior psychology: "I have power over you, but which only I can understand\u2014trust in my power and make yourself subservient to my values."

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Z9NHQdiSZcI was asking from the implication of your singular comment.

I've obviously shown no prior restraint to tell you what I think of you.You probably don't see the link between your past Stirnerite nihilism and your present effeminate druidism.The difference between you and me is you see sickness when looking at the world, whereas I see askesis.

You see a decline, whereas I see a pregnancy.http://i.imgur.com/S1bink5.jpgMy guess is most libertarians in general are strong INTJs, which is probably the demographic with the most difficulty interfacing with emotional, a-rational relationships.

I don't think it's anything to be ashamed of, however, as it's just the way one is; there are pros and cons to every personality type and one would just have to learn to adjust and have reasonable expectations.

It's the same as how other personality types aren't as reflexively gifted at things INTJs are.Is homosexuality pro-civilizational?

We can agree that there's little gained in oppressing homosexuals, but what is gained by celebrating it?  It doesn't contribute to civilization, often instead to very unhealthy habits.It just goes to show you that such activists aren't seeking freedom in any deep sense, but conformity to their views.

"Freedom to force you to approve of me."I've been meditating on this as well.  Essentially, Carson is just the feel-good anti-Trump pro-Evangelical vote.

Unfortunately for him, his weaknesses are more fatal than Trump's: Carson knows almost nothing about policy to speak on the fly about it, and I think as we get past Iowa, we will start to see more of that, breaking down his support back into the teens.

Trump also has the highest percentage of people committed to him "til the end": around 55% of his present support, where Carson's is more around 22%.Check out this channel: https://www.youtube.com/user/Skatefordays1/videos

He uses Brian from Ivona to narrate, but it's slightly too fast, so I download the audio to my phone and slow it down to 0.90.  Many great, mandatory alt-right works in there.Is Jeffrey Tucker not a leftist?I think voluntaryists are more dangerous to freedom actually existing than propertarians.

I feel confident in this belief, because I've seen how there has never existed a wealthy cosmopolitan libertarianism.Are you really more just trying to say you're for the three major political specializations (conservative, libertarian, and progressive) working together in a division of labor?&gt;I've got a feeling that Machine Learning may not be the best route for me in college.

Why not?  I hear it's the major future compsci has, especially considering it's the main thing biomedicine is going to be needing in even greater capacity, and that too is experiencing explosive growth.

&gt;and those classes all seem to be over my head

Oh.  &gt;_&gt;

Something may click later for you, though, as you get farther into statistics; at least you're studying something related.

&gt;I may just do pure stats.

Position yourself to be used by finance, ML, and/or bioinformatics.  This latter one could easily land you a job, especially if you enjoy bio and genetics concepts, but you'd have to enjoy programming on some level, too; nothing too complex, but still there.Voluntaryism is a poor starting point for a libertarian political philosophy.

What I will say, though, is that decentralized force is critical to a libertarianism that actually exists.  This is what aristocratic republics were: force and martial capability were decentralized.

The American Founders tried to approximate this with militias of the people, which wasn't a bad thing, but not quite as good (hence, why some want to have more control over what crazy plebs are allowed weapons).

If someone wanted to know what I think is ideal, it's the aristocratic martial model, where not everyone has access to the best weapons and training, but those weapons and training are still widely accessible to those who can responsibly employ them.It is True that Austrian economics is unscientific, but rationalist instead.

One might liken this to mathematics, but one would still have to be careful there, as operational mathematics is empirical and scientific.&gt;changing the subject to that

That is what you're critiquing this guy over, though\u2014voluntaryism.

&gt;Its still has a cost, and therefore will only be done if people value it more than their money, 

Positive social externalities exist, and ones where people are willing to suppress voluntary actions over it.

&gt;if you think people value banning porn from my household more than 50$ a month out of their fucking pocket.

I'm more talking about direct lying and by omission.Well, I'm obviously not of the Puritan tradition.

The Puritans were not of the aristocratic republic tradition, but precisely disbarred from it.

Substance use doesn't bother me; it's more lying and manipulation where I see a need for suppression.I come more from the martial aristocratic mindset, not the priestly Puritan.

The priests were nothing but the degeneration from the warrior caste, doubly so for the Semitic traditions.

What this should ultimately mean to you is that I'm scientific in my presentation of libertarian solutions, not religious.&gt;Ya, pro-freedom people are more a danger to freedom than fucking retards who support the war on drugs.

Historically, the Indo-Europeans were obviously not anti-drug, but heavy drinkers and plant-users.

As I said before, I come from the martial consequentialist tradition, not the degeneration into sentimental priestly conspiracy.

So, for me 'impurity' isn't so much a thing as dishonor is; it is dishonor that should be punished, and 'impurity' only as it manifests as dishonor, e.g. the alcoholic Gauls and Germanics were anything but dishonorable.

The voluntaryism I find in need of suppression and destruction is the one that validates lying and dishonor.

&gt;But the closer a place gets to libertarianism, the more wealthy it becomes.

Not the voluntaryist kind, no.  The only rich libertarianism that's ever existed was the high trust aristocratic republics, which had a conception of honor, _not_ NAP minimalism.

NAP minimalism creates a low trust environment, leading to tremendous social transaction costs and stagnant economic velocity\u2014the Levant.

&gt;So you agree with OP that AnCapistan would ban guns, ban drugs (except alcohol of course, because that makes sense), and ban homos (no matter how much value they brought to the community)??

Well, again, I come from the empirical aristocratic tradition, not the visceral priesthood, which indeed probably advocates unproductive, unscientific things.

I understand the origin of the West in the aristos, not the Puritans (can barely type this without laughing at such a thought).http://i.imgur.com/SBJKeSX.jpg

On top of this, Northern Europeans participated in the slave trade the least and abolished it first.

The only reason we get shamed is because we're _precisely_ the only ones concerned enough about anti-racism to be duped.&gt;I don't think you can be a misanthrope and anarchist

http://i.imgur.com/V3qw335.pngOh, I've held multiple ones, including now.You'd probably do just fine, then.&gt;I never disagreed with this.

Even if it violates your NAP?

And I'm not sure I've really interacted with this guy.God knows I have like two degrees by now, given how many different subjects I studied past the 300 level, but I'll be finishing the last few classes I have left part-time.  I got a little sick of school and wanted to bias toward work.

I've also worked full-time while taking no classes before, too.  Working is not something I'm removed from.

I've held probably five categorically different jobs.  In a lab right now.&gt;I see the big picture and you do not

Your big picture is simply a decline; that is your timescale, but mine is longer.

&gt;I know exactly the problems you and Curt have

All you've said so far is a poststructuralist critique of language and the Nietzschean critique of modernity.

But, what you've failed to understand is what the purpose of modernity is; all you know how to do is writhe.  This makes you the short-sighted one.

&gt;this is the guy you are backing?

His presentation of the martial empirical aristocratic tradition is closer to me than your presentation of effeminate Platonism.

[Always been an elaborate systematist.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xkU9oVGr1KE&amp;t=11s)Guess which group The Penguin was based on?

Same thing with goblins.Admittedly, I'm still in the process of understanding operational mathematics.

Operationalism as it concerns physics is very straightforward, but how it applies to pure mathematics is much more difficult.

Here are a few resources on it: 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Z9NHQdiSZc&amp;t=5m2s

&gt;OPERATIONAL / OPERATIONALISM / OPERATIONAL DEFINITIONS \u2013 Concisely stated that the concepts or terms used in non-analytic scientific statements must be definable in terms of identifiable and repeatable operations.  In philosophy, stated, albeit loosely and poorly as:  (a)\u201cDefining concepts in terms of the operations, both physical and mental, used to construct them.\u201d   Also as a theory of meaning wherein (b) \u201cthe meaning of any concept is nothing more than a set of operations, and the concept is synonymous with the corresponding set of operations.\u201d  And lastly, (c) \u201cThat we do not know know the meaning of our descriptions unless we possess a means of objectively measuring them.\u201d  This traditional definition however is framed in antique philosophical terms and partly why the Operational and Intuitionist movements failed: they confuse meaning and understanding  dependent upon prior experience, with demonstrable truth, independent of prior experience.

&gt;-Propertarianism- 
&gt;In Propertarianism I argue in favor of Operationalism, not as a theory of meaning (although I don\u2019t disagree that it is one theory of meaning) because while Experiential Descriptions( reactions and valuations) and Imaginary Descriptions(allegories) provide the speaker and the audience with meaning, only operational definitions are insulated from deceptions and error by means of framing and loading (Experiential Descriptions), and the addition of imaginary information (Imaginary Definitions). In other words, one cannot give truthful testimony free of error and deception in terms other than those that are operational.  

&gt;\u2013 Naming- 
&gt;Every set of operations constitutes the name of a repeatable process which given the same inputs should produce the same outputs. Just as positional numbering consists of operations that grant a unique name to every quantity and measure, so does a set of operations necessary to perform an action provide each action with a unique and repeatable name.  This uniqueness eliminates the problem of using analogies.

&gt;\u2013 Relation to Property \u2013 
&gt;If we reduce all morality to the prohibition of free riding and imposed costs, and that all such negative prohibitions can be stated positively as property rights, and that all such rights are adjudicable under the common law, then if we rely upon original intent and strict construction stated as operations, then it becomes exceedingly difficult to corrupt the law, or to use such artifices as Keynesian economics as a means of accomplishing what is not possible to accomplish under property rights.  For example, under Keynesianism we violate the property of nearly every person engaged in moral behavior, for the benefit of those that do not engage in moral behavior. And worse, we eliminate the possibility of achieving the same result by voluntary exchange between producers and non-producers. Which in most cases would permit the perpetuation of high trust norms in exchange for economic benefits.  Rather than as under postmodernism and Keynesianism, destroying high trust norms in AND violating property rights.  Furthermore, if we use operationalism as a  rule, we can also prohibit pooling and laundering of tax revenues, and can eliminating discretionary spending, and require all funds be raised in relation to a contract with fulfillment criteria, start and end conditions, that are not violable by successor governments. Lastly we can require contracts as well as laws, follow strict construction, original intent, and demonstrate the causal connection between property rights and any given clause.  This nearly eliminates interpretation and abusive language that are common in contemporary legal practice since the introduction of the cosmopolitan forms of deception into discourse.

&gt;-History-
&gt;Bridgman argued for example, that length may be for all intents and purposes a single concept, but that the means of measuring it vary with the scale of that which is measured.  This misses the point however, that troubled him: why Einstein\u2019s theory should not have been revolutionary, but obvious, because we had applied the concept of length as we understood it at human scale, to the concept of length at stellar and interstellar scale.  Length has properties that are immaterial at human scale (the speed of light) but highly material beyond human scale.  And this is the central problem operationalism was to address:  that the 19th century advances in all fields exceeded the prior concepts that we originated during the era of human scale, and that we used our concepts as analogies to understand that which was beyond human scale \u2013 and we failed in every single discipline from science to math, to logic, to philosophy, to economics.  Had we examined the difference in operations necessary to make measurements in each of these fields we would have understood that we faced a conceptual problem of using old analogies to apply to new scales, wherein those new scales required different instruments, both physical and logical in order for us to understand them.

&gt;My concern is that this failure applies also to language itself, and that the new era of mysticism, second only to the christianization of rome, or perhaps the invention of scriptural monotheism, was brought about through deceptions that operationalism would have prevented.  Socialism, Postmodernism, Neo-conservatism,  and libertine-libertarianism, were all imposed upon us through empty verbalisms that Operationalism would have prevented.  

&gt;To counter these fallacies, I\u2019ve demonstrated that norms, particularly high-trust norms, constitute a form of property paid for by forgone opportunity costs, at high expense. And that making  unTrue statements that re-encourage theft of that common property, can be adjudicated in court as a violation of property rights, just as libel, slander and defamation have been adjudicated in court as a violation of the property rights of individuals who have sacrificed to build reputations, because reputations have material economic value.

&gt;So I see my work as fulfilling operationalism by demonstrating that the western ethic evolved as  testimonial truth, and that, we can only testify to that which we can demonstrate, because all else is adding information (error and deception) to the truth, which is not allegorical, but demonstrable.

&gt;I hope this brief discussion is helpful to you. If not, read various entries on Operationalism and then try to understand how I am applying this scientific theory to property rights, contract, law, and public speech so that we can prevent another era of mysticism ushered in by various forms of linguistic deception \u2013 most of which have origins in cosmopolitanism and it\u2019s history of dual standard ethics and scriptural interpretation as means of obscuring those dual standard ethics.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Operationalization

http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/operationalism/

Maybe in about a week, I'll be able to explain it better.  I can think of a trivial way of doing so, but I'm wanting to see if there's a more substantive one.  It's also possible that I'm using the word mathematics in a way that destroys its past meaning.Nothing really is ultimately, honestly.So, I watched the beginning of that video, again.

I think I understand enough to explain: operational mathematics is that mathematics where mental operations can be performed to arrive at what conclusions have been made.

Non-operational mathematics would be that mathematics which really ceases to be about mathematics (there are no operations that get you to the conclusion) and is more about religious Platonism.

In this dichotomy would exist the 'empirical mathematics' and the 'a priori mathematics', but of course this latter category wouldn't exist as anything actual; it would instead be simply an unintelligible mistake, an anti-reality, an anti-entity, as a broken computer is really just scrap\u2014a non-computer.Just as long as you don't work with the supposition that economics then becomes about performing 'experiments', as much as demonstrating existence proofs.

Mises got this much right, in his deconstruction of the socialist schools; it's just he wandered into rationalist justificationism, rather than empirical operationalism.

Edit: One way you can understand my qualification to your statement is by understanding how Newtonian mechanics itself also became unscientific when applied to the galactic scale, but instead allegorical, Platonic, and rationalist.  So, this isn't about facile experimental physicalism or something like that.Probably 95% of the people who say that, though, probably wouldn't understand in what sense it is unscientific.

If you were to ask them, they'd probably mention experimentation, not empirical operationalism.  Such a person would probably consider the trouble Newtonian mechanics ran into still under the umbrella of science, not Platonic, rationalist verbalisms (i.e. unscientific) which it did become.

In other words, Misesian-Rothbardian Austrian economics made the same mistake Newtonian mechanics made, and yet the people who love to call it unscientific couldn't understand this parallel (and probably made a C- in Newtonian physics, to boot).&gt;I think your support for democracy is nauseating. 

He's not supporting democracy in that comment.Neoconservatives are not the same thing as social traditionalists.

Neoconservatives are actually not that principled of a group, thinking of themselves more as a cross between Locke and Machiavelli.&gt;Because there goes 35% of all 18 year olds who then put their economic value into a different community which will allow them and the puritan one become the less wealthy community and ergo less desired??

If cosmopolitan ethics was more productive, why have there been no wealthy cosmopolitan societies?You use operational logic, too, as we all do.

You just hide yourself in Amerindian bird songs.

&gt;if you don't ~~understand the problem of metaphysics~~ _convert_ you ~~are screwed~~ _will be damned_.

You speak as a priest, and your religion isn't even deep.Well-said.  Hoppe does not go far enough, however.

Curt picks up where German rationalist Hoppe could go no further.The theory goes that any movement not explicitly right-wing will inevitably become left-wing.

I'm not sure I can come up with a refuting example.  Even parts of Nietzsche get appropriated by the left, despite [him explicitly telling them not to do so.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s4i11923V04&amp;t=1h11m34s)It sounds like he's some kind of social Hoppean.  What are you wanting me to address?California is not wealthy because of cosmopolitanism, but rather Silicon Valley.

California is actually approaching fiscal trouble precisely because it's libertine with regard to immigration.Are these people unvirtuous scumbag degenerates?If all you're trying to ask me is essentially: "Are you okay with me smoking pot?" I already answered you in three different comments that I'm not a Puritan.There's a very sophisticated, technical reason for this, something that is scientific, not merely sentimental.

I'll be able to explain it in full detail by year's end.I actually am not sure I've ever directly talked to this person in any thread, certainly not a lengthy dialogue, as I would remember that.

What's more, I said explicitly I come from the more martial empirical aristocratic school, not the Falsely aristo priest-sentimentalist school\u2014meaning I'm not trying to impose irrational views on you, like smoking or not smoking a plant.

Now, if these people to be excluded are dishonest scumbag liars, then yeah, I'd have them expelled.In the original comment, I was referring to scientific reasons why libertine-libertarianism must fail.

And by scientific, I mean economic; I wasn't referring to biology, per se.

But, being that you are bringing up that subject, my understanding is that progressivism is a feminine specialization, one which has K individual behavior, but r societal behavior.  In other words, progressivism (and women) are about nurturing (K), but with as many targets as possible and getting those resources from others as much as possible (r).You could say that, assuming you're using 'valid' in the literary sense.Operationalism is by its very nature empirical and never anything but, though.

I just say that as a clarifying appositive.How exposed are you to analytic philosophy?  Because this is pretty standard.

And how exposed are you to postmodernism?  Because the above is nothing like it.

Indeed, I could repackage an introduction to a natural science journal and you'd say, "That sounds like a bunch of pseudoscientific shit," because you're simply uneducated\u2014that's it.

You know who I am; you're playing very foolishly to not read more, if my serious attention has been captured.Have a Snickers and relax.  I doubt you want to be remembered for arguing like a woman.Yeah, you're probably using a more official designation, whereas I'm going by Curt's political division of labor (which of course has become imbalanced) and then appending on to it what I understand the basic r and K definitions to be.

In other words, my analysis is categorical and situational only to the present imbalance of the three political specializations, whereas your analysis seems to handle more just the ratio of rs and Ks in the populace\u2014an orthogonal dimension.

I'll watch that Molyneux playlist in the next few days and see if I can better understand your question.

&gt;I don't quite understand how you would separate between individual and societal behavior.

Because law between the political division of labor constrains and transforms individual behavior into its societal ramifications.

&gt;K-selected conservatives are the ones who nurture/ build, while r-selected liberals feed/ multiply.

Does this analysis not recognize men and women?  Only insofar as 'progressive' and 'conservative' mark men and women?

Well, I read over the above comments one more time and it seems like your original question can be answered just by ingrained instinct, irrespective of direct profit.

I think the best way of synthesizing these two frameworks is by thinking of them orthogonally, even if the r/K balance doesn't equally populate the progressive-libertarian-conservative balance (almost assuredly rs fill up the first column much faster than the middle and last, perhaps even almost exclusively).

With this, I think my above explanation is still right; we'd just take the r/K cycle as reinforcing the p-l-c imbalance\u2014perhaps even directly causing it, where political or information technology changes might be only proximate causes.Yes, again, assuming you're using 'valid' in the literary sense.

The Platonic math would just exist as nonsensical anti-realism.'Neechuh'.If you want to make this rest stop your final destination, be my guest.I have no shame in the mere existence of pride.&gt;building Ancap institutions

Like what?  Bitcoin?  Seasteading?

Those aren't institutions, but specific economic activity, the first extremely unsound and the second an obscure vacation for the rich at that.  Seasteading by itself will not replace state services, will not bolster the commons\u2014the State never existed because of mere belief, but because of a failure of the commons; your utopian ideological community will fail like all obscure communes have in history.

This is the myopia of the libertarian: [all he understands is monetized phenomena.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rhsaw/daily_discussion_the_division_of_labor_is_limited/cwo56gb)  It has given him a blind spot to what the moral commons is, what high trust is, how it forms, and why it's needed for a libertarian society.

Instead, the libertarian is given only two options: (1) chant the NAP enough til everyone is an ideological libertarian (never going to happen and even this by itself won't produce functional law), or (2) hope and pray the market randomly bootstraps anarcho-capitalism into existence.  The State sucks and is inefficient, right?  The market _has_ to eventually topple it!

No, what has to happen is libertarians ally with conservatives, to reform our social institutions\u2014hence, the shitlords here, hence the culture war.

&gt;philosophical vision that was unmatched

http://i.giphy.com/vp6QzTE2fXNZu.gifPeople aren't really in support of the State as much as the commons.

Congress has something like a 14% approval rating, which is probably the most accurate metric for 'love of the State'.

What ancaps may be criticizing is love of the Nation, which is something they'd be foolish to try to combat or see as bad, as this is part and parcel to having a commons and hopefully a high trust one at that\u2014the basis for a robust market's existence in the first place.

Where did ancaps think markets came from?  Why is there a global diversity in their prominence?  Why did they form in the size they did when they did?  Why then?  What was special, what was the fundamental and proximate causes?

Ancaps don't have a philosophy of history, precisely because conservatives and libertarians have been lacking a systematic sociological theory.  Prior, all we had was sentimental moralizing (progressive psychology) and consequentialist reasoning (libertarian psychology), but neither of those generate institutions: they are behavior that functions only within an already existing institution.

Instead, we had to pursue the generator of institutions: the conservative psychology.  This is the _exact_ reason so many "postancaps" have moved into some form of alt-right conservatism.  We've already seen the fatal flaw in the ancap kind of libertarianism and are trying to quickly modify it into the libertarianism consistent with historical manifestation: high trust.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MKH6PAoUuD0&amp;t=4m29s&gt;We don't support him.

Stop being a collectivist.In this approach, the mental operations are considered empirical\u2014in the world.

When a conclusion requires an operator that doesn't exist, the operator is not empirical and anti-real.

That's the best I can make of it, but I'm no PhD mathematician.  Maybe after finishing [some Bridgman reading](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Logic_of_Modern_Physics) I can say more, but I'm somewhat sure that's it.The libertine version of libertarianism (NAP minimalism) has never existed, and for good reason.

I promote something that has actually existed in history multiple times.  Good luck with your pedophilia PDAs.Talk about late to the party.I could go for the latter.

Man, [that intro...](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Dgyde-u6lho)I listened to Durant's lecture on him; he seemed like a reasonable man, if very metaphysically American.And where has the party ever gone?&gt; ignorant opinions about race

What are those?  I have studied this at the scientific level quite extensively; I want to know who's ignorant.

&gt;America was thriving when it had the most influx of immigrants in the late 1800's and early 1900's.

European immigrants, a people whose ancestry has a ten thousand year tradition of republics.

&gt;you attract the hard workers who believe they can make a life for themselves

There's nothing wrong with having a rigorous meritorious naturalization process (one where you're required to demonstrate something other than mere trivia), but just having the gates wide open for anyone and for them to trespass on private property or even influence your local governance is foolish.

&gt;america exploded BECAUSE of immigration

America was originally an Anglo and Dutch _settlement_; there was no "America" before them for them to immigrate to and "assimilate."  Even when the Germans and Italians came, it wasn't a breeze to assimilate them.

Now, you think people from an entirely different continental background with an entirely different ten thousand year evolutionary history are going to be able to waltz right in _en masse_?  Are you familiar with Hispanic voting patterns?

I realize many libertarians weren't taken with Reagan and Romney, but Obama never would have got elected in '08 or '12 (and Obamacare would never have been passed) were the demographics what they were _just_ in 1991, and Reagan would have lost to Carter were the demographics what they are today\u2014that is how far the US is being demographically shifted out of _some semblance_ of free market values.

Are you familiar with the varied countries south of the border?  Guess the ratio of communist/socialist parties to libertarian parties.  Your guys' naive racial egalitarianism is going to kill what you wanted to happen.

&gt;it doesnt matter where the immigrants come from, that's just dumb

How is it dumb?  The probability every sociobiological group has the exact same brain morphology average and hormonal levels average is like "throwing a handful of silver dollars and all landing on edge."

In fact, we already _physically_ know the races differ in brain size, morphology, and hormone levels, not to say in many other parts of the body, too.

We have data showing different political values and views, and throughout all this, you take the hypothesis that they _can't be different_, that that's _just "dumb"_?  lolwut

&gt;hispanics aren't voting democrat because of their national origins, they're voting democrat because dems represent the welfare state

And yet Hispanics voted in welfare states where they came from where there weren't any before.Austrian economics isn't normatively legal, just a rationalist framework.Top gun argument from Anenome, again.&gt;judeo-christian "morals"

#LOL&gt;a bunch of olympic athletes

Using your (laughable) metaphor, I was the gold holder, and these guys are orders of magnitude deeper than what existed before.A libertarian finds how libertarianism has to come into existence boring.

lolk.And yet you write lengthy comments to communists on economics.

Then, call the people who can write those same economic arguments even better "cats and dogs."   It's quite obvious why you don't want to face what else we bring to the table\u2014you can't handle us like the T-ball leftists.Ah, yes, when one has lost the theoretical debate, hole up in _"Well, it's because I'm a doer!"_

As if crying about the State below cop articles is 'doing'.

&gt;by reacting so negatively to Against Libertarian Brutalism

And now we see the micturating leftist show his face.  /r/debateanarchism made you a mod for good reason.

&gt;Even if you think third wave feminists would make for awkward bedfellows, there's no arguing with the fact that they're a lot less awkward to associate ourselves with than the NRXers.

Yes, Hoppe and Rothbard's social views are more awkward for libertarianism than Laci Green's.&gt;high-level anarcho-capitalist theory

Faceh actually agrees that the reactionary movement's contributions should be taken seriously.Sorry that reality unsettles your feel-good fantasy.&gt; following them to their logical conclusions

It's a tasty irony: these racial egalitarians are to us what 'statists' are to them.Going by your posts, "downhill" could only mean 'increase in sophistication'.Most of us old school ancaps moved on into more philosophically serious systems.

Fringe, spawk, lifeishowitis, capchem, jon, TortoiseDream, ex_logica, Molyneux, Cantwell, and I'd be willing to bet Rose, not to say anything of the many people I turned into consequentialists.

I can only think of a few holdouts that should be taken seriously, and that's Nielsio and lengthyounarthur, but I haven't had a one-on-one discussion with them about propertarianism; I'm confident I'd get them to follow suit, too.Their podcast was basic bitch, even back when.

This was a full year after Bitcoin had already been economically debunked.It's funny, because [he complains when I pull my higher rank with him.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3roml7/is_austrian_economics_unscientific_because_it/cwq8xmo)You seem to be the only one experiencing the anal waterfall.The only edgy college behavior I've ever seen is "hur hur culture is a spook!"&gt;All of the defining institutions of western civilization -- democratic government

Democracy is not the core of the West, but Aristocracy: due process is _not_ an example of Democracy, but precisely Aristocracy.

Democracy is more Ferguson riots, anything but due process.

&gt;The conservative small town world dominated by reactionary institutions never created any noteworthy institutions.

We're almost assuredly talking past each other.  Let me know what you think of [this framework.](http://www.propertarianism.com/2010/08/30/the-bipolarity-of-class/)I'll look into her, thanks.Downvoting comments merely because you don't understand contributes to a community?Many of us have been around ancap prior to his '08 campaign, before voting for him then and '12.

'milquetoast'\u2014I read more treatises in the first year than this community has in sum.

Even your guys' hated Darch understands legal theory eons better than all but one or two of you.Are you not familiar with the Mengerian critique of Bitcoin?

(Boy, if I haven't typed out that phrase in a while.)&gt;It is capital

Eh...&gt;new people&gt;So-long as NRx people believe the above, they will not be able to discuss anything else. They are (ironically) more concerned with dogmatically conceiving of complex processes in advance rather than letting those processes play out in practice.

Aristocracy was not an unconscious process, but a philosophical advocacy and scientific triumph.

&gt;rampant a priorism

Really, really poor word choice.

&gt;a healthy dose of pragmatism

What is operationalism?Rothbard is a god, until he isn't.&gt;It's a poor argument against communism as well.

Actually, it's not.

Sorry, but sociobiology and evolutionary psychology are worth studying.The problem with that view is that it obviates the very real dynamic of rent-seeking.lol, link to a single instance.  But, you won't, because you can't.

I instead _can_ link to instances where you get BTFO'd and fall back into silence.&gt;the best of us _will_ just leave

lol

&gt;this place will degenerate and you'll be king of the idiots

For the record, capchem regards us as important contributors to libertarian theory, much more substantive than you.

And capchem goes way back to the days of us arguing over Bitcoin and me turning him into a moral nihilist; good luck getting him to respect you more than me.&gt;Mods have the ability to change the incentives on this sub

_CENTRAL PLANNING, COLLECTIVIST, REACTIONARY_This is race realism's primary opposition right here, folks.An anti-Enlightenment movement is pro-Semitic?  Wut.&gt;your guys pro-war on drugs, pro-gun-control, ultra-puritan narrative

You obviously don't want to hear what has already been said to you on four separate occasions, and now five: I'm not anti-all drugs, not pro-all gun control (indeed, I favor barely any regulation of these) and am vehemently anti-Puritan (and east Anglo in general).

What you did was emotionally blow up and force yourself into victim status, all over one guy I barely know, whom you probably did misunderstand in the first place, and then went on to say all we reactionaries have the same views.

I told you I'm not a sentimentalist priest sort, but martially empirical, meaning I'm not going to be positing laws that have no productive basis.

What's 'doing'?  Bitcoin and Seasteading?  Nope, see my comment to the thread.

The culture war, informed by a scientific sociological theory, is much more effective.

Running from the State won't fix the problem; you have to build the commons instead.&gt;contributions should be taken seriously

--

&gt;you're usefulhttp://www.vforvoluntary.com/my-articles/21/the-theory-of-money-in-the-tradition-of-carl-menger

Ctrl+F "in the first part" if you don't want to read it all, but skip right to the defining moment of the critique.&gt;not abundantly well-stated

You're not well-read on cognitive biases, are you?

There are certain things people will never psychologically accept, regardless of its soundness.Clearly demonstrated, too.Regression is from Mises', and all it ever was was an explanation for _historical_ pricing, not present valuations, which can only ever be based on speculated future demand.Okay, so 'calculative capital'.

Even here, though, it's quite limited what the blockchain is able to coordinate, certainly not in its capacity as money itself.Is cabminerjunket "a group"?

And he certainly doesn't read like he's new to libertarianism, if he's very familiar with Mises and Hoppe.&gt;You should cite Plato and Socrates for basic philosophical concepts. That doesn't mean you support their vision of government.

Actually, Plato and Aristotle said eminently sensible things about politics."Consequentialism" (really, Misesian value appeals is what that really  means on this subreddit) was never anything but a way of selecting means that best maximized one's pre-rational ends.

Thus, it's quite silly to say one adopted it to save ancap\u2014everyone is always pursuing their values consequentially, and one doesn't need to save one's values: they don't change, only the means do.

So, if anything, it was precisely through consequentialist reasoning that people supported ancap at one point, _but then left ancap, too_.Mises' existential deconstruction of the socialist schools is still valid.

One just abandons the synthetic a priori and rationalist pretenses.

It's not like the whole system blows up for removing that error.This is just the basic bitch Rothbardian argument over total privatization.

Cantwell is still very behind in understanding aristocratic republicanism and the Western historical arc.&gt;Certain ideologies that typically get dragged in with it, such as race realism, are exclusionary enough that I don't feel any moral compulsion to provide them with a platform.

Discussing science now deserves no platform?

And they say conservatives are anti-science.&gt;Its simply impossible for most humans to be unable to produce for themselves.

Are you blind to dysgenics?  The r/K cycle?

&gt;No, "strength of character" is not going to solve these problems on larger scales.

He's discussing cultural and moral institutions.  You sound like you're thinking tech will take care of itself, independent of what humans ever think.&gt; state power bars entrepreneurs from implementing them

This isn't sufficient for the cause of why they haven't been implemented.

The State has always only ever been Plan B.&gt;P2: The State legally violates the rights of private ownership.

Anti-capitalists say instead: 

P2: The State legally enshrines the rights to private ownership, by violating the rights of the workers.

C: Capitalism cannot exist without the State.

No contradiction.&gt;It's a neo-reactionary buzzword they throw around when they realize their arguments are not rational.

A statement those say when they're uneducated in basic economics.https://www.reddit.com/user/Anen-o-me/submitted/Ebay and Amazon are connected to real world, high trust Western institutions.&gt;Go outside the christinized west and look for tolerance and liberty - you will find little. 

It's not so much about Christianity, as Rome was more tolerant than Christianity.

What it's about is the aristocratic jury process and the thousands of years process of building trust through it.Always personally liked Lew.[That the NAP was a sound starting point for law](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/), and this doesn't even concern metaphysics, but economics.Rugged, constuctive 'doer' spirit.  It is iconically American.

That the worth of an idea is its effects on your life is not novel, but that this was nearly all of his system is quintessentially American\u2014a frontier settler people who understand little but rugged action.I had to scroll back 8 days to find a substantive comment of yours, and sure enough, it was a reply to an anti-capitalist.

I was right; you know I've been aware of you since your /r/debateanarchism excursions.&gt;So, let's just not discuss anything at all, right?

My point is that something being downvoted does not necessarily detract from the presenter: it's True that something can be unsound; it's True that something can be poorly stated; but it's also True something can be diametrically opposed to another's core identity.

All I was doing was showing your faulty argument, not asking for the removal of the upvote/downvote system, though it is rather plebeian, to be honest.He was really laying out the Western tradition of aristocratic republicanism.

Now, obviously a deceptive, priestly "aristo"cracy is not desirable, but rather an empirical demonstrable one.

However, this doesn't change that aristocracy is the only robust anti-State, anti-mob system.I don't need to be educated on Austrian economics; I was just saying you weren't being generous with their argument.What is Semitic about existential proofs?  If anything, it is deeply anti-priest.As long as you can anchor the blockchain to actual consumer and producer goods, it's fine; otherwise, it's toast.Most in the alt-right are former ancaps.  I have never seen this many postancaps in any other tradition: it's orders of magnitude over left-libertarianism and mutualism.Transhumanism isn't a _deus ex machina_, though: there will still be a causal connected transition and social institutions will still exist.I've never led a downvote brigade against anyone.

&gt;the only fucking one who is questioning this persons fucking insane shit instead of questioning him yourself?

I haven't even seen what you're talking about.

I'm not an ancap.&gt; if we had a minimal or non-existent welfare state, we would attract the hispanics that are dissatisfied with the system around them and want to keep the fruits of their labor

Why not also have a rigorous meritorious naturalization process?

&gt;i will argue all day that you dont take my tax dollars, but a True libertarian would want people to have free autonomy over where they lived, so long as they didnt encroach on private property.

And these people are encroaching, via voting for redistribution of wealth.&gt;if there wasn't a party promising more favors, it wouldn't be put to a vote, now would it?

How do you think the Democrat party pivoted to the Left, if not for the migrants?

The Democrat party used to be the white working class man's party; now, it's the coalition of anti-whitey.

&gt;the fact of the matter is that forms of socialism were popping up like wildflowers all over europe at the time of "the great wave," but we didnt attract the people who supported that movement, we attracted the people who wanted to work hard and keep the fruits of their labor

Northern Europe is approximately as economically free as the US.

&gt;ok... no, it's not a TEN THOUSAND year history of consistent republics, that's just factually incorrect. a much more accurate portrayal of that time period would be monarchal successions, imperial wars, and religious oppression. did they bring that over too?

The West never characteristically had strong monarchies, but aristocratically limited monarchies, and these aristos came from the Indo-European migrants, some six to eight thousand years ago, bringing their decentralized aristocratic egalitarian system (also known as a republic).  How far back republics existed among them from there, I can't say; it may be even longer than ten thousand years in sum.

It is also key to recognize that these Indo-Europeans represent the necessary, causative element that brought republics to Europe, as the systems that existed beforehand were a mix of communism and simple agrarianism, so when I talk about 'the West' as the republican tradition, I trace its history with the Indo-Europeans, not the Proto-Europeans (geography obviously doesn't sufficiently define or change a people).

&gt;you consider yourself some sort of pariah who is alone in seeing things

Oh, certainly not alone, no.You mean, why do they make a point of educating the populace (participate in the moral commons), only to say that the moral commons is unimportant?Yes, happened probably four to six years ago.

https://medium.com/@vforvoluntary/the-theory-of-money-in-the-tradition-of-carl-menger-40e2e601600You posted a video once of Weber and the origins of capitalism in the Puritan work ethic.The irony of someone accusing _me_, ideologically and professionally, of being anti-transhumanism.

I'm the reason your flair was created years ago.

Moreover, the study of sociobiology and psychology are precisely contributions to that movement.Supposedly, the same thing with womb testosterone levels and genitalia size (these two being linked with themselves, too).I think you're being a pointless (and boring) self-victim.You can't; morality is itself an instance of public coercion.You will get violations of the NAP if people detect it profitable to retaliate against free riders.

And you will of course get catastrophic failure of your system if people find it unprofitable to provide, so long as it's illegal to violently suppress free riders.&gt;I have no idea what you mean by my population.

He's referring to human capital, specifically cultural and genetic capital.

I realize it's not in the libertarian psychology to understand anything but monetized phenomena, but that's your problem, not ours.&gt;If you can demonstrate to free riders that they are necessarily better off contributing than free riding

And how do you do that without coercion?That was the Christians own doing, for not performing the most basic honoring of Caesar.

They didn't persecute them for merely being Christians: there were scores of religions at the time.

I make no apologies that a nation's built-up cultural capital should be respected, and the Christians were deliberately spitting on it.It is impressive.&gt;Aristocracy is pretty ubiquitous to virtually all pre-modern states.

Whoa, you're claiming it was ubiquitous in the Far and Near East?

&gt;Democracy defines those legal rights.

No, it doesn't, for the masses are incapable of understanding the social economics of what rights should be constructed.

&gt;In the real world, where conservatism predominates, institutional developments are typically severely retarded

Are you referring to phenomena like Sharia Law?  I'm not positing the conservative specialization have total control.

&gt;What matters is institutions and how they channel such tendencies toward productive outcomes.

Absolutely.

&gt; Disseminating power and influence to autonomous institutions undermines the power of their regime.

You appear to believe I'm positing totalitarianism.  I'm not; I'm positing a scientific, empirical system, which stands against the predations of both the animal mob and the parasitic state.

&gt;Ok, so? Do you think that I think no one will ever violate the NAP?

The point is that if it's common among voluntaryist starting points, perhaps voluntaryist anarcho-capitalism is bunk.

&gt;Setting aside the poor word choice of 'illegal' in this context

How is it poor word choice, when that's exactly what NAP minimalism advocates?

&gt;it is always permissible to exclude people from property they do not own

Ah, I see the mistake you're making: you have a limited conception of property\u2014mere personal property, not interpersonal property or informal institutional shareholding.

&gt;II. INTERPERSONAL PROPERTY

&gt;Cooperative Property: \u201crelationships with others and tools of relationships upon which we reciprocally depend.\u201d

&gt;a) Mates (access to sex/reproduction)

&gt;b) Children (genetics)

&gt;c) Familial Relations (security)

&gt;d) Non-Familial Relations (utility)

&gt;e) Consanguineous property (tribal and family ties)

&gt;f) Racial property (racial ties)

&gt;g) Organizational ties (work)

&gt;h) Knowledge ties (skills, crafts)

&gt;i) Status and Class (reputation)

--
&gt;III. SHAREHOLDER PROPERTY

&gt;d) INFORMAL INSTITUTIONAL PROPERTY: Informal (Normative) Institutions: Our norms: manners, ethics, morals, myths, and rituals that consist of our social portfolio and which make our social order possible.
\u201cThose properties in which we have invested our forgone opportunities, our efforts, or our material assets, in order to aggregate capital from multiple individuals for mutual gain.\u201d&gt;I do not, could not, and would not own other people

He's obviously using the the partitive genitive.  I know you're smarter and more educated than that.

&gt;I contend that the idea of a 'nation' is incommensurate with anarcho-captialism

And I would agree, hence it's destruction as a theory and basis for civilization, and hence why it has never existed, yet classical liberalism and aristocratic republicaism have, multiple times.

The key thing that caused this schism was: Do we start our society by suppressing retaliation of all non-physically aggressive behavior, or do we suppress the kinds of non-physically aggressive behavior which consistently lead to retaliation and lack of cooperation (e.g. direct lying and by omission)?

The first leads to a sort of libertine society, the second to a culturally contingent one.We'll bring him the full distance with time, particularly after Curt publishes his treatise and I start breaking it down for people.

Race realism is a more rigorous emotional check than propertarianism is.&gt;the free market loves it

The 'free market' simply uses it for speculative sharking; it is not heavily invested in by producers.

You should also be very careful with this logic, as 'the free market love[d]' the housing bubble.&gt;A self imposed moral rule need have nothing to do with what is required for a voluntarist society to function. I happen to think life is better when people adhere to the NAP, but I do not require it.

Voluntaryism definitionally surrounds the NAP.

&gt;a polycentric society

A polycentric society will exist so long as there is sufficient inter-actor low trust, which can be generated by NAP minimalism.

To the extent high trust is achieved, it is not polycentric, but monocentric.

&gt;I do not need to give you access to societal institutions through me

If I'm understanding your statement correctly, you would deny someone access to institutions which they contributed to?  If you do that, people won't contribute to building high trust.

&gt;Yes. The Mughals, Ottomans and Qing all had aristocratic classes.

Aristocratic in what sense?

&gt;People are perfectly capable of figuring out what rights and duties are necessary for a functional society.

Just as everyone is a capable scientist?

&gt;There are no innate specializations

You think Haidt's work is wrong?

&gt;people form their views according to the cultural and institutional setting that they're part of

You don't think there are any biological predispositions for personality or behavior?

&gt;Conservatives are borne from isolation and remoteness. Liberals and progressives are borne from cultural and institutional diversity and economic prosperity.

Well, listen, as I said, I'm not for conservatives being given total control.  Innovation and decline have both occurred in the West, hence the importance of a balance between the specializations.

&gt;The parasitic state is exactly what you are advocating for.

Not at all: I advocate for precisely what prevents its parasitism\u2014not sentimental moralizing, but direct supplying and building of the moral commons (can think of this as cultural capital) which generates the trust necessary to disempower state solutions (and its subsequent rent-seeking).&gt;They demanded that people declare Caesar lord to weed out Christians

Christians were already doing that, which is how they could find them.

&gt;knowing that they could not do it in good faith

And their faith was and is bad\u2014anti-social, despicable, putrid, parasitic.

&gt;The 'cultural capital' of Caesar was just a generation old.

Oh, no, sir.  The cultural foundations of Rome go back thousands of years.

&gt;And you defend people who kill in grotesque ways for thinking that the literal worship of the state is something they reject?

It's not worship for the State, but respect for cultural capital: those are two very different things; the State is an enemy of the latter, Empire vs. Republic.So, the housing bubble wasn't really an economic imbalance.&gt;Sure, but I do not require it of others.

Then, you aren't a voluntaryist.

&gt;To the extent high trust is achieved, it is not polycentric, but monocentric.
&gt;&gt;I do not agree.

Then, what is it?

&gt;If you and I both contribute to some social structure or even a concrete structure, of course either party can walk away and implicit in that is the ability to ostracize.

I would not recommend walking away from cultural capital, unless you enjoy a third world existence in the woods.&gt;trying to invoke your butt buddy

Actually, he and I barely interact, and we come from different backgrounds and are heading on different trajectories.

I invoke him precisely to show how primitive your worldview has become.

&gt;social status bullshit

It's funny because you apparently were doing that to another user below.&gt; I have no idea what you mean by the destruction of the theory as it still obviously exists.

You didn't score that high on verbal intelligence, did you?  Given this reading comprehension bumble and the earlier one.

I'm obviously referring to its soundness being destroyed.  People still believe in a flat earth, and yet you can hear a scientist say the theory has been destroyed.  Would you chirp up, "_Ahhh_, but it still exists!"

&gt;Directly lying (and lying by omission) can be violations of the NAP in damaging circumstances

Why?  And how is damage determined?&gt;so that free riders have incentive to contribute at least a little

That's still quite suboptimal.

As far as prediction markets, how do they provide for interpersonal property and informal institutional shareholding?

&gt;II. INTERPERSONAL PROPERTY

&gt;Cooperative Property: \u201crelationships with others and tools of relationships upon which we reciprocally depend.\u201d

&gt;a) Mates (access to sex/reproduction)

&gt;b) Children (genetics)

&gt;c) Familial Relations (security)

&gt;d) Non-Familial Relations (utility)

&gt;e) Consanguineous property (tribal and family ties)

&gt;f) Racial property (racial ties)

&gt;g) Organizational ties (work)

&gt;h) Knowledge ties (skills, crafts)

&gt;i) Status and Class (reputation)

--
&gt;III. SHAREHOLDER PROPERTY

&gt;d) INFORMAL INSTITUTIONAL PROPERTY: Informal (Normative) Institutions: Our norms: manners, ethics, morals, myths, and rituals that consist of our social portfolio and which make our social order possible.
\u201cThose properties in which we have invested our forgone opportunities, our efforts, or our material assets, in order to aggregate capital from multiple individuals for mutual gain.\u201dThe Enlightenment isn't our Western roots, but an East Anglo / Proto-European delusion and Semitic con.

The Western roots are in the Indo-Europeans and the Germanic and Greco-Romans they fathered.&gt;Rome may have gone back a long way but the demi-god Caesar did not.

The honoring of Caesar was just the honoring of the fatherland.

I've translated numerous passages where that meaning was abundant.

&gt;Does not liking the institution of the President of US deserve being fed to lions?

Deportation is more my favored method, but I suppose there are many methods of dealing with free-riding.&gt; I believe all interactions should be voluntary

You think they should be voluntary, but you're not willing to defend others from aggression?

&gt;I believe all interactions should be voluntary

How?

&gt;It is a False dichotomy to say that to walk away from cultural capital leads one to a third world existence in the woods.

To walk away from it sufficiently to be an NAP minimalist is to enjoy a ghetto existence.&gt; You have destroyed the soundness of deontological voluntaryism? I would like to see that.

Which method, metaphysical or economic?

&gt;For the same reasons behind fraud being a violation of the NAP.

And on that, why should it be?

&gt;nefarious means

[That's culturally contingent, not intersubjectively verifiable.](http://www.propertarianism.com/2015/07/02/propertarianism-vs-rothbardiansm/)It looks like it's traded on the NYSE.

Moreover, I never said Western institutions couldn't be exported and reinforced via continual interaction.&gt;They should be carried out free of coercion

So, then not high trust.

&gt;and certainly not insist that others conform to it against their will

Because the net result is a low trust system, which generates poverty, not wealth.&gt;The past won't help us predict much of this evolution at all, as it will take a different form altogether.

You're using transhumanism as a _deus ex machina_ from any present social responsibility, and all on the presupposition that transhumanism is going to do away with social institutions\u2014it's not.&gt;a majority of whites are supporting social programs too.

There's nothing wrong with a civilization having some sort of social support system.

The question becomes how to deliver it; we certainly know the State isn't ideal.

&gt;Taking revenge on a group of people because some of them vote for social programs isn't very NAP imo

You make yourself very easy prey, then.[How Austrian economics actually goes down as a pseudoscience.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Z9NHQdiSZc)

Unfortunately for the mathematical and Keynesian schools, they suffer the same fate as pseudosciences.&gt;Will the Singularity not do this either?

You're using the 'Singularity' as an oblivion event.

Not only is this not necessary, but it's utterly useless as a worldview in the present.

&gt;I have no idea how you would economically demonstrate the non-soundness of a moral position

If it fails in achieving the propagation of its users.

&gt;All moral questions are contingent upon context

I don't think you understand the terms; read the post.&gt;It happened when FDR put the New Deal into place

That still didn't stop them from being a working man's party.

&gt;from the immigrants and white workers

Those _were_ the immigrants, all the way up to '65.

&gt;if youre going to act like there weren't authoritarian regimes pervasive throughout the United kingdom and the rest of western europe, you're kidding yourself.

Feudalism wasn't all that bad, particularly manorialism.

&gt;But not at the turn of the 20th century. Which is what I'm referring to.

You'd have to show me, as I can't think of anything that was consistently and characteristically anti-republican.

An oblivion event.&gt;That is not a demonstration that a moral argument is unsound.

Ethics set out to coordinate and propagate their users; if they do not do this as well, then they are objectively less worthy or even abject failures.

&gt;I did

Then, what is your counter-critique?&gt;Perhaps but not necessarily.

Why should I trust someone who can lie and manipulate me?

&gt;we can point to any 'black market' in existence as an example

Actually, mafias and cartels punish breaches of trust.

&gt;I think to anthropomorphize branches of philosophy detracts

Logic itself is 'anthropomorphized'.

&gt;so I have met my burden

So, you didn't read the link?&gt;I do not care if you do

Then, you are sitting at the kiddie table.Yes, Japan is the oft-cited exception.  I don't know its evolutionary history that much, though.

Even with it, however, it's not identical to the West's performance, due to many other complementary factors.

And it's obvious that Japan only came into what it is after contact with and continual reinforcement by the West.

In all of this, however, I'm not trying to set up a binary, "We rule; you drool!" as I see no reason for there not to be a gradient and cooperation.Freedom to do what?  What's more, society isn't about freedom, but empowerment, which involves norms, which involve behavioral restrictions.

You might try to get around this by talking about that empowerment as a kind of material freedom, but otherwise, I don't see how you can.Yes, indeed, I'll gradually explain this dynamic to ancaps in the scientific economic terms Curt has constructed.

A teaser for those completely unaware: 

* Starting point of ethics\u2014why should I restrain myself on your behalf?

* Cooperation can be mutually beneficial\u2014I will withhold certain conduct; I will invest in the development of trust, a moral commons.

The 'certain conduct' can be punching you in the face, but it can also be not lying to or about you and not withholding information from you that I know would help you.

The boy in the cartoon is free-riding on built-up trust to not lie by omission, infuriating the other boy for stealing his investment in preserving trust, the moral commons; the other boy was denied his opportunity cost, thus a breakdown of trust, via not suppressing behavior that violates the commons, can result in a radical collapse in societal cooperation.

These varied levels of cooperation amount to economic velocity and the economies around the world we see vary in strength.What's the key difference from Rothbard?

Curt's critique here is categorical, though, by the way, meaning it is enough for someone to think freedom to trade and enjoy property exists independent of the obligation to construct and defend the institution.

Those who posit this as some kind of metaphysical obligation are merely acting like a deceptive priest-liar-thief.&gt;What's the basis for these claims?

Probably one or more of [these many books.](http://www.propertarianism.com/reading-list/)  It's probably just mainstream findings from evolutionary psychology, anthropology, and history.

&gt;Likening free-riders to thieves essentially implies everyone is a thief as every one of us have availed the benefits of positive externalities

Yes, but obviously with respect to a dimension, and of course not every dimension is economically deserving of equal suppressive force.

To the extent that we do have free-riding going on, we can look at this as a marginal inefficiency in our present institutions.  That quite noteworthy failures exist is why the State exists, and the extent of failure is the extent of state domination.  With this, we may now understand why this system will prove useful.Well, you know, of course, that Rothbard was quite taken with the Scholastics.

In any event, what about my statement following the question?&gt;How does one arrive at the superior conclusion when faced with a question of whether or not a resource or region is a commons or justly claimed as individual property.

It sounds like you're asking: "How do we identify when a new categorical commons has been created, to not repeat the mistakes of the Rothbardians and their limited conception of property?"

It's a key question I'm only groping my way toward an answer.

As far as I can tell, it's an evolutionary, emergent process (reputation, trademark, cultural artifacts, etc.), determined by investment via borne opportunity costs and the demonstration of defense of that investment, but in such a manner that many people do it and they do it as a means of cooperating with one another.

&gt; Dumping a reading list is not at all deceitful.

You can think it so, but it is the beginning of testimony, and I am not Curt.

If anyone's being dishonest here, it's you for insinuating dishonor prior to it being found.

&gt;Oh sure, why don't you find me those findings, Mr. Operationalist!

Well, again, I am not Curt; I think the interestingness of this quote stands on its own, and I would find it remarkable if you could find any anthropologist that'd claim man wasn't from the beginning a social, tribal animal.

You're also always welcome to call the defendant himself, but I know you won't, or you'd already demonstrate the genuinely curious tone.

I don't know why you think I and the audience aren't intelligent enough to see who's acting in good faith and who's not.  Only the weak man needs such a game.

&gt;If the cost of prohibition of free-riding is higher than the cost of free-riding itself

Prohibiting free-riding is, indeed, expensive, but the long-term dividends are tremendous\u2014just compare Africa or South America with the West.

It is a gradual process, fought with many a trial, many a war, many an execution.  No people walk into having a high trust society; it takes centuries.&gt;I've read very little of his work outside MES and a bit of For a New Liberty.

Ah, that would explain it.  His two favorite philosophers were probably Aquinas and Aristotle.  He (and his disciple, Tom Woods) credits many of the Scholastics for founding economics.

&gt;I guess it would depend on how seriously you take their metaphysical assumptions, and whether or not you agree with their deductions from there.

Well, insofar as they are making a claim on society for their rights, without observing the process of constructing those rights, they are free-riding on their actual construction.

It's remarkably similar to how priests free-ride on the spoils of the warriors.&gt;might lend itself to over-produce commons

As in someone communalizing personal property?

&gt;more elaborate market cooperative schemes

What other category could there be but personal and interpersonal property?

&gt;I have to imagine there would be many sociopolitical steps between here and there

Are you referring to implementing operational testimony rigorously as the new and only method of law?

&gt;without a truly disenfranchising technological leap

What do you mean?Yes, I have a longer thread for you, ktxy, and whoever else is banking on technology saving libertine-libertarianism.

The main thesis is that tech will only lead to even more kinds of commons, and precisely not lead to clever ways of providing for old ones and only that.

The truth of the matter is that tech solutions by themselves are not enough; we need a functional morality, and I of course only mean that in terms of a martial empirical economic law.Tech will of course develop and certain avenues of cooperation which were needed may regress back to self-sufficiency (privatization of the commons, and likely without legal repercussion here), but new moral commons will dynamically develop in parallel (this is already happening with 'social media').

The overinvestment many ancaps have made into tech and secession (seasteading) is an indication of an underlying anti-social psychology.&gt;there's no way for the suppressors to know if they are suppressing free riding or collecting rents

Can you give me an example?

&gt;do not know how much they value the common or public goods in question

Oh, I'm not sure that knowledge is necessary for this system.&gt;the transition of property from the commons to personal property

Well, I think the more critical dynamic is the moral commons and guarding against privatization of it, though there are examples of physical commons people will guard against privatization from (monuments, parks, etc.\u2014consider how millions were insulted when Saudi Arabia offered to build mosques in Germany\u2014they _knew_ that was a form of cultural conquest and huge spit in the face).

Note also through this entire discussion that (operational) government and the State are two different entities, so a public park in this system may be run _quite_ differently than, say, Central Park presently.

&gt;Take fracking for example. You have preservation of the common land on one hand

Are you essentially asking me: "How does this system delegate between the interests for resources and the interests for monuments?  How is that inter-temporal negotiation accomplished?"

I'm not sure how to give you a detailed answer that doesn't sound like a cop-out, but I'm guessing it'd have to begin as an aristocratic jury process, and of course that just means a jury process governed by operational testimony, not necessarily one of artificial privilege.

From there, I honestly don't know (at least of a very learned answer) how inter-negotiation occurs between these property scales.  That'd be a question for him.

&gt;Are you referring to implementing operational testimony rigorously as the new and only method of law?
&gt;&gt;Yes.

It'd be a philosophical revolution in many fields, perhaps not all at once, but likely in rapid succession.

It appears this revolution has already started in some fields, like computer science (by its very nature), and then psychology, mathematics, and physics, with economics, language, morality, and law needing to catch up.

This could be largely human-mediated, but it could also be largely tech-mediated, as computerization of politics increased, it might incidentally force operationalism more into the fore and public consciousness.

&gt;I mean it would be trivial to implement a testimonial paradigm over-night if one suddenly became the tech-emperor of Earth and were so inclined.

Oh, okay, I understand that full sentence now.&gt; I've read everything I could find from Curt and it was all unsubstantiated prose.

How could it all be, given that much of what he says is something an ancap should already understand and especially if you've read one or more of the cited works?

I've read most of Duchesne, so when he's saying Indo-European this Indo-European that, I already know.  So, this man is not a liar; it sounds like you just have some reading to do, if you're wanting to understand, but it's neither of our fault if you don't.

&gt;I can't help but suspect you both have an agenda and are working from it

Oh, please, yeah, yeah.  I've only spent years building a reputation of honesty that scores of people can attest to; even many of the people who disagree with me on something can grant me some respect that I don't abuse trust.

To suggest I'm dishonest to people as a method of gaining power is to also say that I need to be this way to get power, as an honest man who can make a compelling case in the daylight can only hurt himself by skulking, as he is denying himself the dividends of a good reputation, so this is an aristocratic buy-in, as it were.

But, I can only take this suggestion as a form of reverse-manipulation, given how historically False it is.

&gt;Being social and tribal is different from all those claims Curt made in your OP.

These: 

&gt;Man evolved from consanguineous bands by suppressing free-riding, thereby pressing all into participation in production.
Property is the natural result of suppressing free-riding.
At all points and at all times, property is constructed by resisting free-riding. This is the origin of property: the organized application of violence against free-riding.

Are indeed statements that concern: 

&gt;evolutionary psychology, anthropology, and history

and being social and tribal.

&gt;including privatization of what was thus far considered common goods result in rapid development in the US?

I'm not talking about communization of all physical property; indeed, use of land for personal benefit is only afforded by a moral commons, as the OP testified.

&gt;privatization to the extent possible, removing the need for collective action

Not to the point of dissolving society (i.e. privatization of the moral commons\u2014property norms).&gt;Since the movie is free to copy, there's a deadweight loss of $5 arising from its $10 price and the IP laws which enable it.

If you could freely copy it, why would you spend even the $5?My point is that the failure to outdo the State totally to the point where it can't use those successes to suppress other areas is all linked.The first, but the aristocratic model itself changes the current participatory model\u2014the mob is kept in check via the skill check of operationalism, and the parasitic snake-priest State is kept at bay via the demand for testimony, not priestly deception of the masses who don't understand operational checking of claims made to them.

If this much can be understood, then it can also be understood how this solves the problem of the 20th century, still currently plaguing the West.&gt;Maybe in a few more generations

Are you basing that on some empirical account of history somewhere?

&gt;I think the tech will take care of itself because humans think.

Eh, it'd be disingenuous then to present that as in disagreement with us.Well, it's not like the Indo-Europeans are "God's Chosen People"\u2014they are just as much a production of thousands of years of evolutionary, geographic, and climate pressures as the Japanese or anyone else.

What this means is it's not out of the realm of possibility others came closer to or farther from the IE example, especially given that cultural evolution seems to be happening at faster and faster speeds, which goes on to affect breeding patterns, too.

&gt;If so, how is it that yellow people develop it? Marco Polo's influence, or is it that they independently developed the sorts if institutions that breed high trust?

I'm not a historian of Japan, so I really couldn't lead you through each major cause.  Moreover, the Japanese still are quite different from Western Europeans.

&gt;I get the impression that race is supposed to be a causal factor in this matter

Biology determines, but biology can be determined (breeding patterns).

Moreover, it should be said that Western Europeans are not identical to the Proto-Indo-Europeans (that much should be obvious to most people, but may not be to those here).Limited liability is a useful construct even without the State.

The libertarians who say corporations wouldn't exist without the State are just kowtowing to leftists; it's not something Kinsella or Woods believes.Well, it's possible it becomes difficult to aggregate that much capital, as shareholders who had unlimited liability may want to have direct control or very close supervision of the company.

It seems it'd also force a democratization of the company's management, as no one would want to own barely any shares and then have unlimited liability, which is why when such a liability does occur, it's usually through partnerships and proprietorships.

I'm no business finance expert, but those are my first thoughts.Specifically, their assets can't be pursued beyond their investments.

It's supposed to be a way of engendering investment that otherwise would not occur.

It's not like corporate employees can commit murder or some silliness.Yeah, Rothbard thought such libertarians were foolish also.

It seems to be one of those questions that ferrets out a left-libertarian.Those are truisms; I think he would like a more substantive answer.What would it mean for it to be "correct," without it insinuating that others have a duty to enforce their moral claims?Well, obviously, that's not in conflict with anyone else.How is your movie example, where marginal buyers fall just below the price tag, any different from any other product market?&gt;Being social and tribal is equivalent to a conscious intent of organizing violence and defining property to suppress free riding? Okay..

Yes, I think it actually is; why don't you?

&gt;Without any reasonable justification but feels.

As far as I can understand, Propertarianism doesn't set out on some Kantian/Platonic quest, but seeks to work with what humans actually demonstrate as property (when a father beats a man to death who molested his daughter, we're witnessing property concepts above the minimal physicalist model, but which are very real).

What this means is we don't have to prove anything to you about the noumenistic nature of rights, only that recognition of a portfolio of them is necessary for high levels of cooperation.

&gt;This however doesn't logically lead to the conclusions Curt and you drew.

I don't know what "this" is referring to.

&gt;You are talking about communization of social interaction.

Not like conversation or what have you, but it is True that society is by definition a communal set of acts.It's really not novel, but a starting point that we've known of since philosophy was ever written down.Well, obviously, the American nation has become something of an ailing chimera.

Under better defined times, you'd probably be scorned.It'd be better for you to give me a tl;dr, if you want any chance of me reading through that.I think it could be; coupled with dysgenic immigration, we've already shifted the Overton window.&gt; Since the cost to copy information is effectively zero

The idea, though, is that your costs of production aren't merely transferring the information (writing it to a CD + materials, or downloading it), but compensating those who took part in constructing the information as such.I don't want to ban all drugs.This is borderline child abuse, ironically only showing themselves as anti-social.

The other irony is that Hispanics don't actually respect the Bill of Rights, as evidenced by their voting habits, both here and in their native countries.I read it, but you aren't relating to how I'm relying on non-excludable goods.

Was not the persecution of Christians their exclusion?&gt;All we're concerned about is marginal costs, which are zero.

Why should you do that, though?The funny thing about that is that they are associated with low trust.&gt;Being social and tribal is just that, being social and tribal, it does not imply conscious intent to suppress free riding.

Oh, but it must, for it to exist.

&gt;And what happens when there's a conflict in what they demonstrate as property?

Adjudication, of course.

&gt;Curt actually makes several normative claims for moral behavior

It's all empirical, though.

&gt;Curt is socialist in a paradigm beyond physical property.

You might as well say societalist, society realist.

You'll have to put that in more explicitly Mengerian terms.Why, when many of the services, as Hoppe puts it, are not technically insurable risks (e.g. routine dentist visit)?&gt;The argument that marijuana is no more harmful than alcohol is specious . . . The primary action of alcohol is that of a relaxant.

Yeah, this is False.  Alcohol is a de-inhibitor, which can be a relaxant, but also to such a point where behavioral restrictions (like being an asshole and punching someone's lights out) can rapidly be removed.

Marijuana is a narrow relaxant; it can make some people look like idiots with the gibberish they can utter while high, but I've never seen someone get angry while high.  However, I've seen hundreds of people become extremely violent while drunk.

The truth of the matter is people aren't being honest about what is actually causing this clash: culture.  Westerners have a long cultural history attached to alcohol, whereas they don't with marijuana.  Empirically, alcohol is a much more harmful drug, but it's ingrained in our identity, hence why prohibition was repealed.

Now, scientificially, I have little problem with marijuana, but I will say I've never been around a weedhead I liked and respected, as such a habit tends to correlate with a do-nothing who's going no where physically, intellectually, or financially.  Obviously, this isn't all, but it's something like 20 for 20 I've met and the same for many others.

So, that's what this is really all about: a layered culture war.Yeah, but this is honestly a joke of a medical report.

Marijuana does cause some lasting metabolic effects, but it's not extreme and not like alcohol's.

I find marijuana use around me very inconvenient and I avoid people who are frequent users, for many reasons, but I don't need to hide behind poor arguments to plainly voice my view of the matter.&gt; the NRXers support your puritan mission

You really need to expand your ideological vocabulary.You're referring to free risk pooling then (which of course doesn't exist today).

&gt;Most of the rest of the service industries are run like that. You don't directly pay the cashier or the chef at McDonald's.

The problem is that routine, planned services are not insurable risks, and so what you have is consumers being pooled as one big consumer to the provider, which causes information loss, as each of those consumers has different price sensitivities.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dzm5jhguYJ0&amp;list=PLqjjPGlxuA11GkqLPlSI2qOp8A_KF7MB-This is completely False: I bear the risks via my investment.

And I am not employing an agent beyond that investment, with the rest of my assets.&gt;Your NRX vote brigade is hilarious.

I think you may have some form of paranoia.It's Scandinavian folk electronica.

The song's translated lyrics themselves are fairly ambiguous and could be about anything.

If you like Scandinavian folk rock/electronica, you may like [this one.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R1Ger_N14U0)

I really like this woman's pronunciations.&gt;If you cant answer any questions from your detractors, your ideology is horse shit.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rpc0g/there_are_farright_neocons_infiltrating_this_sub/cwq5rmq

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rlwbx/murray_rothbard_on_anarchocapitalists_perhaps_we/cwpwj6d

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rlwbx/murray_rothbard_on_anarchocapitalists_perhaps_we/cwpzhex?context=3

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rn53e/daily_discussion_thread_there_is_nothing_so_bad/cwpzc08?context=3

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rqc0m/this_place_has_gotten_really_lame/cwr2mcy

How do I get in these calls with Tucker, so I can debate him?

Do I have to write a piece on L.me saying I love brown people first?I thought you were an individualist?  Why am I responsible for what others do to you?

Moreover, I see no conspiratorial talk around me to downvote you.Because race isn't only skin deep, and I also never say we can't still have a meritorious process, just don't be shocked when 90% of blacks are excluded.&gt;What a pleasant surprise.

I think you have too much of a need for external confirmation, with me, your object of hatred, and this community.Shucks.Yes, it'd lead to artificial stunting of certain subindustries that require large amounts of capital.Haven't I been saying for a while here that I'm anti-libertine?

Cultural capital is a real thing.What's cosmopolitan about Silicon Valley?

Meritorious immigration is not one and the same thing as libertinism.

I doubt the corporations run themselves like the California government.A prosperous country?I wouldn't regard working in government or among its contractors as unethical, so long as you don't go out of your way to rent-seek or privatize the commons, but provide a real service.

Obviously, we can imagine more efficient layouts, but the State is a thing for now and it's not like everything under its stewardship isn't needed.

I don't think you should hold yourself to an impossible standard, particularly the hyper-NAP minimalist morality, which no civilization has ever been based on.Have these numbers been crunched with regard to only whites between whites?

Blacks obviously have very little income and assets, and in every country they're a part of, making countries with many blacks seem "unfair."

Actually, here's a pretty good video on [race and economy.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m788urlhe9k)&gt;**(1)** determinism is real and **(2)** thereby nobody can change their circumstances in life.

**(2)** doesn't follow from **(1)**; biological determinism is merely an explanation for reality, but the idea itself isn't going to change how people have been living anyways.

You still can do what you are going to do; there just isn't this metaphysical singularity called 'free will', completely untethered from its surrounding and interlinking causes and effects.

(Of course, "identity" is another linguistic construct, but we'll leave that aside for now.)Causal determinism can be deconstructed, too, as just an imposition our subconscious puts on to the world to help us better navigate it, but whose existence we really don't know of.You can be biologically determined and still experience external stimuli.

Now, Molyneux's views on free will probably are still silly, which makes him talking about race and IQ strange.Moreover, it's been repeatedly scientifically shown that marijuana can be a superior medicine for some kind of medical or behavioral problem.

Its impacts on the brain are actually quite sophisticated.  One guy at my university just completed his PhD on its effect on just one receptor.Almost assuredly, as the crew looked like all left-libertarians, seeking an echo chamber.

That girl in particular was quite histrionic, and doubly would be were I on that call talking about race and anti-libertinism.Not even property rights themselves are a "natural" state, but the result of their conscious defense.

This is not radically different, but a further development of civilization.Voluntaryism has been empirically shown, time and again, to not be the basis of civilization, whether it's a republic or a dictatorship.The Articles failed to keep up with the culturally, technologically, and informationally unifying times.

Given that many of the colonies were of British descent, a government over all of the colonies was inevitable in short order.http://i.imgur.com/s74jTWY.pngHistory is, of course, not a straight line, and not every people face the same conditional pressures.It was never voluntaryism, but 'liberty', in a particular framework.

Market institutions, after all, don't create themselves, What tribe is voluntaryistic?A great way to look at it is how family model relates to governing ethic: 

The ANF leads to the most individualist culture (Anglos).

Then, comes the Traditional family model (grandparents involved) (Germanics).

Then, comes the Extended Family model (Latinos, Eastern Europeans, Semites, Africans, Asians).

http://i.imgur.com/ftdqpgp.jpg

When familial loyalty is wide in scope, it makes it difficult for a government to not be nepotistic and corrupt.

Of course, the problem with the ANF is that it treads on a knife to totally dissolving the family, and that's exactly what we've seen happen to Anglos, through feminism and now single motherhood.

You might also ask yourself how Western Europe came to have only nuclear relations, and it's because of tremendous outbreeding and sending one's kids off to be servants in other families, not stay.  It's why Americans have this weird ethic of sending their kids out at 18-22, where other cultures keep the kid to eventually take care of the parents and grandparents.I don't see how biological determinism is contradicted here.Potheads run Fortune 500 companies?

Potheads work 20 hour days getting a start-up running?Cosmopolitanism is lack of responsibility for social externalities.

It is not one and the same as meritocracy.Well, not swinging an axe into someone's skull is a pretty small demand for me to participate in the fruits of the division of labor.It wouldn't be my crap, but whatever cultural emergences happen that are relevant to their particular time, place, and people.

This is really quite uncontroversial, as it's been demonstrated numerous times this is how society functions.

&gt;You are an obnoxious secularized post-modernist anti-realist.

I'm not secular in the usual sense, and I'm actually quite anti-pomo, ultimately.

It makes as much sense to group me with the pomos as it does Nietzsche (which is to say, we can see much of what they can see, but we have stronger instincts with where we go from there than them).&gt; unreasonably dangerous behaviors

Why is it unreasonably dangerous?

The only argument I can think of against limited liability is when damages done exceed investments in the company, in which case I'm guessing (hoping) there's some legal procedure that happens, but I'm not sure what it is or what it's called, as this isn't my area of expertise.What's your exact lineage, by the way?

I can obviously infer from the few pictures I've seen you're 20-50% Amerindian, if not more, but do you know the rest?I think there's a separate categorical procedure; I'll have to look at Kinsella's argument, again.Meritocracy is not one and the same as libertinism.

You don't become wealthy by having high time preferences.

&gt;I don't think it's that weird, maybe it helps take the edge off. It's not like a lot of businessmen aren't known for being drinkers, either.

I'm of course talking about heavy users.  I know a man who smokes because his ADHD makes him feel a little too anxious otherwise.  Of course, he's not a very high achiever either, but I understand his reason.

I say all this while being a high functioning alcoholic myself, so I'm not saying substance is the direct cause of my dislike, but what a person does in the total of it all.  I can have six beers in me and be reading a philosophic treatise, where someone will smoke every day and watch TV.Meat and dairy are what our pastoral ancestors (Indo-Europeans) lived off for tens of thousands of years, and it's why they were much larger and more muscular than the Proto-Europeans they conquered.

Because of that, I'm kind of ambivalent about 'overproduction' of beef and dairy.If done under the particular circumstances (heavy government distortion of the labor market), it can cause traumatic shocks to the market for labor.Always remember that the progressive political specialization is the female psychology.

What is the female psychology?  Emotional and moral orienting of men and their empirical-scientific actions (violence and science\u2014the cold dialectic is just as merciless as the knife thrust).

This orienting is accomplished by controlling the bounds of discussion, because logically sparring is not a competitive course of action, just as physically sparring is not\u2014once again, the spatial movements of the mental and the physical are the same; men don't accidentally dominate both; it's not even muscle that defines the radical difference between men and women, but neural, as demonstrated by golf, racing, and dynamic marksmanship.

So, what does this mean in total?  That it wasn't an accident that all rational and scientific communities should be hated by feminine movements (feminism vs. atheism, progressivism vs. neoreaction and Less Wrong) and that these feminine movements' primary means of reproductive combat is controlling where reasoning is allowed to roam, not out-reasoning itself\u2014exactly the same way female moral shaming of violence and taking care of children control where men are allowed to physically discharge force.

That these are deep-seated psychological strategies is why they are rarely noticed by their practitioners; they say instead, _"BECAUSE IT'S RIGHT!"_&gt;I am consistently amazed at the ability of leftarchists to write so, SO many words in their essays and only occasionally come near a decent argument/point.

I'm not: study evolutionary psychology.Not even in the right age.&gt;A) who the hell they really were, B) where exactly they came from, C) where they migrated to and how they did it, D) whose lands they migrated into, and we sure as fuck don't know E) what their diet was

These are all fairly dated questions.  [Recent work](http://press.princeton.edu/titles/8488.html) on the topic has answered these questions fairly well.

Obesity is largely an effect of blacks and Hispanics.Meta-meta-counter-meta-counter: 

I am-not-am-am-not a shill.Not sure.  It obviously won an Anthropology award in 2010, though.

I know one of my liberal humanist Classics professors recommended it to me after I started talking about the Indo-Europeans, while we were talking about the Gauls and Germania (two peoples who consumed large quantities of meat and dairy, in historical connection to IE military aristocracy migration).

This is the same work Duchesne heavily cites, in linear progression with Gimbutas.Was what?  I invoked three different authors here.

Duchesne can be considered a work in review, but the other two are primary anthropologists.&gt;has been and continues to be a massive source of leftist encroachment

And it always was.  Civilization can be thought of as taming men.

Nietzsche talks about this, and many respected evolutionary psychologists talk about this.

Western civilization in particular represents a _heavy_ taming and focusing of male energy, where other cultures only barely brunt it, into polygamy and economic stagnation.

The modern danger, though, over the last 150 years, is that we've gone too far; we've disempowered men and empowered women a little too much, taming men and then giving almost everything the female reproductive strategy demands, with no strings attached.

I don't even count myself among the Mens' Rights Activists, as their rhetoric smacks of gender egalitarianism (which shows they still are on the teat of women, which is to say still curled around their duplicitous finger\u2014'equality' is always the con of the weaker party), but their reaction against modernity certainly marks a very real war that is being waged against men.  We're approaching the converse of male-dominated Sharia law here in the West, where one gender's reproductive strategy has almost total dominion.

Now, of course, this doesn't ultimately trouble me, as I know what women are capable of and what they aren't, so I know the collapse will purge the sickness, not solidify anything.

In the meantime, I recommend the astute men out there cast off all forms of egalitarianism, individual, racial, and gender.  You'll be happier and women will probably respect, fear, and love you more.

This should all be capped off with [Nietzsche's view of the matter.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s4i11923V04&amp;t=1h9m6s)&gt;Hordes of black women, _"Mmmhmmming."_

Is it telling that this pencil-neck boy is the rhetorician of women?

What self-respecting man makes himself a 'community organizer'?

Is that what generals call themselves\u2014'community organizers'?  Hell, no.

Sounds to me like such a man was two steps from being a transgender with a severed cock.&gt;a selected trait that encourages verbosity without meaning

You're familiar with postmodernism, right?  Guess who originated it.

&gt;Or that is to say, I'm not sure how such a trait would be selected for and how it would evolve through the relatively brief time that humans have had advanced language.

Evolution has actually been happening at increased rates, due to civilization.

If you want to understand this matter, you're going to have step your game up, my friend, as it sounds like you're five layers behind where libertarian theory is.Yeah, because that's going to be all an award-winning book says.Was Harry Potter competing in the anthropology field?&gt; Duchesne can be considered a work in review, but the other two are primary anthropologists.

You really think academia awards social constructivist works equally with those dealing with Indo-Europeans?

Duchesne details in his book how many Indo-European scholars he encountered describe an aversion toward even talking about it, as the affiliation with Nazis is all too immediate.

If you win an award over Indo-European work, you probably did a damn good job. 

Anthony even 'got away' with describing the IEs as a migratory military aristocracy.You can always check [Chapter 7](http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf) yourself.Why should I care what a random leftist interloper needs?Is it any accident an anti-social headline is written by an anti-social username?&gt;American Imperialism

Does that mean you're anti-Israel, bearjew?So brave.Hayek is actually anti-cosmopolitan.I've had my nose broken; I've had my spleen ruptured; I've had my knee dislocated; I've had ribs removed from cartilage; I've broken people's legs, bloodied knuckles against face masks, knocked more than one person out with my shoulder and left to be carried off the field in a stretcher.

Given a prestigious athletic career, I think I'll trade giving and taking with anyone on Reddit.Oh, I know what it means and I know the kind of person who cares to ask.

The same boy who wouldn't ask me in person, the same boy I make squeal on the field, before sending him to the hospital.

On my lax team alone, my job was ending the consciousness of yuppy boys like you, and boy did I enjoy my work.Betas certainly enjoy the chronic insincerity of the Internet.

Enjoy your lesser existence how you will: go talk about beta soccer, I guess.Why are you dishonoring G-d, by ignoring the honest question?What's anti-social about strippers?You really don't want an obscure corner of the Internet to be your answer.&gt;those invisible boundaries you despise called borders

I'm looking forward to presenting more and more the paradigm shift that's occurring in libertarian theory over the conception of property.

Excited, really, for now I finally have a system that reconnects with the arc of history, not divorces us from it into obscure, meaningless utopianism.

Users of this system, as Darch said, can effortlessly traverse the entire political spectrum, mainstream and obscure: we aren't relegated to demanding people stop valuing what they repeatedly demonstrate they do (reputation, for example).&gt;is a social construct

It was ever the aural delicacy whenever I heard this in the few humanities classes I was required to take.

It's like, "And?  Therefore, I stop using it?  The fuck is 'knowledge'?"

&lt;befuddled SJW&gt;People still try to associate with C4SS?

I believe I have a fairly good understanding of mutualism.

Though I sympathize with having the means of production closer to the laborer, I disagree on the monetary theory and would not regressively get in the way of capitalism's trajectory.Where is the far left rising in Europe?

&gt;Refugees are not intrinsically criminals

Why not have a controlled entry process, casting aside those who fail your libertarian test?&gt;an arbitrary line

Why is it arbitrary?  It's a product of hundreds of years of culture and history.  That's arbitrary?

&gt;machine gunning people

I heard Greek frog men were sinking some of the ships.

(Please, be True.)&gt;Are the conservative muslims working in trade or owning small shops less libertarian than say french union air-France or SNCF workers?

Are they voting in Sharia?

You also invoke state-sponsored minority views: Northern Europe is still quite economically free.You don't have to call yourself a libertarian to be relatively libertarian, which Northern Europe is.

A Northern European demsoc is still much more libertarian than any other ethnic ideologue.That's well and good, but then the science is never handled in the first place.

On that, where do you stand on HBD?&gt;has played a significant role in repressing the prosperity and development of the Third World

If that were True, countries with more interaction with the West wouldn't be richer than those with less.

After a certain point, we have to accept that some of these places are just fucked up (Did the US force that African warlord to eat that little boy's heart?  To burn a man in a tire?).

It's not like the West magically came to have more economic power than these places either.

&gt;maybe Africa would have had a few semi-prosperous nations at this point as a destination for refugees

The past ten thousand years weren't testament enough?  Pre-contact, they never built a single seaworthy ship or had a two-story building.  Some places didn't even know what a wheel was.  A 70 IQ will do that to you.

I completely agree.  I see no reason to apportion benefit of cultural capital, if that same capital's undermining is being pursued.&gt;Greece, Spain, France, Italy, Belgium, Germany, Britain

The only thing I see rising in these countries is nationalist groups.

I can see some of the populist left rising in the US, alongside the populist right, but the Left rules Europe, so I can't see a populist swelling there, but it's opposite.

&gt;Increasing the marine tenfolds

That's what war forces you to do: increase martial capacity.

Especially if you set a harsh example, will you be able to get away with less capacity.

&gt;only to catch them next weeks

Hey, at some point extreme prejudice becomes the economical route.

&gt;learn by heart the answers

Haha, clearly, you underestimate what I have in mind.

&gt;Just cut the welfare state

Even without it, meritorious naturalization should still be the rule.&gt;the only reason we're not getting gulag-ed is because they've already squandered their moral capital on dildos and pensions

And because it's not in their effeminate nature to possess that strength in the first place.

The weakest don't know how to be the stronger before a system collapse already occurs.I agree that the State is not the Nation, but I think some libertarians have to be very careful how willfully blind they make themselves to group dynamics, because at that point it's head-in-the-sand vulnerability, a priest handling Uranium.

&gt;no moral claim backing up the line. The line is protected by force

Well, obviously, the only respectable ethics is that of the warrior.

If you're a self-righteous pacifist, maybe I'll attend your funeral.

&gt;There is no meaningful first user principle inherent to the line.

You're probably employing a physicalist conception of property; I think there are more kinds.

&gt;Take away the incentive, and they will stop coming.

Say we do that and pull out of the Middle East (which I see no reason to, as these cultures don't have the institutions to extract oil and gas anywhere as well as us, hence the imported US engineers in Saudi Arabia, though I agree we could still do a better job than we presently are), do you really think Islamists won't attack our way of life at all?

&gt;Retain the incentive, and no amount of weaponry will stop the ocean from rising.

Oh, I doubt that: the West has the weaponry to end the rest of the world a hundred times over.&gt;the average Batswana is probably more libertarian than them

http://i.imgur.com/2yVo1WC.jpg

And even this doesn't take into account the effects Northern Europe has had on the rest of the world, which is essentially _every single other name_ high on that list.I don't really put much ideological reliance on southern Europeans, for very sensible historic reasons.

I'd be interested to know more about the East Germans.  What I will say, though, is that anti-capitalism isn't inherently leftist.&gt; Would ISIS have become a thing without US money?

Probably, given Sharia law.

&gt;Our foreign policy has played a MASSIVE role in shaping the Third World.

Building a sand castle doesn't change that it was sand regardless.

&gt;I think the "magic" has had a healthy dose of violence to help natural advantages along.

As ironic as the pacifist kind of libertarians may experience it, I perfectly want and endorse a violently enforced republic.

&gt;Not interaction with the CIA or US military.

Well, hey, it's not like you can export your same property institutions all the time: after a certain point, a gun has to be the arbiter.

&gt;They both had millennia of backwards cultural institutions.

Well, that's not True.

&gt; Yet, in five short decades, they have morphed into economic powerhouses.

East Asians have ~105 IQs, low time preferences, and low crime rates.  We didn't do that to them; it just made it easier for capitalism to interface with them.

&gt;Yet, in five short decades, they have morphed into economic powerhouses.

And yet India willfully refused.

&gt;I am simply saying, maybe a few moderately prosperous nations could have arisen at this point.

Only in the way a random island in the Caribbean has: wealthy external command.

&gt;They can stop bombing every semi-stable government in the Third World that isn't completely on board with our foreign policy, and they can stop providing free-ride welfare for those too lazy or dumb to work of their own volition.

My foreign policy would certainly look different, as Trump says, "that I can tell you."&gt;You own your own body. nobody else can control your body directly.

Jesus is the one True savior.&gt;it is better not to see them being made

Ah! but that is [how I commune.](http://i.imgur.com/Xmeb4a7.jpg)&gt;They are not.

https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/&gt; You mean to say, the only ethics that will survive is that of the warrior.

I do, and reality is on my side, for only the warrior navigates reality directly, the priest invents metaphysical planes to control others, but is powerless when confronted with a realist.

They just magically follow Northern Europeans everywhere they go, and avoid Africans wherever they go.The main difference between Propertarianism and your system is that more conceptions of property are recognized: 

&gt;That the human concept of property is broad in scope, encompassing their bodies, their physical property, genetic relations, associations, opportunities, norms, and even cherished memories and beliefs. That humans treat as property all that they have acted to invest in. And that they will only invest in what they can treat as property. And when that entire scope of property is enumerated, all human behavior is reducible to expressions of changes in the the state of property, and all emotions reactions to changes in the state of property.

--

&gt;I. PERSONAL PROPERTY

&gt;Personal property: \u201cThings an individual has a Monopoly Of Control over the use of.\u201d

&gt;a) Physical Body

&gt;b) Actions and Time

&gt;c) Memories, Concepts and Identities: tools that enable us to plan and act. In the consumer economy this includes brands.

&gt;d) Several Property: Those things external to our bodies that we claim a monopoly of control over.

&gt;II. INTERPERSONAL PROPERTY

&gt;Cooperative Property: \u201crelationships with others and tools of relationships upon which we reciprocally depend.\u201d

&gt;a) Mates (access to sex/reproduction)

&gt;b) Children (genetics)

&gt;c) Familial Relations (security)

&gt;d) Non-Familial Relations (utility)

&gt;e) Consanguineous property (tribal and family ties)

&gt;g) Racial property (racial ties)

&gt;g) Organizational ties (work)

&gt;h) Knowledge ties (skills, crafts)

&gt;i) Status and Class (reputation)

&gt;III. SHAREHOLDER PROPERTY

&gt;a) Recorded And Quantified Shareholder Property (physical shares in a tradable asset)

&gt;b) ARTIFICIAL PROPERTY: (property created by fiat agreement) Intellectual Property.

&gt;c) FORMAL INSTITUTIONAL PROPERTY : Formal (Procedural) Institutions: Our institutions: Religion (including the secular religion), Government, Laws.

&gt;d) INFORMAL INSTITUTIONAL PROPERTY: Informal (Normative) Institutions: Our norms: manners, ethics, morals, myths, and rituals that consist of our social portfolio and which make our social order possible.

&gt;\u201cThose properties in which we have invested our forgone opportunities, our efforts, or our material assets, in order to aggregate capital from multiple individuals for mutual gain.\u201d

This difference in the conception of what is property leads to your system being polycentric and this one monocentric.  You break down society into smaller pieces, whereas this one more intelligently integrates.&gt;Like the wave of former Ron Paul supporters that jumped into the Bernie Sanders bandwagon, this phenomenon seems to only reveal just how shallow understanding of ancap ideas has been in this community, probably all along. 

I was an ancap even before Ron Paul got popular.  I read more treatises in the first year than most of you have ever.

&gt;dives uncritically into its worldview

Are you wanting to spar, then?It's not patriarchal.&gt;In the sense how everyone uses the term. Of course, I'm sure you have some convenient way of redefining such a term.

Aristocracy isn't just some other tier of tyranny, but rule via empirical-scientific demonstration.

The best have no need for deception and are capable of investing in the commons.

&gt;Politics is not rocket surgery.

No, it's more complicated.

&gt;The criticisms of his work are pretty devastating.

Can you show me the ones you're agreeing with?

&gt;they're lost in the noise of far more pertinent institutional factors

What are those?  The ones that make blacks do poorly in both Western and African institutions?

&gt;You advocate for the abolition of liberal democracy.

Certainly, democracy causes an uncooperative war between different interests, where a superior orientation is possible.

&gt;All authoritarian rulers become reactionaries and conservatives

Pol Pot wasn't.

&gt;What decline? The West is richer than ever before. The US and Europe are fantastically powerful and wealthy civilizations.

You don't see the growing fiscal compromise?

&gt;There is no such thing as "moral commons".

Property is itself an example.&gt;The exotic-color haired girls

_Mmm._

They look [like this,](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=95ijcOi7qEE) right?  Right?It just occurred to me I should monetize me entering WGS classes.Stopped being relevant four years ago.&gt;NR is basically Libertarianism + racism?

No.  Neoreaction is a basic bitch version of Nietzscheanism, which was then later surpassed by Curt's Propertarianism, neither of which is simple neo-Nazism.Moreover, we've by now expanded into not just being concerned with trust, but having a wider sense of what property is.So, why post it?  The guy is obviously more curious about us in particular, not the disaffected conservative losers over at /r/DE.Have you read Curt's glossary and required reading list?

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3s5fgk/advocates_of_alternative_nonfamily_and/cwuor5vI swear half of you new accounts are just my old followers.A beautiful example of both female and African evolutionary strategies.[None of the behavior is accidental.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3unvk9/even_science_is_under_attack_by_the_thought_police/cxgdjc8)BLM was never legitimate and it was never anything but simple black ethnocentrism.Where was Ted Cruz "racist"?

And what's wrong with guns?I'm not Christian, but you're kidding yourself if you're thinking American culture wasn't white Anglo-Saxon Protestant throughout 80% of its history.

The Anglos heavily precede even the Germans on this continent.

The WASP section of the country still votes 70-30 Republican.Except that Islam does have a 1400 year history of anti-libertarianism.ale, one day, you're going to wake up and finally realize you're not a capitalist, but an autonomist.Yes, because Middle Easterners don't have a rich history of sectarian war.[This guy?](https://www.youtube.com/user/AaronClarey)You can personally want to be an honest man and a benefactor, but you'd be demonstrating a high trust aristocratic ethic, not a low trust NAP minimalist ethic ("as long as it's voluntary").

If you support a system of "as long as it's voluntary," you license a great deal of lying and manipulative behavior, contrasted with a system that explicitly punishes it, "voluntaryness" be damned.It depends on the kind of libertarian: if it's the "as long as it's voluntary" kind, then it's universal in that minimal regard, but particular in the majority of remaining morality."As long as it's voluntary" is indeed not taking into account effects on others.

"He voluntarily agreed to pay $20,000 for that car, when it was really more worth $13,000, but he agreed to it!"The more one develops a worldview or an understanding in some field, the more one is required to use terminology to consolidate one's writings.

That doesn't mean however that I'm trying to deceive you: every word I use is definable for you.Because Saddam was a relatively secular dictator.

It's not like Bush caused Islam to be the religion it is.1750 China says otherwise.Fascism isn't ultimately an ideology of the Left.

I can see certain plebeian syndicalist manifestations being of the Left, sure, but not fascism's actual aristocratic intellectual roots.&gt;the world may not have industrialized without it

That's not True, and I'm not saying that because I frown on European slavery.

&gt;Slaves were both factory workers and suppliers of cheap (no wages to pay!)

This isn't even in keeping with the world historian establishment's narrative, where the West only industrialized and China didn't because the former had higher wages, incentivizing investments in capital.

And this narrative itself is also mistaken.That one uses slaves does not mean it's the cause of industrializing, and you're still running into the logical problem of why industrialize with cheap labor.&gt;and no america isn't that important we were minor players back then

That's not True, actually: America became an integral asset for coal, and eventually became a majority trading partner.&gt;No. In the 17th-18th centuries, Britain waged war to successfully monopolize sea routes to India, the West Indies, etc. to establish the Empire. They were, by far, the largest international, pre-industrial trade network. They used this violent, naval network for two things: import of raw materials, and protectionism (meaning, to rob India of its industrial technology, and then refuse India's imports).

What is the purpose of this statement?  To morally condemn the Brits for doing more effectively to other civilizations what they wanted to do to them?

&gt;Here's one on how so-called primitive anarchists actually lived, contra your original statement that they lived in a "consent [sic] state of war":

Actually, the primitive hunter-gatherers did attack each other in murder raids.  The artificial mortality rate is estimated at 25%, higher than even the Punic wars.

And when they were transitioning into horticulture, hierarchy really came to the fore.

Chimpanzees go on murder raids.  Gorillas commit infanticide.  I don't know where you guys get your idyllic fantasy.&gt;Do we have trade numbers from early empires?

We have data on China.Bonobos actually aren't that peaceful either; it's True they're not quite as violent or male-dominated as chimps, but they're no day at the park either.

And hunter-gatherers were not peaceful; that's a dated Marxist myth, which has since been empirically refuted.I recommend [Chapters 1 and 2 from the former Marxist, Duchesne.](http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf)

The use of the phrase "high wages" and "higher wages" exists in his writing, but also Frank and O'Brien, Sinologists he counters.Many consequentialist ancaps moved on into the the alt-right, and have deep roots with this subreddit, gradually bringing over other consequentialist ancaps.

If you want a basic bitch discussion of ancap, there are a number of FB groups.A market is not one and the same as 'open, rational forum'.Oh, Capchem and Z3F have interests: intellectually shielding basic bitch ancaps just isn't one of them.I actually agree with the author: NAP minimalist libertarianism is deliberately autistic and does not have economics on its side.Eh, he supports and opposes all kinds of asceticism, for doing interesting, sublimated things.  Read the essay.What's your broader thesis here?  Hierarchy doesn't morally upset me; what of what you may be proposing that has the potential to upset me is claiming the West developed merely as the accidental result of internalizing other cultures' work (dependency theory).No, there's a gradient: high trust Protestant, middle trust Catholic / southern European, low trust Levantine / African / Arab.Dual-ethic, polylogical, ethnocentric, like Arabs and Levantines.

"Do as I say, not as I do"\u2014the ethic of gibsmedat.Why not affirm the world as it is?  Why is it ultimately profane?

Even the worst, the ugliest, I interpret as pregnancy of greatness.

Have a world-accepting religion, not world-rejecting.&gt;So a little bit of the fallacy is acceptable?

I more mean social externalities can lead to not-perfect individualism.If you enjoy being an economic actor, why morally restrain yourself to voluntary behavior?

&gt;high risk-avoidance 

What could be higher risk and more costly than creating and investing in commons, the aristocratic ethic?

What could be more risk-averse than abandoning society to low trust ghetto ethics?

&gt;engage in the markets and help to destroy the state

The State exists because people hate being cheated, and the market exists because cheating is punished.

If you want to destroy the State, you don't license low trust cheating, but continue wiping it out, ultimately with the rent-seeking State itself.

http://www.propertarianism.com/2015/05/10/the-evolution-of-suppression/We all have our own gods and religions, our own apex values.&gt;You attempt to claim that segregation creates economic productivity, while the most productive economy in the history of the world is a melting pot.

That's not True, actually.  For 80-90% of American history, you had to be Western European to be allowed in.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_United_States_immigration_legislation

And we had our highest growth while we were almost entirely WASP, and our lowest growth and most hatred for markets since we've become much more diverse.&gt;The largest proportion of immigrants of any nation, across our history?

Immigrants of Western European background.

It's only in the past half-century that we let Latinos immigrate, who overwhelmingly vote for expansions in government.Singapore is actually harshly against open borders.

You have to be of great technical background to be allowed in, which almost always means white European.American blacks are still balkanized, and children of immigrant Latinos actually become more violent with time.&gt;Genetically, hybrids are best.

That's scientifically not True, actually.

'Hybrid vigor' only occurs where one population group suffers from a tremendous number of double recessive genetic diseases, where a brief mixing with another population group provides relief.

When a population group mixes, nothing special happens in itself, just an averaging of traits.

So, mulattoes are an averaging of European and African mental and physical qualities: they're not smarter than Europeans (less intelligent, actually) and they're not more athletically gifted where an African is.

To actually get something better, you need _positive selection_, not mere mixing.Oh, I see societies as very organic.  I don't categorically oppose genetic mixing; I just prefer eugenics and disprefer dysgenics.It's in Chapter 1 of [_The Uniqueness of Western Civilization_](http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf), a book you should read anyways, so I don't feel guilty having you discover his citations when reading through that chapter.

&gt;I have not heard this word used in this manner, as a descriptive catch-all term for political groups.

It's for people who affirm the fundamental Western way of life, of being spiritually aggressive anti-egalitarians, searching for knowledge, conquest, and excitement, not static culture and placidity.Cognition, especially spatial cognition, is the most materially and energetically demanding biological enterprise we engage in.

It's why male brains are much larger than females', and why men are dramatically more capable with dynamic spatial events (e.g. hand-eye coordination).

It simply doesn't add much for a woman in a dedicated female role to benefit from great spatial cognition, and thus wouldn't be as strongly selected for as with the male gender role, which lives and dies over spatial cognition.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=F29SrufZyF4From the very beginning, they thought they were on to something when they said blacks are disproportionately in prison.

When they encountered HBD rhetoric which triangulates blacks as simply being more violent, they would immediately shut down the discussion and engage in polylogical debate techniques (some of which Adam is experiencing in this video).

This is extremely common behavior for population groups which originate in low trust parts of the world: Sub-Sahara Africa, the Levant, the Arabian Peninsula, etc..

Groups which evolved in these environments never quite made it as far as the more northern climes did in breeding trustful behavior and purging licentious behavior.

It's directly linked to family size and a political-economic division of labor: ANFs are the highest trust, with the most universal morality; Southern Europeans' extended family is inbetween, and Islamic Arabs and Africans are at the lowest, with genocidal tribalism.Yes, though, it's not so much the theological validity of Christianity as much as its institutional effects on breeding and political behavior.

The origin of building trust is with the Indo-Europeans, though, which is how the Pagan Greco-Romans were able to exhibit it prior to Christening.

Christianity's universal ethics was more a consummation of the broader trend.

http://www.propertarianism.com/2015/06/15/explained-the-christian-idea/

I'm heavily anti-Christian for the Semitic undertones, which seek to sneak in an anti-aristocratic slave ploy against higher men, but I have no problem affirming the political economic effects it represented for Europeans.

(I just disagree with Curt that its identity is necessary, as the Indo-European aristocratic ethics already was out-group meritocratic.)My advice concerning college right now at credit-inflated prices: only go if your field near-absolutely requires it (traditional engineering fields, like mechanical, electrical, and chemical; and then science fields with steep PhD credential requirements, like biomedicine).

For these fields, even at credit-inflated tuition prices, they still pay _big_ dividends for going, especially if your exposure is something like only a four-year BSc in ChemE, and then you go on to work in oil and gas.

This would be the most extreme return, with the less extreme returns being the PhD scientist route, but even here, you just have to make it through the $10k-$40k debt to acquire the BSc, then you get paid to finish the PhD a sum which you can so easily support yourself with that you can pay off any existing student debt before graduation, if that's what you'd want to do.

If you are not studying something STEM, but are absolutely positive you can get into a graduate program that will pay a large enough stipend, then it's not necessarily financially dumb to get a BA in something non-STEM.  If you will not be going to graduate school, getting a BA in something non-STEM will probably be a large money sink with zero or minimal employment return.

That time would be better spent networking, teaching yourself about your desired field through heavy reading in your free time, and forcing your way into your desired field via painstakingly built contacts and demonstrated deep knowledge and original thought.

Another non-BSc route is where one doesn't study something liberal arts, but doesn't want to complete an engineering degree.  You can get hired with just a high school diploma as just a lab tech right now today and gradually work your way into a given field to be a decently paid tech, but the by far more common route will be to complete either a two year associates program in a vocational field or some kind of IT/medical technology certification.

If you're willing to do this, you can quite quickly find yourself decent employment ($35k-40k/yr) and at minimal/zero cost.I'm not going to tell you to cut your dick off, ale, and I don't want you to fully experience that.

And life can never not be a series of pre-rational value discriminations.  Why did I do that?  Why am I me?  Because I am.  I am thus and will be thus.

The psychology which never stops gazing at its own navel, needing Ultimate Justification is weak in the stuff of life.  Think of dancing.  What is it?  Why do people do it?  It's its own justification.  Power enjoying itself for itself.As _a research program_ (which is what 'the ancap movement' largely was), it was both ethics and science.

The theoretical movement has since burned out and completed its task, passing the torch on to Propertarianism, a system much more scientifically endowed to handle questions of how people actually behave, not how some might want them to.Each demographic's youth varies in stupidity, though: 

http://i.imgur.com/RYVoM0I.jpgAnd God if Konkin couldn't dress or groom himself.

Not an accident.  Jeff Tucker might be the only left-libertarian with enough self-pride in his appearance, but even there: "DYEL, brah?"Being hated by leftist fags is convenient pre-filtering.Tell that to this gorgeous body.One day, you may realize that political philosophies are investigated and promulgated by people.

These people represent an organic vessel, with their own personal interests, which not uncommonly overlap.  When these people chat with each other, those personal interests often come up.

It's simply more efficient to do it that way and have personal discussions with people you've already built up trust with.  This dynamic is known as a 'movement' and 'culture'.&gt; Someone should equally goto college as they should go dancing.

That's [exactly right.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=B7lc2069PQc&amp;t=2m50s)[Incurably Olympian.](http://i.imgur.com/mVZFEbB.gifv)There's, of course, always a gradient in ideologues, and on every subreddit.

Being that ancap is a research program that has already finished its trajectory, it makes sense for those who are on the other side of it to be interacting with those moving through.

Not sure why you bring up something mundane like weed every time I talk about Propertarianism, though.&gt;Are you a troll?

Not at all.

&gt;What do you even mean by trust when we were talking about sectarian violence?

High trust involves a gradual pacifying and integration of out-groups, into a universal ethic.

Northern Europe is an example of this gradual, outbred process.

Places where this has not taken place much involve much more sectarian violence and much less outgroup trust.

The added result is these places lack extensive capital accumulation or respect for markets.I answered that.I don't need objective value to analyze the political economics of trust.Northern Europe is certainly a result of much aristocratic investment in moral commons, yes.

It's why it went on to generate the richest economies, scientific innovations, and cultural achievements.Moderation of what, though?

The Propertarian paradigm shift is coming and moderating against it would increase the dead-end casualties of the ancap movement.&gt;then set up violent trade barriers

Like Islam did to Europe?  And like caste India and imperial China are saints.

&gt;most of the industrial rev's first tech was stolen from the East

Actually, the Greeks were already playing with an industrial revolution themselves, and the Indo-Europeans gave quite a bit to China.

Is one of your claims the West caused the East to fail in their industrial revolution?  That couldn't be more False, as China had the material wealth to do it, but not the political-cultural impetus.

The Malthusian analysis really does apply quite well to static China, who was already economically waning between 1500-1750.  Much of their increase in wealth was non-innovative land expansion, using the same farming techniques.Oh, you can certainly continue to be discriminating, but world-rejecting?  Now, that's an entirely other proposition.&gt;redditcommentsearch

[lolwut](http://i.imgur.com/sfXzc14.jpg)lolI think I like the drunk Cialis better.&gt; in the end following the NAP as heuristics provides me with the most net gain

And yet nations don't follow your NAP.

&gt;Why should I waste my time attacking people if I can pay for their services or getting paid to serve them?

If they raise their buy-out price well-above their physical removal cost.

&gt;with a better service, a private one

It's never going to be private.  People demanded the State precisely because they don't tolerate privatization of all gain.

Indeed, the institution of property rights is itself 

&gt;low trust can be easily solved by insurance companies

Which presume enough property rights to exist in the first place.  Markets don't bootstrap themselves into existence, but are a deliberate sociobiological construction.

&gt;while at same time advocating that white people will inherently restrain themselves to the NAP because of their genetic stock

I'm not an advocate of your NAP.It's not that hard to tell when someone's uncharacteristic and potentially inebriated.

Like he said, live a little.That comment series was actually hilarious, not toxic.

&gt;The NRxers are constantly talking about how honorable alcohol is but how deviant all other less harmful drugs are.

The berserkers drank, not smoked a doobie and hugged a tree.  Just sayin'."Holding" involves not yacking, not not being disinhibited at all.

The disinhibition is the whole point.&gt;"Expelling all cannabis users to the arctic wilderness" is a pretty fucking big deal.

I never advocated that, so there's no need to paint yourself as a victim yet.

The framework I promulgate here is the Propertarian one, which is calm and scientific, not something from a random 4channer who faps to Nazi anime.

I myself would be considered somewhat deviant, with my interests in art, music, and women.

&gt;If you were dedicated to integrity rather than dedicated to NRx, you would call these people out

Well, I already kicked Darch out of my circle months ago for being dishonest and manipulative of ancaps.

It's clear his main ~~obsession~~ interest is the Joos and how to out-Jew them, not virtue ethics, like me and mine.My man with the perm is usually quick to respond there, when I get the itch to swing the Nietzsche hammer.The interesting thing is that moderation of just simple idiocy and shitposting would result in the alt-right getting an even stronger hold here.You must have a long history here.&gt;NRxers pissing people off

Just posting some Rushton pisses people off.

Hurt feelings being a criterion is asking for anti-scientific feminine actors to slowly take over and tank a subreddit.&gt;Why would you paint yourself as a cuck?

Deviant is not one and the same as that, and I don't think "cuck" has ever been used to demarcate someone who's merely different, but someone who has a weird fetish for the downfall of their own kind.

Obviously, the tradition of the West is one of the Faustian spirit, aggressively pushing the boundaries of what kind of higher existence is possible, not culturally static Puritanism.

The latter is more Sino than Euro, so if anyone gives you the impression otherwise, they're a philosophical and historical idiot.

&gt;yet I dont refrain from calling you out for you endorsement of Cialis' potatoe behavior and the like.

I think you're probably just reacting to a feeling of rejection that was never there, so you're predisposed to not find his poking fun with you humorous.

I'm still the same transhumanist I was before, still favorable of psychedelics and nootropics.  It's not like my values have changed.Well, that definitely sounds like me.The more accurate term would be political nihilism, and even here, everyone has their subnation tribes and preferences.I think lying by omission should be punished, yes.

Larger states exist instead of smaller ones due to protection from low trust behavior.

When you build up a high trust ethic, you have less of a need for a state (think old time WASP neighborhoods where you can sleep with your doors unlocked vs. a Johannesburg stop sign).No, I favor meritorious naturalization, which removes unqualified whites and accepts qualified non-whites.&gt;Hmm, I wonder if the State has anything to do with that... Oh shit it does!

Blacks are balkanized voluntarily, actually, and despite state subsidization for them to enter richer neighborhoods.

Blacks are balkanized into ethnic tribes to an even greater degree in Africa, actually.

&gt;Dude that's ridiculous even for you.

Well, it is True, due to immigrants tending to select for relatively more enterprising and cautious behavior, for the first generation.&gt;The "quite a bit to China" didn't include the key textile manufacturing technology of the first factories.

I'm referring more to horse domestication and the wheel.

&gt;It sounds like you've read exactly one book on economic history

Oh, no, I've gone through multiple historical accounts\u2014just one of them was 1,568 pages\u2014within the ancap paradigm.

From here, [I'm going through the bibliography of Curt Doolittle,](http://www.propertarianism.com/reading-list/) as I transition out of anarcho-capitalism.

If you're utterly convinced by the Sinology that Frank started in the later 20th century (I see you parroting some of his talking points, which have now thoroughly spread in world history studies), then I can't recommend enough you read Chapters 2 and 3 of [this work](http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf), which thoroughly debunks the "the West isn't special; here's some stuff on China" narrative that slowly built up over the past century.

I know you're a Marxist whose psychology depends on the West not being special and man being passive and reactive, which is why Duchesne, a former Marxist who understands that need, would be a good read.Well, I think the 'individual' is no less an invention than the Nation, and I don't think a 'True individual' really exists: I think people's identities are largely a product of their lineage, being of much the same genetic material that accomplished past deeds.

It isn't that I don't want to achieve, but that I have no problem affirming and being glad for the existence of the Faustian spirit the Indo-Europeans brought.&gt;The upper-end of blue collar technical work is in a weird place right now. Most blue collar kids aren't smart enough to get it, but most kids smart enough to get it wouldn't even consider a community college or technical school program.

Yep, exactly what happened to me.  I have a decent background in software and electronics, enough to see what was going on in robotics manufacturing and general PLC technician work, but that also meant I wanted a bigger prize (I'm also a polymath to an almost unhealthy level, studying everything under the sun).

Certain companies try to impress upon state governments and schools to turn out more PLC technicians, but the Anglo delusion of 'an aristocracy in everyone' has reached max singularity, so idiots get a BA and then work in the service industry for half the pay they'd get as a PLC technician.Two guns mutualist himself, humanispherian.Nihilism is mostly a metaphysical dimension and only peripherally takes on connoted normative implications.

As for "authority," every governing system of course needs authority.Well, it's all semantic frameworks from here, less novel logical points.What's a better phrase for basic bitch?

For me, it's a useful phrase for "novice who walks around annoying and insulting veterans who know much more."&gt; Well that's an easy thing to test. Do adopted babies in the US from China, Africa or other foreign lands identify more with their genetic cousins from the old country or their countrymen and adoptive family?

Actually, mixed children do indeed experience more existential confusion and depression.

&gt;You're a collectivist because you're weak.

More sheer metaphysics, not that I'm not proud of my local accomplishments.&gt;/r/libertarianmeme&lt;readies shotgun&gt;&gt;I believe in equality between men and women

What does that mean?  Men and women have different brain morphologies and evolutionary behaviors.Hoodrat women give good head, stop being sexist.That made sense.Oh, certainly.  I studied almost everything under the sun with high marks, and I was scouted as a physical athlete, playing on highly selective teams.  All of that took stoical dedication.As a libertarian, you have difficulty distinguishing the category of interference with your libertarian psychology.

I don't disagree that I'm interfering with your low trust bourgeois ethic, but that doesn't make me a socialist: I'm even more anti-plebeian than I am anti-your bourgeois kind.

As Haidt found, only the conservative psychology fully beholds the other two psychologies: you can only barely understand me, and it's often through a cartoonish lens, where I perfectly understand your values.

&gt;economic calculation problem, maybe you haven't understood

Oh, I understand it perhaps better than almost every single person here.&gt;An equal vote

Why majoritarian voting rather than their own separate House, as Curt advocates?

If that's not the case, I certainly don't opt for them having any vote, as they aren't adapted for politics and have already proven that they simply dissolve the family, leading to extreme dysgenics and capital liquidation.Curt thinks feminism only became destructive because we made the mistake of not giving them their own House, how the proletariat was.

I daresay it's not enough in my psychology to want to understand all the bourgeois intuitions Curt has, but that doesn't stop many of them from being effective.

I prefer glorious action on the field than brilliant ah-hahing about economics.Oh, the State certainly is a social parasite itself, where a future stage limits and removes it, too.That blacks are more ethnocentric and psychopathic?I'm just the guy who swings the axe.

No, I'm still in the process of understanding everything.  His site is very unorganized, bourgeois economic writing isn't my main interest, and I'm sort of kind of just waiting for the release of his treatise.Moldbug never was an actually proper response to Modernity, but a Jewish further extenuation of the diasporic market-obsessed strat (though an argument can be made that Curt isn't either, by himself, not at least without the Nietzsche-Evola-J\u00fcnger branch applying the hot Faustian irons to his otherwise mere Japanese, non-Faustian high trust).

&gt;they aren't adapted for politics
&gt;&gt;How?

You've dated women, right?

&gt;many of the most passionate advocates for it have been men

Oh, I don't care about these 0.016% beta/omega men.

&gt;It's rising popularity might have coincided with women getting the right to vote but I don't think you can just blame that on women.

Well, it was really the women who had a biological interest in voting to make the State their husband.Well, the Anglos are a little more invested in this severe streak of pacification of 'scary tendencies'.

He also has Aspergers, too, from what I understand.

It's obvious and he admits that he more comes from the libertarian psychology, which is mechanistic and bourgeois, whereas myself and those around me more come from the conservative, aristo, warrior psychology, that is more interested in immediate fighting than Jewish hee-heeing over interest calculations.Oh, sure: 

http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0191886901000290

http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0191886912004047

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monoamine_oxidase_A#Aggression_and_the_.22Warrior_gene.22

http://www.unz.com/pfrost/we-are-not-equally-empathic/

This is just the tip of the iceberg, too.  For more, one could intimately study post-apartheid South Africa corruption.Russia has for thousands of years been in need of a ~~conning~~ ruling ideology.

Their entire history is one of slaves.  It's going to take another thousand years to make them demand anything but tyrannous liars.The insistence I don't 'hurt' you is itself a positive demand on me, for what you want me to do for you, that is not 'hurt' you.

I could want to rape your wife, and the insistence I don't could be a greater psychic cost for me than the insistence I give you a free sandwich.

Human action is human action is human action.&gt;Maybe if the the threat is degrading from 'a state' to "a voluntary collective of like-minded individuals", then the solution will also be seen (by the general populous) to degrade from state to "a voluntary collective of like-minded individuals".

Why should that follow?  And Islamic terrorists do want to create states, very large ones.Who thinks war doesn't have costs ...?Actually, states are violently overthrown all the time.  I'm not sure a state has ever collapsed peacefully.

What your instincts are probably more referring to is an 'orderly, lawful reduction of the State', not anti-social chaos.

But, even with the former, such a lawful process and decree would need, at every point, the possibility of tremendous force used to carry it out.

The West knew more freedom than China not because it was better at moralizing, but because of its decentralized circle of aristos (a Greek term which simply meant 'best warriors' back then), who were physically capable of executing a monarch were he to get too far out of line.

The divided branches of government and the American Second Amendment were direct echoes of aristocratic rule, rule by a circle of capable decentralized force.  This decentralism is the inherent requirement to scientifically demonstrated meritocracy, however it must not fear, but love the heroic Faustian spirit, or it won't be able to hold anyone accountable and will choose slavery to the lying snake-priests of the State every time.

Almost every veteran legislator and lobbyist has committed enough crimes against the Nation and the polity to warrant summary execution.  We may even have the force to carry it out right now, but we lack a language and framework to carry it out lawfully, orderly, and systematically, something that can achieve scientific consensus and be stable going forward.

That's what Propertarianism is about, creating the language that will secure scientific meritocracy, rule by the empirically capable, who don't need to lie to the masses.  Modernity is a result of the priests slowly capturing the masses and using them against the aristos; we need to gradually break this pincer, and through the very method that makes one aristocratic: heroic demonstration against deceit and construction of commons, which reveals a psychology too rich to need to be parasitic.What greater method of exterminating a liar than the inescapable demand for operational testimony?

Bring the cockroaches into the sunlight, rather than try to out-scurry them in the dark.

And how does one know one isn't oneself a cockroach if not in the sunlight?

The way forward is obvious and has history on its side.The war-like Faustian spirit is great, but it won't be stable if it's not given a scientific ruling framework.What heroism do you value?  Do you have such a notion?It stems from most ancaps being mere bourgeoisie, which is the timid, mechanistic libertarian psychology, interested in monetary phenomena, not landed phenomena, the object of the conservative psychology, which is aristocratic, war-like, and connected to social channels libertarians aren't.

Thus, talks of being violent send the bourgeoisie scurrying and ducking.  Most of this sub comes from the unassuming middle and upper middle class.  Members of the warrior psychology these days come from the 'criminal' class, if anything, given what has been accomplished against the Western way of life in modernity, where the plebeians and bourgeoisie were lured against the aristos with talks of a more placid, peaceful world.

These ancaps are not Faustian.  Were they, they wouldn't be ~~wage slaves~~ 'capitalists', but entrepreneurs.  They can't even be a warrior in _economic matters_, let alone with actual metal.

No, ancaps fear such a Faustian world, hence why their utopia is nothing but modernity made even more modern.

Regarding why the Left is willing to adopt more violent rhetoric: it's because plebeian movements have always liquidated commons.  They don't have the strength to build them, only threaten their liquidation, so it's fairly cheap from that evo strat to shout "kill the pigs!"

And as regards the alt-right, [I explained](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3v50wr/ancaps_what_are_your_opinions_on_the_more/cxkpk4w) we're waiting for a more orderly process of identifying the liars in a public manner.  That is part of the conservative psychology: it's more concerned with commons protection and expansion, not recklessly burning everything down.Arete is actually Indo-European in origin; it's the linguistic origin of aristo itself, meaning "military courage and excellence," not idle Victorian Christian virtue.1-6 isn't really that left-wing, but represents something more in the aristocratic tradition.

Your insistence on your direction of transfers is, though.  I believe in commons constructions and protection, but selective taxation isn't the method.

It's True, however, that the rich and poor have different goals and thus require different rewards for playing by the rules.It's not for racism that I'm bringing forth a critique of your worldview, but your Victorian Christian values, which are Kantian, Platonic, and cowardly, not Aristotelian, Faustian, and heroic.

"Pereat Mundus" is the ethic of the world-denying coward priest.  It shouldn't be "though," but "so that."Boy, you're a dense fucker, to not understand how "Pereat Mundus" is life-denying.Yes, I wrote as much in my comment to the thread itself.

That I and mine are not merely bourgeois is how we eventually fell out of ancap, and even when we were ancaps, we were quite quickly the consequentialist kind, not in need of moralizing about peace.

I was an ascetic 'imperialist conservative' before entering libertarianism (the economic arguments were just too good, when I finally heard them; I always laughed at leftist moralizing).  Going into Nietzscheanism was coming back to my roots.  The guys around me similarly began with militant backgrounds.It's hardly my fault if you can't see the arena you've been in.

Holding to an ideal that destroys the world is not noble, but the intentional revenge of a coward.It gets back to that comment I wrote you about Stirner v. Nietzsche.

Stirner is the mere criminal, where Nietzsche is the aristo.

Society functions on commons creation and protection, which involves promising, commanding, and obeying.  Ethics of loyalty, heroism, and honor.  Criminals are not True to these things, where an aristo is.

It's True both can act violently against the modern status quo, but they have different endgames in mind.

They are both Faustian, which is why we overlap, but we are rich enough to create, not only destroy.And Tucker is predictably an effeminate, bourgeois coward.Islam is itself imperialistic, from its very inception.&gt;who is essentially the mainstream GOP

That's why Rove and Krauthammer are shitting themselves he's so high in the polls.It's all relative to alternatives, and given how much Trump has talked about it, it's an entertaining possibility.How is he a 'bandwagon faggot'?  He's been with me for a while.Fire in the belly is good, but not if you don't know how to wield it intelligently.

You're not doing that with these random flailings.&gt; it is hard to link behavior to genes, because all humans have super similar gene sets

That's not the reason, as we can still establish genetic differences fairly easily.

The actual difficulty is that behavior is extremely polygenic.

&gt;Falsifiability. If you can't disprove it and it fits right into your pre-conceptions then this should be a massive warning flag that it should be treated with extreme skepticism.

You can falsify the claims made by evolutionary psychologists, particularly claims made about average gender behavior, by finding an overwhelming amount of outliers.

&gt;I can put together the same presentation that shows that conservatives and right wingers are the real "R" in the R/K theory

Do it, then.They would just explain that giving commands of how to use the property they created or purchased (which is itself an extension of the property they created and used to exchange) is an extension of negative rights, as not following commands is imposition on the property holder, while using the property.&gt;Holding to an ideal that destroys the world is not noble, but the intentional revenge of a coward.This subreddit has always been borderline garbage, with brief respites due to the consequentialist crowd.&gt; The Gulf states all have large capital accumulation and respect for markets

The protectorates of the United States?

&gt;all of the areas you mentioned have been exploited through colonialism to different degrees

And somehow former colonies are richer than non-colonies.&gt;You used to always go on about Slavic nobility

I did?&gt;Back in the ex_logica days its constantly had good discussion

Show me.  It was just Bitcoin stupidity.A coward is a man who does not and cannot act on what he knows he really wants.

&gt;I hold only that justice would justify sacrificing all other values

The phrase is the battle shout of psychological Platonists, to entertain such a thing as even a possibility invokes an anti-real severing.I don't mind if he eradicates a shit ton of Islamists, either.

And it's not like I don't have my own hypothetical groomed candidates, but I'll take Trump over the other top 6-8 candidates running, as a noticeable improvement.I think I've said that the Slavs could be gradually Germanized and made noble.It's not the horizon of decision, but the self-knowledge that one will not have the bravery and boldness to branch out into what they would much prefer and is within material possibility.

Obviously, if they don't end up doing it, then their psychology didn't have that fate, but that still makes them a coward.  Indeed, saying 'coward' is partially how we mark this phenomenon as having happened.

&gt;Not sure what "anti-real severing" means.

I'm not spending my free time giving you an operationalized education in Nietzsche.  [Read from page 345 on](https://archive.org/details/NIETZSCHETHEWILLTOPOWER12) for the criticism against the Greeks, or don't.  It's not like I think your psychology is strong and thus worth investing that much effort in.If you want razor-precise answers to all of your wonderings, then certainly read Curt's site for yourself.  I haven't finished it entirely myself.  The man is also easily accessible via FB; I'm sure he'd enjoy long talks with you.He morally shames, not scientifically engages.

He's always welcome to scientifically engage, but until he does, he will remain a coward.&gt;are troubling reminders of their community\u2019s own experience during World War II

So, why would the US have a debt based on that?

If anything, the US should have a positive balance for destroying the Nazis.

This is just blatant anti-white racism on the part of Zionist supremacists, who are also extremely racist toward blacks and Palestinians.

Demanding I perform something from set of actions 'A', which includes not performing something from set of actions 'B', is a positive demand on me.I'm primarily a virtue ethicist, and only a political economist secondarily, so a scientific presentation of the political economy I'm gradually adopting is still very much a work in progress.

As for what I think about you, I don't know that much.  You sound like a follower of Moldbug, but I don't know much else.You're demanding I change my behavior.  That's all that matters, in the end.America and Britain gained access to tremendous oil and gas reserves, for which Russia and China are jealous.

And Islam took over the Middle East even more mercilessly.Tucker does not scientifically engage with the race realists or the anti-immigrationists.

He writes flowery nothing op-eds.

&gt;my own pragmatic rejection of the reactionary movement.

How is rejecting Hoppe's 'realistic libertarianism' pragmatic?&gt;a negative right and a positive right

These are just definitional constructions, which still both demand I change my behavior.Except that there's actually a scientific and historical narrative behind why a libertarian may like Trump's immigration stance.&gt; How is rejecting Hoppe's 'realistic libertarianism' pragmatic?

You guys want to understand why it's intractable, and yet never analyze the political externalities of demographic change?You guys want to understand why it's intractable, and yet never analyze the political externalities of demographic change?So, you 'pragmatically' reject reactionary philosophy simply because reactionary philosophy hurts your sensibilities?

Have you tried understanding the political economics of reactionary philosophy?  It's not like these traditions emerged for nothing.

I'm not saying be conservative like Islam, but do you recognize no potential for social dissolution?There can be racist Zionists, without every Jew being one.Okay, I totally never test philosophical boundaries for intellectual growth.  Never.http://www.eupedia.com/genetics/psychological_traits_snp.shtml

http://www.eupedia.com/genetics/psychological_dna_test.shtml

https://jaymans.wordpress.com/2012/12/31/all-human-behavioral-traits-are-heritable/

Geneticists know more than you're letting on.Can't tell if serious.&gt;the value of pluralism in society

Which does not exist.

_Meritocracy_ is good, but that is itself a monocentric ethic, and one that must be harshly discriminatory against anti-meritocratic views.

Otherwise, "pluralism" is just code word for "let me leech off your meritocracy"\u2014and what else do we mostly see with blacks and Hispanics?

I'm mostly fine with Brahmin, secular Persians, and East Asians, but the blacks and Hispanics are _really_, _really_ fucking anti-meritocratic.&gt;I'm sure I can find a few issues on which libertarians might agree with Hillary

Like what, breathing air?

Demographics are extremely integral to whether one has a republic or whether one has a theocracy.Those are behaviors.It's pretty obvious female suffrage allowed them the opportunity to vote the State their husband.

This also led to the dissolution of the family contract.Society is a contract, too.  All norms are moral commons, which must be protected from free-riding parasites.

&gt;What should prevent a single woman who is not married from getting the vote?

My political opinion on a matter depends on the starting conditions.

Ideally, I want aristocracy, which involves many men who can't demonstrate meritorious argument not being granted their motions and which would not preclude a woman from demonstrating a meritorious argument.  This is all voting and no one voting, as rule is scientific consensus, nothing less.

Moving to less ideal circumstances from here, I think only some white men should vote.  Less ideal: only white men should vote.  Less ideal: only white people vote.  Less ideal: all vote.

What's my logic for these, when under less ideal circumstances?  Because it better approximates aristocratic republicanism.  I don't care about a metaphysical equality, and neither does Nature.Allowing all white men to vote incrementally increased the State.

Granting white women the vote incrementally increased the State.

Allowing Latino immigration incrementally increased the State.It's incorrect that women vote for more government at a rate higher than men?

It's incorrect that Latinos vote for more government at a rate higher than whites?I think several of the listed traits are behaviors, yes.

And did you not see the third link?It's True many of you here hold to a radical individualist philosophy, which absolutely refuses to make decisions based on group behavior, but it remains just as True that the net effect of Latino de-suffrage would be a freer economy, and the net effect of female de-suffrage, would be a freer economy, and the net effect of black de-suffrage, would be a freer economy.

And let's not forget that in my other comment, I did say my ideal is indeed a meritocracy.  I just am not afraid to admit the realities of racial politics.I'm asking because I'm curious, not that I'm trying to use it against you in any way: what is your specific ethnic background?

And which era of communism was this?Best argument is that there really are smart women out there, and ones that may in fact be more aristocratic republican than some men.

Of course, if we don't have the infrastructure to make these pinpoint evaluations, no question that just bloc'ing it out to 'only white men', would do [wonders for our political economy.](http://i.imgur.com/KUZFmSZ.jpg)It is liberating to be able to finally move in that terrain, without just dismissing it out of hand.

Ancaps need to reject social externality arguments because they completely invalidate their hyperindividualist ethics.  But, they are their greater victim for doing that, for they relegate their philosophy to a mere video game, not the real world, where people _do_ act upon social externalities, no matter how much ancaps want to shriek and howl that they shouldn't.Just admit you're not going to read it.

jayman isn't 'just any blogger', but perhaps the single most important one in all of HBD.At the end of the day, we have to understand no one does something so outrageous without some kind of weird cog placement in their head.

One of E7ernal's close friends told me in a PM he's a sociopath, so I just try to explain his quirkiness with that.

It's not like I don't have drunken comments floating out there, and I'm probably a borderline narcissist, but I regard that as fun, don't prevent anyone else from having such silly fun, and not harmful (well, if the person is a hyper-Christian, then they'll probably hate me).&gt;You guys like Darwin and probably Spencer, right?

Me, personally?  No, from what I do understand, Darwin entirely killed the importance of the subject, and Spencer believed in an evolution for the common man and a plain world.

&gt;as it pertains to race would support the practice of exclusionary racialism or the practice of social anti-pluralism

Well, I'm not against economic relationships: I just oppose political degradation.

&gt;From this perspective, the exclusionary ambitions of reactionaries are not immoral nor are they necessarily mistaken. They are anti-evolutionary and dogmatic and engage in the snuffing out of difference and perversion of empiricism and any concept of progress. In my view, this is the ultimate irony of the reactionary movement.

Some do that.  I, of course, don't.Yeah, that guy used to admire me when I was slaying leftists in /r/debateanarchism.

E7ernal liked ex_logica as well.  It's a sign of strength to be able to still respect an ideological opponent.&gt;Let us be on guard against the greatest danger that exists: Life becoming ordinary.

&gt;What must be overcome and what means are available cannot be lost.

&gt;The enemy that possesses it is worth more than the friend who does not know it. -- Ernst J\u00fcnger&gt;We could all be progressing so much faster were it not for he and those like him

That's absolutely right, and a demonstration of the importance of prevailing attitudes: they are themselves an example of a commons, which has the potential to enhance or stifle our own personal goals.

It's why I try to gradually calm a community down and keep it rational.  It's an investment in the commons.

If Curt's descriptive worldview is right, we are living it.&gt;He fell into these positions and likely will fall out of them.

Seems odd that he's a consistent populist-nationalist.Is this a copy-paste from a Jeffrey Tucker book?  ;p

In any event, I have never opposed robust international trade.

International trade is itself the optimal equilibrium and forced integration the suboptimal.&gt;it is legitimate to take both sides into account

You can certainly be a less empirically grounded person, if you want.

You'll just gradually be dispossessed of power.

&gt;I argue for pragmatism because it strikes me as more dynamic and able to deal with empirical results as they arise in practice

Not if it has a high ratio of mere internal feelings correspondence.

&gt;I say fix the social and cultural institutions first by promoting libertarian politics and radical pluralism.

The problem is that political liberty is a deliberate construction, which involves many tenets you might regard as reactionary (though it's worth noting that Curt's Propertarianism is extremely flexible, modern, and progressive, in the sense that it can flow with continuous socio-technological breakthroughs and changing lifestyles; I like this and was never a mere regressionist myself).Oh, I'm not racist against any ethnic group, not even the Jews.

I should like to think my saying, "without every Jew being one," was a demonstration of that.

/u/Z3F is Jewish, yet I regard him as an amusing friend.  I've had multiple black friends.  /u/vapidnoises is a mudblood, yet I regard him as (another) amusing friend.

It's quite irrational to hate an entire ethnic group.  I just equally refuse to be blind to genetic dynamics.You and I, my old friend, are certainly not new to paradigm shifts in the ancap movement.

You and I have seen these patterns and (predictable) social reactions many times before, and we know what follows.What are the paradigm shift(s) you're agitating for, that exist not overlapping with mine and perhaps even hostile to?Can you please provide evidence you read it by quoting through it what you agreed with and didn't?I was just speaking from the abstract, of who has conquered the Middle East throughout history.Did you mean to simply link to this thread?&gt;Not a sociopath

You can claim that, but there's definitely something off about your hypersensitivities.

&gt;and you _are_ a narcissist

I've never apologized that I not rarely will write a self-glorifying, narcissistic comment here or there, but I like this Indo-European, anti-Christian ethic and encourage everyone to take pride in themselves, so it's not like I'm doing it at the expense of anyone else's achievements.

&gt;You have absolutely zero ability to properly engage in introspection on your own character. None. And we can all see that.

What you're more demonstrating here is your need to _permanently_ condemn people.

Where I have given you endless outs, because I don't need whatever critiques you can bring gone, you have given me endless final judgments, because you need whatever critiques I can bring gone.&gt;I really don't give a damn how you dance around it, or convince yourself of it... you sir, are a racist.

This sounds more like you _need_ me to be a racist, rather than that I _am_ a racist.

If racism is so bad, why should you want to consign someone to it forever, without demonstration of not being so?I don't advocate positive genocide, nor do I ever apply the ecological fallacy at any point.

Obviously, from a scientific standpoint, though, Nature does commit 'gen'ocide, and I have no problem with helping her along, for a better life for those living and for higher heights to explore.

&gt;You say provocative things simply because you have to be a special snowflake at all times.

Like what?/u/hhtura 

/u/sheepwithshovels&gt;I don't think any of us is likely to have a lot of political power during our lifetimes.

Sheeeiiiit.  I'll be the torn-shirt Aryan who rebuilds civilization in the mountainous northwest.

&gt;The whole point is to dissolve the distinction between internal observation and external observation.

I agree with this descriptively, but that doesn't remove my point from sticking: that those whose ratio corresponds more to external reality affecting other system participants will have greater material and societal success.[parent]

I just thought you two should see the quote parent to the hailing comment (I still don't know if editing in hails actually works.)

As I did with jon, in the early days of engaging his mutualist rhetoric with my ancap many years ago, I recognize in you two a psyche calm and strong enough to rationally spar and question, without needing to destabilize.

(Actually, through that calm link with jon, I brought him out of mutualism and into the alt-right, a fate not impossible with you two.)&gt;without demonstration of not being so?
&gt;&gt;Really?

Why is talking about genetic differences between population groups racist?

What's your definition of racism?  Mine is the ecological fallacy: 

_"An ecological fallacy is a logical fallacy in the interpretation of statistical data where inferences about the nature of individuals are deduced from inference for the group to which those individuals belong."_^[1](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ecological_fallacy)

Which is almost always intentional (and which is, indeed, the result of emotional insecurity), but I have repeatedly shown that I not only don't intentionally do this, but am welcoming of outliers.No, because I'm not afraid to be discriminating in political privileges.The problem is that many of these Eastern European groups are very small and much more susceptible to subpopulation genetic drift.

When you're dealing with hundreds of millions of Northern Europeans and Sub-Saharan Africans, the dynamics are more stable.

None of this should be interpreted that I'm not happy for any group increasing its IQ, of course.&gt;If we are to believe the NRX rhetoric, the low IQ immigrants Sowell mentions would've eroded the foundations of the nation and brought it to its knees.

Except that the Eastern European immigrants have always been quite paltry, much smaller than black and Hispanic.&gt;Do you think that people in this sub who talk about race aren't ancaps?
&gt;&gt;Some of them do not appear to be.

I certainly am the most prominent example.  I was one of the more prominent ancaps on this board, and now I'm extremely anti-ancap, because I now understand just how anti-social and anti-economic it is (and we asked why it doesn't exist, jesus).

&gt;Do you think nrx and Curt Doolittles Propertarianism are the same?
&gt;&gt;I see this work presented as though it is a clear representation of nrx, so yes.

Obviously, embarrassingly wrong.  Moldbug has more in common with ancap than Curt does with Moldbug.&gt; Solipsist

Are you familiar with Alfred Whitehead?&gt; "Race-realism" is merely a euphemism for common trailer-park racism.

Please show how [jayman](https://jaymans.wordpress.com/), a Jamaican and perhaps the single greatest HBDer, is an example of "common trailer-park racism."

(It's the exquisitest irony when anti-"racists" are the real practitioners of the ecological fallacy.)&gt;Holy cow.

&gt;Let me smokescreen my embarrassment

&gt;With an equally embarrassing parry.

&gt; * /u/compliancekid78Peter Sj\u00f6stedt Hughes claims Whitehead deconstructed Solipsism, but I can't say yet./u/E7ernal, can you at least be the one insulting me?It apparently works.  I was just slaying some children.  Thanks for testing for me.Need to have a "first, swallow your beer" warning.It doesn't disappear.You don't remember ex_logica?I was an ancap for 6-7 years before I read Nietzsche, actually.

I read more ancap treatises in the first year than you guys have ever.

An embarrassing number of present ancaps haven't completed even _For A New Liberty_, let alone the 1,568 page _Conceived In Liberty_.

I'm hardly some random bum.You have a different shrine of her than I do: you seem to license anti-social behavior.Nice commie lingo you have on your lip.Any particular reason you start from the unlikely hypothesis it's a woman?

I don't say "she" when impersonally describing football players, mathematicians, and MMA fighters, and I don't say "he" when impersonally describing a secretary or nurse, because these professions are _overwhelmingly_ gendered.

To not only take a stance, but the extremely unlikely one, shows a decidedly anti-real political agenda.Obama doesn't have a Congress to pass universal gun control, nor governors and police departments willing to enforce it.

Now, Muslim legislation could pass...&gt;Why should I care about my heritage?

You don't have to.  Descriptively, though, there is no reason to believe we have free will (which I define as the _causa sui_, to be one's self-contained cause) and no reason to believe we aren't a product of our genetic heritage.  Indeed, genetic studies show us we have good reason to believe we are.

This isn't to say that genomes don't interact with their environments, of course; life wouldn't be possible otherwise.

Now, normatively, why you maybe should care about the history of your civilization is that such a social continuity is necessary for sustained material progress: there is nothing inherent about this Universe for why a tribe shouldn't go extinct, or the whole species.

Not thinking about traditions, why they emerge, how they evolve, and which evolutions are constructive and which are destructive has the potential to cause such collapses.

&gt;What changes to mundanity of life will develop as a result of ethnic separation?

It's not technically accurate that ethnics are to be completely separated, but that we should recognize and not demonize natural stratification, in ethnics, in gender, and in classes.

We can have cultural exchange and evolution, but we shouldn't overextend natural constructive evolution and positive selection.

&gt;What is culture?

From [Curt's Propertarian framework](http://www.propertarianism.com/glossary/): 

&gt;CULTURE* \u2013 The myths, literature, tastes, rituals, customs, skills, arts of a given people in a given period, in a given civilization. Including 1) The symbols, memetic and referential constructs that demonstrate group membership, especially the foods and dress local to the geography. 2) The narratives and rituals that demonstrate example behavior expected of group members. i.e. Myths. 3) The subset of properties of costs included in the culture\u2019s SOCIAL ORDER. A CULTURE contains a SOCIAL ORDER consisting of a portfolio of expected behaviors, each requiring some form of material cost, or cost in time and effort, or forgone opportunity cost from members in exchange for the opportunities and securities derived from membership in the group. See SOCIAL ORDER.)

Scientifically, it's a gathering of positive social externalities, which are nested upon one another, into a nation.

&gt;How would you classify your own culture?

Specifically, I'm a Northern European-derived American.  Even more specifically, a descendant of primarily Norwegian and Swedish stock, migrated to the American midwest in the early 1900s.

The specificity of 'Northern European' matters in relation to gradually built high trust (genetic mixing with outgroups and punishment of theft of the commons).  The specificity of Norwegian and Swedish more just marks me as not being particularly belonging to the Anglo culture, which is the real author of America; the Germans only came two hundred years later.

Broadly, I'm a European, which means I'm some mixture of Proto-European, Neolithic migration, and Indo-European.  This latter trait is particularly important, as it's the only real marker we know of for the rich Faustian spirit, which in the words of Spengler, "sees endless space."

This perception of reality as full of vast possibility may be because the Indo-Europeans were capable of immense migration, as the horse plains they came from was a highway from Spain all the way to Manchuria.  The people themselves originated in and around modern-day Ukraine.

Because of the vast plains they lived on, these people did not have centralized rule, and consequently had many more interlocking cells of self-contained power, in the form of independent war families, which were prototypes of the Greco-Roman aristocracies to come.

Due to profuse migration into Europe, all European nations have some measure of their blood in them (I'm referring to the R1a+b total).  Northern Europeans and Southern Europeans more differ in being slightly different sculptures of that marble, due to experiencing different sociobiological pressures (Southern Europe had to contend much more with Islam and Persia), and in being slightly different combinations of other genotypes.

&gt;What distinguishes it from others in your eyes?

It, most fundamentally, is its Faustian Indo-European drive for knowledge, exploration, and conquest, where Islam (destruction of Classical civilizations, hyperconservative Sharia) and China (pullback of the fleets, Malthusian trap) have both shown much greater cultural stagnancy.

From here, we can say Northern/Western Europe is the most accelerated of all the kinds of Europeans (Hajnal line), in its political economic division of labor, built through a breakdown of extended family blocs, into the absolute nuclear family, universal morality, and high trust.

So, those would be the two major ways.

&gt;What is degeneracy?

Two possibilities: (1) imbalance of one psychological specialization over the others (progressive, libertarian, conservative, being the three types), and (2) dysgenic breeding patterns, creating an imbalance between the classes and a gradual distortion of the political class collaboration between them.

If not by necessity, (2) seems to always result in the empowering of the feminine progressive psychological specialization and the plebeian class, both of which liquidate both material and cultural capital.

This is dangerous because it has the possibility of snapping the delicate balance of class collaboration, liquidating accumulation of positive social externalities, and regressing civilizational development.

&gt;Please list some behaviours you find degenerate and why.

All forms of behavior caused by high time preferences: single parenting, substance abuse resulting in physical debilitation and the gradual dissappearance of social productivity, lack of some kind of long-term investment in oneself, etc..

&gt;Have you stopped beating your wife yet?

I remember one reactionary asking me what my opinion was of wife-spanking.  My laughing only increased after I realized he was being serious.

&gt;Would you press a red button that would stop the universe from existing, to make everything as if it never happened and to prevent anything else from occurring?

Some reactionaries and traditionalists are mere regressionists, and have a hatred of reality that is ironically (and not ironically, if you understand enough Nietzsche) similar to the Semitic traditions they often hate.

I take the more doctrinal position, which sees modernity as the inherent price to pay for having Faustian drives and a pregnancy for greatness, not something ultimately terminal.  Those who want to merely go back are the only thing terminal.

&gt;What does Hillary Clinton have that we don't have?

Who's "we"?While you think you're making fun of leftists, you're in the end making fun of yourself, by showing that you can only defeat their worldview via straw man.Wrong in what way?An average IQ difference of 30 is not insignificant.

IQ is actually one of the most significant correlative variables for a nation's wealth.Only 16 percent of blacks have an IQ over 100.Making what up?

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m788urlhe9k&gt;Some people might quickly reach the conclusion that people who are in tribal stages of social development must be dumber in some way, but this does not have to be True at all.

Vietnamese are in primitive states of being, but have an IQ of 100-105.

&gt;For example, Jared Diamond in his bestselling book \u201cGuns, Germs, and Steel\u201d shows how Australian aboriginals were bound to be stuck in a tribal world because there simply weren\u2019t any animals suitable for domestication that might have been as useful as things like cattle

Why were the Indo-Europeans able to domesticate these once wild animals?

&gt; and that the soil and plants in their environment were not conducive to farming

Europeans actually had a rough time farming their thick, wet soil, and did not have the benefits of self-fertilizing Chinese farmland, yet China ran into a Malthusian trap in the middle-1000s.

&gt;Moreover, the selective pressures that really shape our intelligence have come about by competing with fellow big-brained humans.

Sub-Saharan Africans lack Neanderthal DNA, one gene of which controls for brain size.

&gt;People in a tribe have to learn language, communicate and compete with the selfish interests of all the other members in the tribe: lie here, join an alliance there, remember favors, plan some clever scheme to manipulate others to get what you want, etc. These sorts of calculations are the ones that really shaped our intelligence. 

Are you claiming there is no more pressure for this in East Asia than there is in Sub-Sahara Africa?

And yet there is a _massive_ average IQ difference of 35 between these areas.

&gt;One can actually make the case that people who live in tribes might even be smarter. People who live in modern market oriented societies can have very little social skills

Socializing is only one form of intelligence, and Sub-Saharan Africans have extremely primitive languages, lacking many of the abstract philosophical and mathematical terms the Romans already had thousands of years ago.

Why didn't the Sub-Saharans have written language?  They sure had your supposedly 'smart-making tribes'.

&gt;learn how to do just a few things

A few _advanced, complicated_ tasks, a la specialization of labor.

&gt;use Google to figure out how to solve all kinds of problems

Accessing and understanding educational items doesn't not require intelligence.

&gt;A \u201cdumb\u201d person 100 years from now will be able to achieve a lot more than a \u201csmart\u201d person today. 

This is just a blank claim, with not only no evidence supporting it, but evidence contradicting it.

&gt;In civilized society it is indeed not so much the greater knowledge that the individual can acquire, as the greater benefit he receives from the knowledge possessed by others

Sure, but this is knowledge, not intelligence.

&gt;First of all, as already repeated over and over, it is not individual intelligence that creates socioeconomic prosperity, it is the ability of the market process to combine human intelligence(smart or dumb) into a new type of collective intelligence.

It's True market economies are very powerful, but that doesn't mean having 30 more IQ points on average doesn't lead to more innovation potential.

In fact, IQ is one of the stronger correlating factors explaining differences in GDP.

&gt;But Dr. Watson, and most scientists have no understanding of what the market process is .

Watson is simply stating facts about human intelligence; he isn't giving any economic prescriptions.

&gt;tiny world of genes

As opposed to the tiny world of the tabula rasa, where nothing can and better not be heritable?

&gt;IQ scores differ substantially among ethnic groups at a given time

That's simply not True, as European IQ and its growth have been fairly stable over the past century.

&gt;As of about World War I, Jews scored sufficiently low on mental tests to cause a leading \u201cexpert\u201d of that era to claim that the test score results \u201cdisprove the popular belief that the Jew is highly intelligent.\u201d

It would depend on the population size of what group was being examined.  It would also depend on which "Jewish" tribe this is, as some tribes have an IQ only in the 80s, where the Ashkenazim are somewhere between 108-116.

&gt;IQ scores for many of the other more recently arrived groups \u2014 Italians, Greeks, Poles, Portuguese, and Slovaks \u2014 were virtually identical to those found today among blacks

You mean, the Flynn effect?  Not the point Sowell's thesis needs.

&gt;over the succeeding decades, as most of these immigrant groups became more acculturated and advanced socioeconomically, their IQ scores have risen by substantial amounts

And yet West Africans have been in the US for centuries longer than Italians.

The main problem Sowell is going to run into is that he's not analyzing these changes relative to population sizes, as immigration, especially across oceans, often selects for the right tail of a population distribution.  This distortion becomes significantly more possible the smaller the amount of immigrants, as well as the phenomenon of genetic drift within that immigrant populace.

&gt;whatever differences might exist are insignificant compared to what really matters, the way the economy works

Except these matters do go on to affect economies.

&gt;And why is it that if black people supposedly have lower IQs do why they excel in music, comedy and so much more?

Because you can have outliers, whose IQ is well-above 100, even if only 16 percent of blacks are above a 100 IQ.

Furthermore, blacks' verbal intelligence isn't anywhere nearly as low as their mathematical ability, which is what _really_ lowers their IQ.

&gt;The bottom line is that when one looks at people bringing up IQ stuff or arguments about prosperity based on human traits, you are usually dealing with someone who has little understanding of the fact that whatever slight biological differences might exists between peoples of different populations are insignificant compared to how freedom and the market process creates a prosperous social order.

The political order matters, but marginal differences (tariff size) have no where near [as strong a correlation with GDP as IQ does.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m788urlhe9k)

Wanting a different property relation isn't the same thing as wanting to be fed for free.

And so-called 'negative rights' libertarians don't not demand positive rights themselves, via demanding I positively act in such a way that doesn't do what they don't want me to.

I don't care what hokey religion you author to 'justify' it; in both cases I'm demanded to change my behavior.&gt;Where exactly voluntarists say that any system "should" be accepted?

The NAP minimalist ethic.

By demanding "voluntaryness," you are making a demand I license extra-NAP behavior and not "aggress."

&gt;just let people out

This is the system you're demanding be accepted: letting people 'out'; letting people get away with NAP minimalism.If you cause positive social externalities to be underproduced, I don't care what parasitic religion you invoke to try to stop my "aggression."Robust free markets have never existed under NAP minimalism, but required many extra-NAP demands so-called voluntaryists would call 'aggression'.

The ethic you voluntaryists advocate is that of international law, and that is no society, but a void of a society.As if your hyperindividualism isn't a prescribed social theory (and it's prescribed, not proscribed, as the latter means to make one an enemy of the State): it's just a prescription of low social trust.

And the icing on the cake is that no rich market societies tolerate low trust.Voluntaryists don't say, "You can do what you want."Civilization decides, via some social pacts being more productive than others.

In other words, enjoy your unproductive 'anarcho' system being relegated to a video game fantasy."since when pointing out unreal positions of my opponent is committing a straw man?"There, there.The problem with that is that technology just goes on to create new commons, new positive social externalities people are willing to move on and "aggress" over.That's a rather simple, anti-social narrative.

The broader concept is class collaboration, which goes back several thousand years, to the early republics.I don't understand statistics, and you understand scientific argumentation.And now we see at last, just like the leftists, you anti-"racists" are the only hateful crew.

But, of course, that's not an accident, as this element of your worldview is, indeed, leftist.&gt;Anti-social behavior is its own punishment

It has externalities on other people, though.

The fatal flaw you make is assuming the constancy of your property norms.The k separation value selected and the labels given to the genetic clusters separated are irrelevant to my point that genomes matter.&gt;I would disagree that all traits are

Well, you're a biological determinist, right?

Some aspects of genomes are the result of magnification and silencing effects, which are the result of particular chromosomal combinations, not the singular genes by themselves.

&gt;It also really underplays the image of families on upbringing

But, that is what the studies show.  As long as the bare basics are there, the particularities of upbringing explain almost none of the variations in life outcome.

&gt;For example, there was a Japanese study of over 100 kids that showed high correlation between wealth of the family and emotional maturity.

Except jayman would posit "emotional maturity" is largely the result of genetics.&gt;I don't need anything. I just don't want newcomers to have to wade through the pile of garbage you and your ilk create.

That is quite a need, though, when I don't see any reason to believe the genetic and political economic science I post is "garbage."

That's a mere assertion on your part, which for it to not be garbage itself, will need substantiation.

&gt;can be impressed by quality of knowledge

Except I've read more ancap literature than you have and am not impressed.

&gt;the fact that the mods are asleep

Capchem isn't asleep.  He just knows we are, in fact, advancing theory.

&gt;if you want to be respected, build your own subreddit

Oh, I already am respected and have been respected for several years.Late-Wittgenstein turned against his earlier work and ended up agreeing with Nietzsche's position on language, and Whitehead exists largely in the Nietzschean tradition, so that would be rather strange.I think it's fair to say it took more study of philosophy in general for me to start seeing holes in a priori Misesian-Rothbardianism, yes.I suppose there's a sliver of possibility, however improbable, that there's some obscure subbranch that's fairly bourgeois, but 90+% of the alt-right is about traditional masculinity and aristocratic warrior ethics.

It's True that _techno-commercialism_ of _neoreaction_ is extremely bourgeois and gender neutral, but that's not really the alt-right.The liberal-conservative distinction I use is time horizons, where liberals liquidate cultural and material capital for the sake of offspring and conservatives tend to build and/or preserve cultural and material capital at the expense of present consumption (this can go too far, obviously).

In this dichotomy, libertarians would be the middle time horizon, which facilitates exchange and transforms the material capital made by the savers.

With this understood, I think what the author is trying to say is that liberals, in their liquidating of capital, increase the availability of resources for breeding.  This general increase in resources allows for the proliferation of r types.

So, it's not that liberal _parents_ have to be r parents, but that liberal _behavior_ leads to a general rise of r types.  The nuance you raise is probably necessary, too, as some conservative parents invest very little in their children ("toughen up"), but this also has the general effect of k selection in the broader populace.&gt; If the calculation problem isn't enough to settle the debate, this isn't either.

What makes you think all political problems are solved via argumentation?

Indeed, r/K theorists are probably the first to say r types only respond to violence, hence why it's objective #1 for them to reduce violence, where it isn't for K types.

r types will burn civilization for the sake of 'peace', and K types will fight wars and die for the sake of continued civilization.&gt;what does he expect us to do about it if not break the r-strategists out of their stupor? Secede? Conquer?

Violent taking of power.  Rise of fascistic nationalism, via civil war or secession.

&gt;I kind of wonder if most libertarians could be thought of as r-strategists

Left-libertarians bend that way and right-libertarians bend the other way, but I'd say to the extent one is a libertarian is the extent to which they are a middle time horizon, concerned with transformation of savings into productive investments.

Libertarians are kind of the middleman between liberal purists and conservative purists: the former consumes, the latter saves, and the libertarian helps process that transition.

This is also why it's not uncommon for a libertarian to have difficulty distinguishing socialism and fascism, often calling the two the same, because to the libertarian unmolested markets are his dominion and myopia; any interference he often has trouble distinguishing into more than one class.

&gt;Who do you suppose composes that 20% of K remnants? The Bible Belt?

The Scott-Irish Southerners, who have a several century relationship with aristocracy (creating the confusion for Democratic strategists why poor white Southerners would vote for a more anti-egalitarian party).  It's why it was the Old South that was an actual aristocracy, where the East Anglo bourgeois Puritan North wasn't.

The German midwesterners can be thought of as a kind of hybrid between these two cultures, but probably would break with the anti-egalitarians if it came down to it.Well, it could certainly be gratifying to horrify an r type, that you know what they're about, what they fear, and that your kind has the ability to mete it out.

It's why you see fascists beat up anarchists, and I can't think of any singular event that more terrifies them than when that happens.  Just search the threads.

Sadly for you libertarians, Mises' _Economic Calculation in the Socialist Commonwealth_ doesn't frighten them much.&gt;Liberals would of course disagree with this. 

I know they want to, but I also know logical rigor is merely a momentary convenience for them, not way of life.

&gt;Do you have data showing a different in time preferences according to political inclination?

So, the expansionist government politics doesn't indicate higher time preferences to you?  The lack of economic rationale, instead basing it on something merely feeling good?  That's not indicative of higher time preferences to you?

In any event, there are probably a number of ways of triangulating it: debt levels, income, educational attainment, substance abuse, number of sexual partners, hypersensitivity to violence used under any circumstance, even with it being obviously necessary being major ways, but potentially also low self-esteem, which encourages high time preference.

Sean Last wrote [an interesting article](http://therightstuff.biz/2014/12/31/liberalism-and-low-self-esteem/), compiling a number of recent studies on liberals and conservatives, finding that conservatives are much more capable of having realistic opinions of their opposition, where liberals had emotionally inflamed caricatures.  This could be another indication of impulsive behavior.

&gt;humans are naturally inclined towards egalitarian forager values because we spent so long as hunter-gatherers

The hunter-gatherers weren't as egalitarian as some academics may want you to believe.  It's not like they were peaceniks, but went on murder raids, reaching mortality rates that were higher than even the Punic wars.

Still more, you have no reason to assume such behavior, as egalitarian as it may have been, was (1) due to long-term genetic behavior, rather than circumstantial incentive or that (2) such behavior was not quickly selected against with the rise of horticulture ('big men' hierarchies very quickly began around here, and involved having more wives and more offspring), agriculture, and warrior aristocracies.

&gt;but its been farmer values which made us rich

Actually, agriculture involved much harsher living circumstances, and it wasn't the mere neolithic migrants that made the West rich, as they were everywhere, including the Middle East: it was the war-like Indo-Europeans who came after them and uniquely defined the West in contrast to eunuch China.

&gt; As we get richer and richer we can afford to slip back into less-productive but more-preferred norms.

Yeah, this is just silly: evolution has actually sped up since agriculture, due to increased selective dynamics.Yeah, the German midwesterners are kind of stuck in the WASP phase of Americana, still living in 95+% white communities.  I spent the first decade of my life there and still will visit.  It's filled with many beautiful communities, but quite insulated from what's really going on in the world.

What this means is they can have an external politics that mirrors the Anglo Northerners, but if the shit really hit the fan and came to their doorstep, they'd very quickly return to their German anti-egalitarian, dutiful aristocratic ethics.Cerebral conservatives like myself and right-libertarians like many here can actually work together.

I do take the economics of libertarianism seriously: even though I began political philosophy in the militant Right, I was gradually lured into libertarianism for quite a while, precisely because I found the economic treatises compelling, before eventually coming back to shitlordism, through Nietzsche and others.

Left-libertarians, the particularly moralistic of the libertarian crowd, can't really work with types like me, and with what's going on in current politics (half-century death of the radical Left, rise of the alt-right), it's looking like they'll eventually have to exile themselves into the greater Left, as the momentum is on our side, which will appetize the right-libertarians who want to see some of their views actually become reality.Concentration of positive social externalities and their defense.If you're a huge history buff and love little details here and there.

It included some minute economic history, too.I'm not sure Reddit works that way, at least not without changing IPs, but I could be wrong about both.

I don't bother have that kind of manipulative lifestyle.  To invest effort skulking in the shadows like that reveals a profoundly weak psychology, to not just argue in the daylight and allow your audience to accumulate knowledge of your worldview.tfw: 

&gt;"Free Speech! ... Allahu Akbar!"

Edit: They call them cowards as they're backing off.  Then, when they defend one of their officers caught in their crowd, they start calling them racists.  Just lol.Whether a given individual can accurately predict people's IQ is irrelevant to IQ predicting life outcome fairly well: 

https://www.udel.edu/educ/gottfredson/reprints/1997whygmatters.pdf&gt;your understanding is infantile

Show me.Yes, I'd say most people who particularly identify as a 'voluntaryist' probably flirt with leftist sentiments.&gt;Conservatives just get "muh feels" about different things

The point is whether the behavior leads to short or long civilization time horizons, not whether sentimental conservatives are consciously cerebral about political economics or were merely evolutionarily selected for disgust at norm degradation.

&gt;Additionally, signaling time preference through politics and demonstrating time preference are different things.

Can you show me cases of contradiction?

&gt;there's been far less of it

Relative to what, being multicellular organisms?

You need to be careful what you're making your time window and what the actual behavioral allele frequencies are.&gt; Sure, but I'd still like to see some evidence.

Of the time preference account?  What did you disagree with of my presentation?

&gt;Global warming comes to mind. Its a very long-term problem which the left takes very seriously

The Left doesn't care about global warming from a low time preference reason; they care about global warming because it's an anti-capitaist doomsday scenario.  It gives their Rousseauian psychology a chance to vent, feel self-righteous, and scold the Faustian psychology.

As Nietzsche said: 

_"Also, the fine indignation itself soothes him; it is a pleasure for all wretched devils to scold: it gives a slight but intoxicating sense of power._

_Even plaintiveness and complaining can give life a charm for the sake of which one endures it_ _..._

_The "last judgment" is the sweet comfort of revenge."_

&gt;So you can show there's been more evolution in homo sapiens since the rise of agriculture than there was for our entire hunter-gatherer period?

I don't know if Cochran makes that claim, but the more precise claims that'd have to be contended with in our context would be that (1) hunter-gatherers were or were not genetically predisposed to egalitarianism and (2) of what genetic predisposition for egalitarian ethics existed, that that allele frequency is or is not still present and able to respond to changes in resource availability.

Given that even with just horticulture, the supposed egalitarian ethic very quickly died ('big men') and that evolution sped up with agriculture, it's hard to find reason to take credible the farmer-forager interpretative tool, given how many very, very hierarchical phases humanity went through.Sorry, but your handle of English is too weak and your intelligence seemingly too low for this conversation to be fruitful.  We should probably just move on.My mom went to college.How do markets bootstrap themselves?

Please, go through the economic history with me.&gt;It doesn't mean that you can differentiate between 5 or 10 IQ points without a test.

&gt;&gt;Whether a given individual can accurately predict people's IQ is irrelevant to IQ predicting life outcome fairly well."NRx" is a dated, often monarchist movement.  Monarchism is probably the only remaining reason to use the term, when there are more accurate labels to use for non-monarchists.

The people who get called "NRx" here are really more a part of the alt-right (and even here, Cantwell is not really a member of it, but a paleolibertarian whose instincts cause him to flirt with the reality of social externalities, but who is still not educated enough to understand how to scientifically and economically handle those instincts).

People like myself are aristocratic republicans, in the tradition of Curt's Propertarianism.  People like Darchdolla are generic ethno-nationalists, who don't spend as much time talking about meritocracy, but hard racial lines (I blame the Southern European in him).  However, even he isn't a monarchist either, so it's inaccurate to have been calling us "NRx" this whole time.

Then, there are probably 30-50 people here in between us two, caught up in the 4channery and still needing to understand wtf Propertarianism is to do anything but meme out.Unapologetic establishment of existence is great and life-affirming.

Rejecting the Western evo strat, though, is suicidal and regressive.

It takes away what made us great in the first place.  Why would you want to merely mimic shit-smelling Arabs and Africans?  To put the best light on it: eunuch Chinese, who _are_ high IQ, but who are very anti-Faustian, like the natsocs.http://i.imgur.com/ZzQVxev.gifv

The founder of NRx is a Jewish futurist meritocrat.That sort of detached hyperindividualism was philosophically created by the underclass as a ploy against hierarchy: 

http://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2f2037/more_juicy_antileftist_rhetoric_for_you_guys_but/The unfortunate thing with libertarianism is that it has a ceiling of support that consists of the amount of people who are unable to notice or care about social externalities.

This has always been a very small percentage of the population, to where even what libertarianism the world has seen was known historically as (high trust) classical liberalism, which had many extra-NAP demands that might make some ancaps uncomfortable (physically punishing liars, hanging and deporting deviants, etc.).["You're having a hard time tonight."](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Nj7lZ-tAYXg)You can still create a domino effect by encouraging or discouraging votes, especially in certain precincts.

Obviously, a given individual's vote is still governed by statistical strictures, but there's no reason that means don't politically agitate at all, especially given that some people you agitate go on to agitate others.I was addressing your final paragraph, which somehow thinks libertarianism can just keep growing.

No, even the Ron Paul movement hit a hard ceiling, let alone what 'anarcho-capitalism' is going to do.&gt;Too many of the SJW and cultural Marxist nutters are white.

_wince_... do a little more research.&gt;I have more common interests with my local community filled with blacks, whites, Asians

Political interests?

&gt;Preserving and protecting an identity associated with any race is silly.

Congratulations, you unwittingly find all non-white races tribally silly, a trait extremely in common among anti-racist whites.I want libertarianism to exist.  It's really important I ignore that only one race has remotely achieved it.And that ethic has never existed in all of history.

Hmm, maybe economics isn't actually on the side of NAP minimalists.

People have always taken an interest in social externalities.  _It's what 'society' is itself_, "dumbass."Oh, I'll freely say African and Arabic culture is shitty, both evaluatively and literally.

And caring about meritocracy =/= caring about being bullied with the term "racist."  You can take a hike with that.I'm not dog whistling, but presenting a substantive difference from your and Darch's natsoc-grade interest in helping Europeans by merely increasing their ethnocentrism."This guy said some high level Nietzsche shit I can't understand."

"Ho, far for it to be I'm just a dumbass, hue."&gt;Is it really "hyper"individualist to suggest people should be proud (or even ashamed) of things they have done themselves?

You mean, "shouldn't"?  As that was the concept you were presenting, not its opposite.

&gt;If white people are so great, how did they get there? It certainly was not because of the majority. 

That's an entirely independent point, and if anything, one that complements mine, because the West is defined by the Indo-European Faustian spirit, which is _precisely_ about aristocratic breaking out, not democratic mediocrity.

&gt;It is precisely because of the individual achievement of some people that can somehow find pride because they have similar biological traits.

It sounds like you're referring to the phenomena of 'cultural monuments' and 'cultural artifacts', which are moral commons.  Allowing the other classes to enjoy pride in defending their elites is part of what keeps a polity stable and going.

http://www.propertarianism.com/2010/08/30/the-bipolarity-of-class/

Pride in cultural capital is part of the status economy and one of the prerequisites for the money economy.

When you see ancaps saying, "Having pride alongside others is STUPID!" they're just acting out their low status, unlanded psychologies."You can do what I want you to do."

"Much ethical."&gt;The question is, how do we reconcile them as to avoid constant infighting?

You're not going to be able to.  What we're doing now is informing the latter group the ship is indeed sinking and to leave the anti-social NAP minimalists ("society is literally the boundaries of your physical property, brah!"), who have a psychology not capable of anything, but low status advocacy of social parasitism, on board.&gt;a political stance which incorporates radical limitations on aggression

Libertarianism has an orders of magnitude longer history of advocating against low trust behavior, not NAP minimalism.

The classical liberalism _that actually existed_ pilloried liars and deported bums.Whose libertarianism?  Rothbard and Rockwell were/are cultural reactionaries.

Classical liberalism was socially conservative and punishing of low trust behavior.

So, I ask, again, whose "libertarianism 101" are you talking about?  Walter Block's?

Are you talking about a fringe branch which has only existed for a few decades and will never get more than 0.0008% support?&gt;Look at the accomplishments of many Asian cultures

What were those?  The imprecise, irregular water clock?  Accidentally benefiting from self-fertilizing farmland, which eventually put them in a Malthusian trap regardless?

Limp exploration from a literal eunuch?  Why have a eunuch culture if you're this great advancing civilization, hungry for innovation?

The Chinese culture is not about linear progress, but sleepy cyclism.  They had plenty of resources to industrialize, but didn't.  Britain was industrializing even without needing the coal they did use.  France industrialized without coal.  Denmark industrialized without coal.  Switzerland industrialized without coal.

&gt;There's nothing special about the white race from a biological standpoint.

Besides being the only people in human history that voraciously integrate external innovation and improve upon it.

There's repeated booms in progress through the 6-8,000 year history of Westerners, but little dot-smears for Arabs, Indians, and Chinese.Capitalism is not the totality of human action and neither is the money economy the only economy.

Realizing this provides one with the opportunity to understand the diversity of polities throughout history.

&gt;Even though computers did not exist for thousands of years of human history before they were invented, before their widespread adoption we would have been incorrect in assuming that they therefore are not "on the side" of economics.

Except I am arguing with something that _was materially possible_, but could not establish itself: only a money economy existing, without regard to the preceding status economy or built cultural capital.

It's essentially a society of diaspora, which repeatedly demonstrated it couldn't establish itself, hence migration.

Anarcho-Capitalism is the effort to grant only the money economy existence, to deny all landed phenomena political legitimacy or power.  Well, history already has a harsh verdict for that ethic.The historical trend is pretty clear: absolute ethnocentrism, resulting in fractured polities, high transaction costs, low economic velocity, low capital accumulation, and primitive knowledge; on through the merging of major ethnic blocs and the breakdown of family divisions, resulting in larger, more unified polities, low transaction costs, high economic velocity, high capital accumulation, and sophisticated knowledge.

The Western evo strat is this gradual building of trust, but also the Faustian drive to embark on this grand project of multiplying possibilities.

What follows after the ANF is hard to say.  Some of it we already see (feminism, single parenting) and it's proving to be a major misstep and hiccup.  Whether we can still muscle through the speed bump and arrive at the next logical step is hard to hypothesize, because we presently don't know how to get past the ancient categories of sexual dimorphism (genetic homogenizing of ethnics is possible in a category where sexual differentiation can't not occur).

Clearly, the ethic is having an inherent internal difficulty (science vs. universal morality).  Nature will always set unbreakable boundaries, so any new age ethics will stumble, fail, die, and keep doing this until something finally comports with reality.Read about the political economics of the Hajnal line.

There's no going back.Because NAP minimalism licenses low trust behavior, like lying and parasitism on the commons.I elaborated with your other comment, but if you want further reading, I recommend these: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3q476x/curt_doolittle_what_does_ancapism_do_right_and/

http://www.propertarianism.com/2015/07/02/propertarianism-vs-rothbardiansm/What is 'the most ethical system'?By 1850, history did already show you could build strong polities without explicit slavery.

In 1850, I'd have no problem saying blacks shouldn't have the right to vote, though, just as I do now.

When all you do is liquidate commons and vote for more gibsmedat, without regard to _any_ empirical reality, you are a politically destructive demographic.Oh, I'm not aware of a singular one that contains all you need to understand.

All I can tell you is to get balls deep in the glossary and required articles, really.

Whatever historical work Darch is doing now I'm sure matters somewhat, but the political economy of ethno-nationalism isn't on his side.  We already long departed what he wish could happen and was productively possible.

This isn't to say I don't think we should be _extremely_ punishing of anti-meritocracy, of course.&gt;As an ancap i say let the memes compete, but as long as it is done in a peaceful non violent manner and respects property rights (which is also all a meme)

If it's also a meme, then you're not letting it be competed with if you don't allow anything but the non-violence it advocates for.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q6-ZGAGcJrk&amp;t=2sThe irony is that you have.  Can you show me this rich history of the ethic you're putting forward?

Mine goes back several thousand years.  How far back does yours?  1980?  Authored by [some unkempt fedora?](https://libertarismoperu.files.wordpress.com/2012/09/samuel-e-konkin-iii-at-the-karl-hess-club.jpg)&gt;I define capitalism as the technology of voluntary exchange between individuals with their own personal sets of values and marginal utilities on those values.

Your definition of 'voluntary', though, leads to only a monetary economy, not a status economy.

&gt;This clearly encompasses all of human interaction

No, it doesn't, because humans don't act based on your definition of 'voluntaryness', but based on protection of investment\u2014physical, social, mental, and cultural.

It's why slanderers get beat up.  NAP minimalists chant that he shouldn't have protected his investment in his reputation, that he committed an involuntary act.

You guys aren't equipped to analyze anything but the monetized economy, not the status economy.

&gt;capitalism is not a physical technology, it's a cultural technology

Which was built by cultural capital, non-monetary phenomena.

&gt;Of course with anarcho-capitalism, it is a self-reinforcing technology that prevents it's own destruction by virtue of it's core principles.

And yet it's stillborn.  What irony.Every other group exhibits high ethnocentric behavior: 

http://i.imgur.com/SBJKeSX.jpg

That the West progressed past this is probably the single core reason its economies exhibit such high levels of economic velocity.  Low ethnocentrism is the result of a more universalized morality and higher trust, which pays smaller transaction costs and affords the possibility of greater capital accumulation and faster rates of it.&gt;All I see is statism, socialism, and communism.

As defined by your low trust, socially parasitic NAP minimalist ethic.

Well, you can adopt that definition of libertarianism, but that's not the history of classical liberalism.

Walter Block's little fringe bastardization has a paltry historical existence and following.

No accident no society has ever practiced it or will ever practice it.  Its only result is extreme social transaction costs, liquidation of cultural capital, and immediate social collapse.Yeah, the North Korean GDP is to die for.  I couldn't be right that built trust corresponds with the richness of the resident market.

&gt;They are natural, born of millions of years of primate evolution.

Except primates are extremely anti-'voluntaryness'.&gt;Been to a college campus lately?

Yeah, hardcore leftists are disproportionately black, Hispanic, or some form of non-Western European, like Ashkenazim or another low trust, dual-ethic, socially parasitic group.

Even the 18-29 white demographic still votes Republican at 51% to 44%.  That's counting 18-29 white women, too.&gt;Preserving and protecting an identity associated with any race is silly.
&gt;&gt;you unwittingly find all non-white races tribally silly
&gt;&gt;&gt;I find non-white races silly?
&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;Every other group exhibits high ethnocentric behavior:
http://i.imgur.com/SBJKeSX.jpgI don't care whether you base the NAP or an approximation of it on moral realism or anti-realism.

All that matters is that the political economics of it are fatal.&gt;there are racist and non-racist Asians

None of that changes that the bell curves' positions are widely dispersed (ANF Anglos vs. caste Indians).

&gt;I did claim anyone of any race who believes in protecting and preserving a racial identity is silly.

Congratulations, you find the vast majority of non-white people silly.

You can autistically dispense with social categories, but it doesn't change the material evaluations.

Indeed, all it does is relegate your philosophy to a video game ("Guys, let's play ancap on Minecraft, the only place possible!"), if it will only ever recognize the monetary economy, and shout down everything else (particularly what must come before it: the cultural capital of the status economy).&gt;Is this based upon experience?

Experience and economic theory interpreting and explaining that experience.

&gt;that caused and allowed it to become a predominantly socialist big government shithole?

Northern Europe is actually among the freest places to live and do business: 

http://i.imgur.com/2yVo1WC.jpg

Still more, all the other places are a result of Northern European colonization.

&gt;Although I'm sure white people also invented socialism too.

Yes, the Bolsheviks... totally not Ashkenazim...http://i.imgur.com/RYVoM0I.jpg

I'd also be careful with evidence based on selection bias (forums for members of the degenerate white underclass, like certain subreddits (this /r/ancap subreddit is itself a selection bias for low status anti-social beta males) and Tumblr): what really matters is whether it's characteristic for Western Europeans to act that way in the aggregate.Well, painting is indeed correlated with invading Poland.

Not like Ashkenazim and anti-landed pluralism, no.I guess if you're an ancap novice.&gt;You do realize technologies improve over time. An imprecise water clock

And yet theirs regressed, along with many other technologies.

&gt;would you criticize the makers of the first wheel?

You mean, the Indo-Europeans, the same people who created the linear scientific progress ethic in the first place?

&gt;In other words, you have thousands of years of non-whites making all/most of the advancements

Show me.  The empirics aren't on your side, I can assure you: having natural endowments just meant China kept expanding technologically laterally.

And with India: even imperial Islam couldn't unite the castes into a collaborative goal of civilizational advance.

&gt;just a couple centuries where whites made the advancements

Just a couple?  The entire arc of the Indo-Europeans = just a couple?

&gt;Further, you make the insane assumption that correlation = causation when it comes to skin color (race) being the reason why Europeans made the recent advancements.

Why is it insane that genomes matter?

&gt;since the industrial revolution, some of the greatest innovations have come from blacks

Oh, what an embarrassing grade school lie, and outliers don't refute trends.  Go ahead and show this _rich_ history of black innovation.  I'm sure not _one_ will be a propagandized fabrication.

&gt;You also did not address the point about strong guiding spiritual principles that were created by non-whites and still exist today. Those principles have resulted in quite advanced cultures, they just have not industrialized.

Like what?  Fuck the Buddhists.  They can have their eunuch Nirvana in Nothingness.

&gt;Thomas Sowell is more intelligent and has done more than many whites.

Congratulations, you know how to find an outlier, but that doesn't change the fact that only 16 percent of blacks have an IQ above 100.  For every Thomas Sowell, there are 50 Shockleys.

&gt;The Buddha offered one of the safest &amp; least authoritarian spiritual systems that exists to this day and he wasn't white. 

I'm not interested in an impotent life philosophy, which was entirely powerless to stop Islam.

You can hug a tree and get your head cut off; I'll adopt a more masculine outlook.

&gt;And, Muhammad (a non-white) also created one of the less great spiritual systems.

How the hell is Islam great at anything but regressing Classical civilization, precisely what it did when it took over the Middle East?

Islam is so great and yet it entirely wiped out your more favored Buddhist Afghanistan.

&gt;Or, to continue my point, if Jesus was white, that's a good example of a great white spiritual leader.

Jesus was a Jewish Buddha.  Fuck him, too.People make pacts to enforce norms, yes.

With what result?  Anti-'voluntaryness'.If I have the cart before the horse, what is the mechanism by which a market increases trust?

Enforcement of norms increases trust, but not mere exchanges.The hilarity is that I asked how far back does yours go _in existing_.

Oh, low trust behavior certainly goes back to the very origin of social organisms, and it routinely proves to never be anything but primitive.

That the Internet gave you the ability to find other low status beta males and that a couple of them wrote a pamphlet on how best to be a low status beta male social parasite isn't going to be changing much real history, just give you an anesthetic to LARP with.&gt;Only in a culture where money is generally valued higher than status.

Which never happens in a landed way, only diasporic:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rhsaw/daily_discussion_the_division_of_labor_is_limited/cwo56gb

&gt;distorted with violent force

Defined by your bourgeois class' standards, right?  All roads lead back to your monetary economy.

&gt;the strategy that provides the most value to participating individuals will be dominant

I agree, which is why the NAP minimalist ethic doesn't exist anywhere, especially anywhere wealthy.

Low trust NAP minimalist behavior is routinely suppressed historically, precisely because more productive ethics can afford to and have an incentive to.

&gt;a voluntary society is entirely possible

No, because 'society' is itself the result of concentrated positive social externalities and their incentivized defense.  People are paid to defend these externalities, which results in anti-'voluntaryness'.

&gt;under the condition that their values do not incur aggression

Which immediately lops off the incentive to build moral commons, to increase trust, to create cultural capital that increases the productivity of its members.

If people are allowed to free ride, the cost-benefits of upholding the social order hit an untenable ratio, creating a ghetto non-society.  International law and primitive tribal regions are the embodiment and consequence.

&gt;rather than a defacto human condition

The de facto human condition?  Do you ancap utopians really want to play with this route, on ancient biological history?

&gt;As society becomes more intelligent, the valuation of aggression goes down

Intelligent people suppress anti-social behavior all the time and purposely.

&gt;because it's pretty clear the natural equilibrium of humanity points towards less aggression rather than more

Towards _suppression of anti-sociality._

&gt;The path of least resistance is almost certainly voluntary.

It's True the cheapest ethic is 'voluntaryness', but that's also why everyone began with low trust 'international law'.  It was only the few who got farther on this civilizational track of building high trust, whose commons were extremely expensive to build, but paid extremely rewarding dividends.

&gt;If slander is highly detested in a free society, law could easily contractually generated in the market between courts and defense to make it a terms of service agreement not to slander under punishment from the defense agency. 

A postmark on a letter already written: society will already enforce suppression of anti-social, parasitic behavior, and forcefully exclude violators.

&gt;Due to the nature of information, it is impossible to make a classically aggressive action within the status economy. It's each individual's choice to make value judgments about others

Value-judgments are not the same thing as slandering whether someone is trustworthy or not.  If you embark on that claim, you will be forced to operationally testify in a verifiable manner to an open, public court.  If you fail and are shown to be a liar, you will be punished, as remuneration, as protection of the invested forgone opportunity costs of the reputed man, as suppression of free-riding on the normative commons.

&gt;If they wish to believe slander

Society does not tolerate not creating a central vehicle which polices trust.  To the extent policing does not occur, social transaction costs increase and economic actors become more separated.

&gt;only lamenting about your opinions

I can't lament about 2 + 2 =/= 5; it simply =/= 5.

Anarcho-Capitalism is a contradiction, but not for why leftists say it is: it's a contradiction, because it wants to marry the two end points of civilization: anti-sociality and high economic velocity.I find it really funny when people who've been around anarcho-capitalism for a decade and are the most anti-leftist bar none, get called a SJW by an assured ancap newbie.

Sorry that your political compass is binary.&gt;Have you never been on Ebay?

Ebay is just a business, like any other business, and exists only to the extent the physical-cultural world enforces property rights.

Ebay doesn't host its servers in Venezuela.

&gt;Successful small trades build up trust which enables larger trades with lower overhead.

Successful exchange leads to interaction, which familiarizes people with one another, leading to the possibility for increased social pacts and investment in social commons, like widespread property rights.

&gt;Reputation will be built either on existing mutual social connections (escrow), counterparty risk, and small value transactions.

These are technologies that were created to facilitate trade between low trust groups.  It's an innovation of decreasing transaction costs, invented by high trust cultures to further grow the global economy, which is population-wise, populated by mostly low trust groups.

What you're describing are phenomena that exist on the foundation of the physical-cultural capital of high trust societies.

If these go away, so does everything after it: you need to have final material enforcement of social pacts.https://www.reddit.com/r/copypasta/comments/2qmqzz/an_essay_to_insult_someone/

It burns more when you can actually link an insult with an integral element of someone's identity.  Try again.Hypothesized, materially possible, and inferred phenomena are all categorically separate from explicitly and operationally delimited (measured) phenomena.  It's subjunctive vs. direct perception.

Anyways, you can potentially analyze it studying psyop experiments of disinfo.The crux is what's the conception of property: is it only physical, or does it include all investments of forgone opportunity costs\u2014social, physical, mental, cultural\u2014and which of these are worth defending.

Clearly, history decided against what NAP minimalists wanted.&gt;it is simply humanity that is capable of liberty, and not just white people

'White people' are obviously just a particular branch of human evolution, don't hold a binary monopoly on cultural innovation and economic wealth, and are still evolving, like other groups.

It's not like these racial lines and types of society we have today are going to be what's around 500 years from now.

&gt;Hong Kong and Singapore took these economic ideas for example and they are now playing the game better than mother europe does now.

Eh, kind of: East Asia gets constant positive reinforcement by Western trade and military management.

&gt;It's like how for example the south americans are/were on average the best at (round ball) football, and dominating international competition despite europe inventing the sport.

Not quite, no, as the social-cultural behaviors that lead to high trust economies directly surround their involved phenomena.

Being good at soccer or track is more a function of the particular muscle fiber characteristics, bone structure, and overall morphology, which can be better evolved via actions and lifestyles which need not involve playing the sport in question.

That Kenyans evolved to become the world best long distance runners is the same category as Northern Europeans evolving to have and create the most productive economies.  Authoring a sport or writing a novel can be seen as within the subjunctive category, not the directly, materially related category.Productive economies aren't about social libertinism, but its direct suppression.

You can call that not _your_ idea of freedom, but the world marches on.Not much of a future for Africans, though: just gentle slavery until genetic displacement.http://www.propertarianism.com/2010/08/30/the-bipolarity-of-class/Dynamic adjustment to all forms of capital: social, physical, cultural,  mental, etc..

Of course, Nature already does this: it's just a question of what can wield it, where, when, how long, etc..Ancaps, probably for the hilarity.

alt-right, for immigration and entertaining IE bravado.Why should we give Muslims the Middle East?

They violently took it themselves, destroying many more interesting cultures.  They're low IQ inbred, needing Westerners to extract and process the oil and gas.

To the victor go the spoils, and the US and Britain gave them a taste of that imperialist medicine they liked themselves.  Fuck 'em.How does it violate your NAP to lie?

&gt;parasitism on the commons
&gt;&gt;Happens more in statism?

I'm not advocating for the State.

All of those are unsubstantiated claims you want to be True, but aren't.

If I really set out to destroy this subreddit, it wouldn't be pretty, given how brain-dead my opposition is (or maybe "my opposition" is me on other accounts? it certainly helps me how dumb they are), but I don't live my life like that.Yeah, the more I heard it, the more I figured I could well be wrong.Nietzsche hated plebeian nationalism, but was an unapologetic biological determinist.Maybe where our break occurs is that you seem to not rely on suppression of free-riding by third-parties.&gt;Show me a 30 point difference between races living in the same geographic area under the same conditions.

South Africa.

There, there, my child.You're working with a narrow conception of an economy, namely the monetary.

&gt;Curt has no idea how complex the modern economy

Yeah, he's only made millions building multiple entrepreneurial firms.Jews are perhaps the most infamous diasporic group in all history, which carries immense selection pressure for pluralist advocacy.Like what hoops?I'm talking about imposition on third-parties who did not agree to the contract.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s4i11923V04&amp;t=1h13m10s&gt; What makes anarcho capitalism "ashkenazi"?

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3rhsaw/daily_discussion_the_division_of_labor_is_limited/cwo56gb

&gt;Falsely sets the criterion for moral action as voluntary rather than non-production-of-incentive-to-retaliate
&gt;&gt;What is the difference?

There are voluntary actions, like lying by omission\u2014performing exchanges with asymmetric information\u2014which can infuriate and lead to retaliation.

&gt;So what seperates you from social democrats?

I'm not a democrat.

&gt;Imposing your state produces retaliation.

Criminals can not like it, but they don't matter.

&gt;regardless of whether he was lied, cheated
&gt;&gt;Ancap can prevent this.

Not if its governing ethic is 'voluntaryism'.

&gt;Are you saying that this is why ancap is bad, because it prohibits parasitism?

He's saying ancap is ineffective precisely because it does not prohibit social parasitism.

&gt;Open Bazaar will not be, and then your critique will have no meaning.

The digital world still exists ultimately in the material world.

&gt;Property rights are necessary to facilitate trade in the first place. After all, I cannot trade that which you do not recognize as mine, and vice versa.

And property rights are imposed as social pacts.

&gt;They're ancient techniques predating the modern era by millenia.

What are you referring to?

&gt;The value is the fee for performing escrow transactions.

Value as cost?I see all of us as imposing our ethics, and couldn't care less what leftists cry about.&gt; If you want to redefine all of economics you have a lot of explaining to do.

Economics already had the ability to analyze the logic of non-monetized action.

&gt;If he's actually been that successful, you'd think he'd be upfront about that on the interwebs.

Go FB chat him.Value isn't being determined, though.

Value is ordinal and actors by necessity choose their highest perceived ordinally ranked option in every moment.&gt;In what respect is Whitehead Nietzschean by the way?

Whitehead saw Being only ever as Becoming.  Using a Whitehead quote imperator likes: 

&gt;[...] _how_ an actual entity _becomes_ constitutes _what_ that actual entity _is_, so that the two descriptions of an actual entity are not independent.  Its 'being' is constituted by its 'becoming'.  This is the 'principle of process'.If your criticism is random sampling and sample size, then Lynn, Rushton, Gottfredson, Murray, Jensen, Vanhanen, et al. are going to make you very sad.I don't count among them, but there are nationalists who just want to see ways preserved and don't oppose any people having a right to the peaceful preservation of their nation; it's not that all nationalists must be opposed to each other.There's no doubt these four men had a special appreciation for Western history and culture and that particularly Mises and Hazlitt contributed significantly to the deconstruction of the socialist and bureaucratic schools of economics, via demanding existential proofs of policy claims made.

Mises took the route of human action and praxeology to embark on that and had some success against the socialists using it.  Unfortunately, the synthetic a priori was baseless and not even needed, and Misesianism was only the first step toward operational economics, not its completion.&gt;Terrorism was largely a construct of statist policy

Islam has been imperialistic and genocidal of outgroups for 1400 years, several centuries before the US and Britain got involved.

Ron Paul's a nice man, but his Christian universalist ideals get in the way sometimes: this would be one time.You probably should be concerned about people who tell you to convert or chop your head off.

But, that's just me.  Not like they have a 1400 year history of obliterating entire peoples...I'd be concerned about a Brazilianized United States government (Latino immigration reaching anti-WASP critical mass) and granting _it_ too much power, but I have less of a personal concern about a white nationalist type government.

Even with these, they are more peaceful than Latino Caesarianism, African familialism, and Islamic theocracies, and double the point if it's in the motion of wiping out one of the worst cultures that's ever existed in history and in guarding against the Brazilianization of the US.Reduction/deportation of Latino immigrants is probably the single most important issue for the US during the next 20 years.

If nothing changes throughout those 20, it's game over: we'll be on an unbreakable path toward Brazil-level corruption, crime, and GDP, with the only hope of a Soviet-esque breakdown and secession.

For Europe, they're probably already on a healthy path of reactionism, especially in certain parts.  The US is still years behind True identity shocks.Oh, the irony.I don't think Tucker would be a worthy opponent to debate on issues such as HBD and low trust vs. high trust libertarianism, but I'd still not turn down debating him.Cantwell is kind of close, but still very, very far from the mark.

It's my hope with time he catches up with where all the reactionaries are moving: Propertarianism, not mere NRx.

NRx is a dated movement with a couple basic, edgy insights into human nature, but not a systematic, scientific form of governance: Moldbug didn't succeed and Techno-Commercialism isn't it.&gt;a bastion for liberty on social issues

History doesn't link economic productivity and social liberty.

Economic productivity, as Northern Europe achieved, was a result of a long line of genetic pacification of undesirables.

There can be no doubt that social unrule has never been a plank of any rich society.Is discussing the political economic history of Northern Europe equivalent to "I love my sports team"?Islamic doctrine is, indeed, inherently imperialistic.

But, of course, not all Muslims follow it.

&gt;Those from resource-scarce environments are typically deceptive and warlike

The more accurate metrics are climate and population density, as the northern climes were more resource-scarce.&gt;I believe white European Muslims are potentially as dangerous as Arab Muslims because of the doctrines they hold.

It'd more be the genome of that individual white European, and then he latched on to a violent doctrine as a consummated gesture and logical next step, but the religion itself didn't cause him to be violent.

I agree with the OP in that Arabs are indeed a more violent group and that Islam is just a codification of those tendencies, but I disagree with him in claiming that doctrinal Islam is not a violent religion: it is.That screencapped comment from me is a nuanced meta-discussion between myself and an ethno-nationalist, SnakesoverEagles, talking about meritocracy vs. ethno-nationalism.

I'm a proponent of Curt's Propertarianism, which is race-neutral, but unafraid to create in effect racial stratification.  The trajectory of Western Europe is one of meritocracy, not mere ethno-nationalism, and it's why we became so wealthy.  High ethnocentrism and tribalism are why the rest of the world is not.

That comment above is asking Snakes why he should want to economically regress, by mimicking primitive culture's anti-meritocratic high ethno-centrism.

It's True social capital is of importance and that genetic similarity does play into that, but an operational meritocracy has no problems handling that.

That many 'anti-me' types are still so far behind in understanding my worldview that they couldn't see what I was actually saying to Snakes speaks to how unintelligent my opposition has been, but I look forward to continue working with and explaining it all to the intelligent ancaps out there, like /u/Faceh, /u/yesyeslibertarians, /u/lib-boy , and that Indian guy who created a new account.A section of Durant's _Story of Philosophy_, which handles Nietzsche and draws upon the latter's whole library of works.

I linked this part, because it's quite clear the OP understands maybe 5% of Nietzsche's philosophy, if he thinks N. would like 'anarcho-capitalism': A-C is just utopianism of the bourgeoisie, not the cultured-ascetic aristocracy Nietzsche wanted.There's no shame in admitting I may be right about the above.  It's certainly Austrian doctrine.

I understand the economic theory Bitcoin advocates must dabble in to make the device plausible, though.You can't accept something without having a proclivity to.

It's the same reason people can reject certain scientific points of view (evolution, HBD): they have an emotional proclivity against it.Well, that's all I've ever set out to do on this subreddit: handle political economic history.

History tells us a very enlightening and interesting political story.  I don't see why we should close our ears, least of all libertarians.I remember cringing when I discovered the by far highest voted comments I ever wrote as ex_logica were never ones of much quality.

But, my reply to you was more an indirect interrogation of whether you do engage in vote brigading, as that's fast becoming the only obstacle to the coming paradigm shift in ancap property theory (just see the thread where some of them admit shitting on the entire subreddit is their only option now).

I know dootyforyou has told me he spam downvotes me off and on.  It's weird, unbecoming stuff.&gt;At what point does social conservatism infringe upon liberty?

When cultural stagnancy and underinvestment of savings occur.

Islam and China would be extreme examples of this anti-Faustianism, for different reasons: Islam is murderous of all potential heresy and destroyed many better cultures in their imperialist expansion, and China is too docile to want to break out in the first place.

China actually had the material wealth to industrialize, but not the cultural interest: it is an interesting thing to note that the difference between the West and the East has its origins at the place of the very Great Wall\u2014the Steppe peoples, the category of the Indo-Europeans, a people who went on to found the Faustian way of Western life, vs. those who wished to keep them at bay, via that wall.

I hold to a balance between the three psychological specializations.  In terms of movements, I can be placed in the alt-right, among many conservatives, but it's not that I support hyperconservatism; it's just that we've gone too Left and need to rebalance.

In terms of personality, I'm a combination of conservative and libertarian, but militant in both.  I support radical, unapologetic masculinity, but am not stuffy on issues such as psychedelics, nootropics, and interesting and exotic areas of philosophy, hence why I don't support mere stuffy social conservatism for itself, only masculine-empirical radical aristocratic ethics.

&gt;How can any brand of social conservatism be implemented across private property rights borders

Well, I and Propertarianism have different conceptions of property; in Propertarianism, property is not merely the scarce physical, but whatever represents forgone opportunity costs and concerns cooperation/retaliation potentials.

&gt;Was Hitler's (yes godwin!) implementation of genetic pacification of undesirables compatible with free being a free society?

I don't know enough of the actual history to speak much on Hitler.  I look forward to educating myself on it over time, however.

Regarding eugenics, I like Curt's idea of buying off the underclasses: 

&gt;But assuming that we want to produce goods and services for those unable produce for others sufficiently to earn them, we can ask them to trade. My suggestion has been that we trade (a) one-child limit, (b) maintenance of the commons (c) a stipend based upon % of revenues independent of whether they work or not, (d) elimination of minimum wage so that they can collect both stipend (e) elimination of immigration by other than highly skilled labor for permanent citizenship.

&gt;In other words, we can conduct an exchange with them: do no harm to us through crime and reproduction and you will be insured against the vicissitudes of life. Break this deal and you will lose all and if necessary be sterilized and put in a labor prison in the desert for the rest of your life.It's not that I have to oppose determinist investigations, but that Diamond misconstructs the relative proportions of the factors: 

Whatever were the evolutionary pressures of the Indo-Europeans to become who they were (wide open plains, horse life, decentralized rule, lactose tolerance, heavy meat-dairy diet, etc.), this concentrated identity has unraveled itself out for millennia.

Where Diamond thinks Europeans became who they are in the modern era mostly because of recent factors, I, Duchesne, and Doolittle think we became who we are going back two major epochs: (1) the rise of the Indo-European aristocratic way of life, and (2) the selective build-up of very high trust in Northern Europe.

Talking about coal, steel, the New World, a disease here or there is really small-scale stuff, but not an accidental way of thinking either: it pervades much of academia and is in loose alliance with Marxian psychology.

They want and need Westerners to not be special in any built-up essentialist sense.  Diamond himself does not like civilization, but prefers the hunter-gatherer way of life.

He, of course, is a fool and an anti-Faustian wimp who would be one of the first wiped out in their murder raids.&gt;I even think they are doing so just to prove to the world that they are not weak as their forefathers who were raped by the mongols.

It's doctrinal Islam to genocide the males of outgroups and capture and sexually enslave their women.

The West didn't cause ISIS to do that just recently to the Yazidi.  ISIS is actually one of the groups most faithful to doctrinal Islam.

&gt;But western civilizations have their shares of being mindless salvage barbaric themselves.

When?  What is your definition of Western civilization?The color brown does indeed suck.&gt; it doesn't invalidate anything I said whatsoever

What I said is incompatible with what you said.

&gt;I don't think I've ever once seen you admit that you were wrong about anything

Oh, I've done it countless times.  I was wrong about anarcho-capitalism being a coherent system, for example.&gt;I've been thinking about the positives and negatives of a system where the state only permits taxpayers to vote only, and where government workers and those on welfare are not permitted to.

That's basically what an aristocracy is.Yes, only US cops suck.  I forgot which subreddit I was on.&gt;gamesProbably because he was a boring BA History student who wasn't smart enough to go to grad school, let alone study something more advanced.You need the West to not be special, yes, we know.None of this explains the lack of scientific development, which progressed in Europe independent of the State.

China had a much different view of the world.  From which author(s) are you getting your historical analysis?Did the US cause Islam to have a 1400 year history of genocide and mass slavery?Didn't she nepotistically favor Jews?That's _just_ how dumbed down ancap may have become, lol.It was always just a cringe moralizing, mere state-hate site anyways.Taxation is theft!Someone who has a weird fetish for the downfall of their own kind, conscious or unconscious.

In the latter case, it would be blatant disregard for observing predatory outgroups and repeatedly licensing their predation.Though some people have abused the slur to simply mean "someone who disagrees with me" (as happens with almost every slur), it does have a coherent meaning: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3vu8ci/molyneux_stop_being_a_cuck/cxqs6hs?context=3Rich, innovative societies are Western and have traditionally been high trust with various social mores.

Totally irrelevant, and what's more, we do have political economics explaining it.&gt;Did you abstain from pre-marital sex with big titted Mary-Beth?

This is madness!&gt;while I squat bigCialis is mixed.&gt;What makes degeneracy fine on occasion?

Why, the Dionysian-Apollonian cycle, of course.

You think we glorious Indo-Europeans want to be mere baby-dicked, anti-Faustian, but high trust Japs?One day, my son, I will explain to you the nuance of Faustian high trust.

It's not mere Puritanism, and I'd rather be poor and Faustian than rich and boring.That's pre-battle meditation.

[This](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vqxNJQN4dxE) is what crackles from the sky when the show begins.I don't even personally know that guy.  He's certainly not a member of my circle.

As I said, my values haven't changed.  There's probably a great deal I need to explain to my old transhumanist friends.  I don't advocate for mere social conservatism, but the Faustian spirit.This should help clarify some of your questions: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3vbh9g/a_few_questions_for_the_altright/cxmo6c2

I can explain more from here.  I highly, _highly_ recommend reading Duchesne's [_The Uniqueness of Western Civilization_](http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf), to understand how Nietzscheanism could connect to some of what I say on political economics.

I actually don't personally like some social conservatives and many libertarians, finding some of the former too stuffy and many of the latter too merely bourgeois, but what I put forward is radical empiricism, a solar warrior ethic.No, I think he's mixed Hispanic, or something.  Could be other things, too.

Though most of us are dirty blonde, blue-eyed Germanics (with some Slavs), I actually have a couple Spaniards here and there in my circle, but they more prefer the continental traditions.

I am interested in ethnicity and genetic peculiarities, but that doesn't mean I write off demonstrated merit.The testosterone question has reached a wife's tale of mythos, with data even directly contradicting the claim: tiny Filipino boys have more testosterone than even Africans.

It's more free testosterone, its use (androgen receptors), and then various behavioral alleles.  There's something very, very strange about Steppe peoples: they're the most restless, aggressive people that we've ever known of.

It was from there entire religions were constructed out of war and glorious death, with funerals completely focused on how the man was defined by the two.&gt;aristocracy is being a muscly man at the gym

So True: we read 600 page books on lift technique.

&gt;to sustain their superiority complex

Was your comment's logic just how you can bear your inferiority complex?

Don't want people having pride and a glorious Faustian outlook on life, now.Conceal your insecure scorn a little better.Yes, it's Yiddish for "crazy, driven mad, insane."  Essentially, Dionysian.

Not the language I would choose, but those drums earn a pardon.http://i.imgur.com/aWsULDp.gifvBingo, two-dimensional narrative that makes me feel good.Why not?  Fuck Islam; they don't deserve to exist.

There's no reason we shouldn't take the Middle East's oil and the region under protectorateship.

They can't bring the oil and gas to market by themselves, and I see no reason giving any of the proceeds to them.&gt;You can't use language like that.

"Well, you're a pussy, too."

_reeeeeeeeeee_It was really because of the hair.You wrote this, right, Cialis?&gt;The basic meaning of "jihad" is to exert oneself for the good of Islam

And what is doctrinal Islam?  To live like Muhammad...The US is 63% white non-Hispanic.I'm a meritocrat.  Why would I want to mimic more primitive cultures' evo strats?I'm mostly indifferent to Ayn Rand.  My views of her consist of: 

* [She was a mediocre, failed Nietzschean](http://atlassociety.org/objectivism/atlas-university/deeper-dive-blog/4426-nietzsche-and-ayn-rand).

* Her low trust hyperindividualism was indicative of her background and not in keeping with the Western trajectory of Teutonic law.

As for the above claim, I believe I heard both Darch and [Greg Johnson say it.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lvUDVyySzQo&amp;t=55s)Gypsies aren't aristocrats, by definition.In all likelihood, she could have done it simply because [Jews are disproportionately likely to endorse and lead lives of individualist anti-authoritarianism](http://chelm.freeyellow.com/Jewish_index.html), in keeping with their diasporic ethics against landed ideologies, like Teutonic law and aristocratic ethics.Xenophobia is practiced by nearly every species.  Its activity in the brain occurs at the base reptilian part.

Only the PFC, which is largely a development of humans, has the potential to suppress it.&gt;tabula rasa when it fit her needs
&gt;&gt;For example...?
&gt;&gt;If it has to do with biology, you have to take into consideration the scientific knowledge of the day. Ignorance can't be avoided sometimes.

Anti-biological determinism, anti-nationalism, and special snowflake-ism are core functional cogs of libertarianism.

If you cede these, you often fall out of libertarianism, into some form of social collectivism.

Ayn would have vehemently opposed modern neuroscience and evolutionary psychology, devising an explanation that they had somehow been infected by collectivism.Israel isn't a beacon of civilization, but a low trust ethno-state that sucks at the West's teet.

&gt;The Arabs are one of the least developed cultures. They are typically nomads.

She's ironically describing the Ashkenazim.

&gt;I find it odd when NRxers go on about how whites should defend themselves from foreign savages but when Jews do it...

I don't care about them defending themselves against Arabs.  I'm just not going to kid myself that they're not a low trust ethno-state themselves.&gt;And lets not overlook that at the time Iran had a bazillion Jews and Israel had plenty of Arabs. The middle east has historically been a place of large diversity. It's only in more recent times

This is a lie: the Middle East _was_ more diverse and peaceful at one time, but that was before Muhammadism wiped out Anatolian Christians, Afghan Buddhists, Pakistani Hindu, Iranian Christians and Zoroastrians, and God knows how many Jewish tribes.

&gt;It's only in more recent times, with the intervention of Cold War superpowers, that States have become more ethno-nationalist.

Actually, ethno-nationalism has been the norm for several thousands of years.  It's only been in recent times where we've known the possibility of low ethnocentrism, and only one part of the world achieved it at that.Yes, there are some Jews who, due to the thousands of years spent in diaspora and how that incentivized an advocacy for pluralism, can't support the creation of a landed aristocratic ideology even for their own kind.

I watched an interesting lecture of one Israeli lamenting how lost many leftist American Jews are.&gt;Ayn Rand's opinion of modern neuroscience is unknown to me, and you for that matter.

Aristotle knew to laugh at the tabula rasa, thousands of years ago, same with Hume, hundreds of years ago.

Anyone who believes in it at any point in time is doing so for a psychological, religious need, just like Plato did what he did for psychological, religious needs.

&gt;Her philosophy would imply that she would accept evidence over preference ... amend her beliefs where necessary

Except that facile atheistkult types are that way for psychological reasons, usually a revolt against society and its aristocratic ethics (hence, why so many atheists are anti-social and unkempt fedoras), not that they truly will put themselves at the mercy of Science's razor.

Flying blind as in having ethnic border regulations?

That's been the US policy through the majority of its history.&gt;comparing immigration control to the literal extinction of mankind is a little bit hyperbolic
&gt;&gt;No, it uses the same logic.

The US had ethnic immigration regulation throughout the majority of its history, and yet it wasn't "total decimation of all human life," but a very prosperous nation.

Now, I'm not advocating for 100% racial lines, but we shouldn't be afraid to say no to immigrants, and if that results in 95% of Arabs not being allowed in, so be it.&gt;advocating for such an immigration policy is itself hyperbole because it is extreme and not grounded in the reality of the situation

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3vv9ey/trump_calls_for_complete_shutdown_of_muslims/cxr2g49?context=3&gt;is posturing itself as an enemy of Islam and therefore worthy of (further) retaliations

The problem with this reasoning is that Islam has a 1400 year history of unprovoked imperialism, genocide, and slavery.

The more likely phenomenon going on is that Islamists want us to go easy on them as long as possible and while it's advantageous to them.

It's actually in doctrinal Islam to lie to the kafir, if it furthers jihad.  The way Muslims treat Europeans' good faith testifies to their deceptiveness.They're pretty good, but I think I prefer [the dark ambient vibe of Drudkh.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sBnyyfvDwX8)&gt;I get that it's not much, but the desire for a clean house is a nice moral foundation, and a well-kept house leads to a nicer neighborhood which in turn leads to a better economy.

_You're spooked, brah!_

Liberate yourself with the poz.&gt;I had 6 beers over the weekend, ended up with a headache.

The next day or while?  If the former, be sure to take 1-3 aspirin with 1-2 full glasses of water in you before sleeping.

Your liver will get water priority to some degree over your brain, while it's making everything water-soluble, so it can be flushed out.  This leads to an expansion of your brain, like many organs in your body do when they're trying to expand activity/absorption, leading to cranic pressure and a headache.

If you take NSAIDs in anticipation, you will inhibit the enzymes that create that inflammation and wake up feeling mostly if not entirely fine.  Just stay away from acetaminophen, as it forces double duty on your liver in a way other NSAIDs like ibuprofen and acetylsalicylic acid (aspirin) don't.

Alcohol (and caffeine) consumption increase urination (as we all know), so Vitamin B6/12 replenishment isn't uncalled for, though it takes very, very little to accomplish that, which meat can do.

&gt;I'm just another brick in the wall. Nothing special about me.

Ah, but even the greatest aristocracies and even the greatest elites need their loyal, principled men.

Alexander the Great conquered millions, but he still needed his loyal 50,000.

&gt;marijuana spared me from a lot of suffering

That's right: Marijuana is an incredibly more sophisticated form of medicine than most people realize, completing certain effects doctors and scientists want to pursue, with fewer compromising side-effects.  I know a guy who recently completed his PhD on its effects on just one neuroreceptor.There's no doubt that you speak of valid psychological concepts.

I just think you may be practicing a bit of the insecurity yourself, given how extensive my presentations have been here, all in good faith.These matters aren't as cut-and-dry: the Aztec warrior culture wasn't entirely condemnable, as vicious as it was (and that does inevitably come with the territory).

It's similar to how vicious Islam can be, but it's why we need to be the better barbarians than all of them.Are you familiar with Duchesne and Curt Doolittle?

The East Asian question is handled quite nicely (and fairly).If you and one or two others became race realists, it's certainly well after I parted ways with you guys.

And we really are only talking about one or two guys, not "most of this sub's race realists."Weapons and war are precisely why aristocracies and freedom have ever existed.What is a rational, principled defense of liberty which does not exterminate Islamist chimpanzees?My god do you fuckers actually know the history of Islam?&gt;Securing oil fields with private security would be much easier than going to war.

You're going to have a rude awakening when you realize that's approximately what the US and Britain did, in telling Islamic nations they didn't get to have all of the West's efforts in refining their oil, which they didn't know how to do by themselves.

&gt;Why is oil and gas so important? Why not just ride a bike?

Max cringe.  I thought ancaps were supposed to understand science?

I guess this is a sign of the times for this movement.[O CAPTAIN!  MY CAPTAIN!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I22xdJgraZw&amp;t=4s)

(God, you know you're getting big when your arms are larger than what they cast in Hollywood.)Meanwhile, [(;\u00b4\u0f0e\u0eb6\u0414\u0f0e\u0eb6`)](http://i.imgur.com/wJecevw.jpg).&gt;You want to go tit for tat?

Are you saying Islam isn't a genocidal doctrine?I don't know.  The counter-signalers are woe to stick an Arab cock down their throat if it means "NRx" don't take over their Internets, right before getting their heretic head put on a pike.

Boy, you sure showed me: go ahead and head on that trajectory, friend.  I couldn't want a better fate for you.You probably should study history a little more.&gt;pedophilia is a crime

muh napsI can't remember the last time I laughed this hard: We kill criminals, _and this somehow preserves our freedom!_&gt;because within the quotas are reflected a number of factors, including how many people from each nation even want to move here

What evidence do you even have for that?

&gt;Terrorism is not directly related to Islam

Why isn't it?

&gt;as well as based on the fact that we've been bombing the middle east for at least two decades or more

Islam was largely peaceful beforehand?Why's that?Anti-Semite.Great, thorough arguments.  This subreddit is just like your heroed /r/askhistorians.

I totally wouldn't be max cringing were I still an ancap and you were my herald.&gt;You don't win arguments with armchair psychologizing.

Why not?

&gt;Is there a pathology associated with nietzscheism?

To varying degrees, absolutely.  Nietzsche, the man, is certainly not my standard-bearer, as lovely a prose writer as he was.Doesn't mean much if they want to do that: the genomes don't go that way.

&gt;But 20% is higher than any single minority group in the US.

Which is not the direction you were going in when you said: 

&gt;Which is more than all minorities in America put together

What a low IQ desperate embarrassment you've become.No, it's aceta, which if you didn't believe me you could have simply Googled and found out.My mom is a robot viking.&gt;it is hard to imagine that not being the case, unless there is proof otherwise

Why wouldn't poor people want to move to more peaceful, capitally dense areas?

&gt;There is plenty of evidence to show it may be political and territorial and because we have been attacking Middle Eastern nations

Can you show me that evidence, and can you run down each instance of Muslim violence?

&gt;ultimately we should judge living people based on their current actions

Should you ultimately judge a bear only after it's mauling your head?&gt;for the groups that commit violent acts of terrorism, who are rather small in number

Warriors and soldiers of civilizations are always smaller in number as a percentage.

What matters is whether the broader civilization signs off, which it does.&gt;this is involving different people many hundreds of years later

Why are they sufficiently different?  What's your criteria for evaluating that?I can't remember even in a dream saying such a thing._SHAWT DOHN._&gt;I witnessed it

How did it happen?

&gt;to manipulate discussions through upvotes/downvotes on a niche subReddit that affects nothing of any substance whatsoever

And yet you so intensely want to spend your time here convincing me that that's True.Certainly tell me if it's not contained within that speech.

I know Greg said it, for sure, just a matter of locating it within the only 2-3 boring speeches I bothered to listen to of his.

I want to say it was his speech to the Mencken society, so if I didn't link that speech then that'd be why.No, Curt heavily delimits what NRx thought it achieved.

T-C hoped to privatize all commons, which is diametrically opposed to Curt's project.You mean, when Muslims weren't allowed entry at all?The Saudis are certainly entitled to handle the criteria they want to use for doling out killings.

They're also entitled to the accompanying economic growth or decline.Except providing "evidence" in private is not in keeping with an open, public court process: we have no way of knowing you aren't just linking me with someone who is not me, with no substantiation.&gt;Neither should be necessary

Well, you and I were having the exchange: not providing me with the evidence is quite justifiably seen as a cop-out.Then, I guess it can't be found out whether I did or did not substantiate.

Given that I have never intentionally misled and have a long reputation of that, I feel confident with this outcome.&gt;You know a lot of them are interbred with the Spanish.

Amerindian-derived people are not white, just as Mulattoes aren't.

Well, it's a judgment informed by a broader reading of his philosophy.

He did post [a lengthy critique of and commentary on the trajectory and meaning of NRx](https://www.facebook.com/curt.doolittle/posts/10153563989217264), though.Probably nothing deeper than what War Machine thinks.Terrorism in the sense that they are the weaker party.

Violent in the sense that they are always interested in domination, whether they are the materially weaker or stronger, as history demonstrates.

Just look at what they did to the Yazidi, as soon as they were given the material chance.It's certainly True that Arabs are the viler Muslims, which is not an accident, since Medina Islam began there and only later conquered places such as Iran.No, I think both of them likely require those cogs.

Why should I think otherwise?&gt;while I'm by no means as openly racist as /u/of_ice_and_rock

I'm open to racial differences and preferences, but don't commit the ecological fallacy, the gold standard of 'racism'.Yeah, there are probably two independent brigades against me.And that the Spanish are Phoenician-derived.

I won't entirely hate on them, though, as Portugal had a _very_ Faustian exploratory culture, sending it all the way to India, with almost no resources.Nice, thanks for that.It's an honest mistake, and I'm certain you were earnest in your association of the two, but Nietzsche found Nihilism as his number one enemy.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OblnXEke7FE&amp;t=46s

Indeed, he only hated Platonism and Christianity for their being nihilistic schools.  Nietzscheans are immoralists, not nihilists.&gt;it is my duty as an ancap to fight nrx on moral grounds

What are those moral grounds?

&gt;we tend to be rather aware of the acts of aggression that the U.S. has initiated

That isn't the matter of dispute: what is is whether Islam is peaceful by itself.Pretty good.  How do you feel about [industrial](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I1d4VWR6ch0)?China did it to Tibet, too.  Many libertarians don't realize that migratory swamping is an ancient tool of the State.

Why shouldn't the United States government want to increase a demographic which wants it to expand its power?To the extent these cogs are abandoned is the extent to which the 'libertarian' is likely a hybrid conservative, like myself and many others, like Hoppe.&gt;It could be that africans might naturally have a different hormonal cutoff, but that's a long stretch from saying it's genetic.

Are you referring to the fact that Africans do, in fact, develop more quickly (gestation, puberty, etc.)?

It's pretty immaterial to our point.

&gt;it still isn't genetic because genes don't directly start or stop brain development - that is done through hormones

The nature v. nurture hypothesis is ultimately about heritability v. changeability.Sugarcoating where the evidence points on a given issue is not indicative of an environment that will accept cold economics either.

The ancaps I've known over the years who were very strong on economics have gradually also become race realists, because they had the ability to be reasonable.

Trying to make a cut-off point between the two is clunky and strange; it's not in our nature to not be reasonable, so your effort will likely fail.&gt;it is not part of anarcho capitalism

And yet Europeans are the only ones who've ever had even classical liberalism.

How can you say sociobiology isn't important\u2014even vitally critical\u2014to what politics form?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jWYRDCIAKKk

It's experimental industrial, made by one of the pioneers of the genre.

I found this group while I was in the middle of reading Evola, and I must say the combination is _subliiiiiime!_&gt;whites are superior to blacks

One has to always first name the dimension: 

West Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having a greater fast twitch muscle density in their legs (sprints, jumping).

East Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having a sizable combination of fast and slow twitch muscle density in their legs (medium endurance running).

Sub-Saharan Africans are 'superior' to Europeans in having straighter femurs, which give a more efficient running skeletal profile; in having greater bone density where it's advantageous; in having slightly longer legs (running, jumping), and in having wider nostrils and larger lips where heat dispersal is important.

Europeans are 'superior' to Africans in having lower bone density where it's advantageous (swimming), slightly shorter legs, but higher innate upper body strength (weightlifting, wrestling), and narrower nostrils and smaller lips where heat retention is important.

These, of course, are just some of the physical differences, too: there are developmental differences, hormonal differences, and neuronal differences.He also came from a very long line of Jewish rabbis.

Given diasporic Jews' tendency to end up in sociology and in making fundamental critiques of the West (see [_Culture of Critique_](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Culture_of_Critique_series)), it's not that shocking he did what he did, and if one understands what the Jewish evolutionary strategy is (pseudoscience, scriptural interpretation), it's even less shocking.Do you have any interest in observing the current alt-right fights that happen here?

Otherwise, I'm not sure this place is much better.&gt;The anarchists.  These are not the oppressed classes, but the outcasts of the community of all classes hitherto.

&gt;Seeing that all our classes are permeated by these elements, we have grasped the fact that modern society is not a 'society' or a 'body', but a diseased agglomeration of Chandala, a society which no longer has the strength even to excrete.&gt;high school drama

_"When the anarchist, as the mouthpiece of the declining strata of society, demands with a fine indignation what is 'right', 'justice', and 'equal rights', he is merely under the pressure of his own uncultured state, which cannot comprehend the real reason for his suffering\u2014what it is that he is poor in: life._

_A causal instinct asserts itself in him: it must be somebody's fault that he is in a bad way.  Also, the 'fine indignation' itself soothes him; it is a pleasure for all wretched devils to scold: it gives a slight but intoxicating sense of power._

_Even plaintiveness and complaining can give life a charm for the sake of which one endures it: there is a fine dose of revenge in every complaint; one charges one's own bad situation, and under certain circumstances even one's own badness, to those who are different, as if that were an injustice, a forbidden privilege. 'If I am canaille, you ought to be too'\u2014on such logic are revolutions made."_ -- _Twilight of the Idols_

---

_"The well-born simply felt themselves happy; they did not have to manufacture their happiness artificially through looking at their enemies, or in cases to talk and lie themselves into happiness (as is the custom with all resentful men); and similarly, complete men as they were, exuberant with strength, and consequently necessarily energetic.  They were too wise to dissociate happiness from action\u2014activity becomes in their minds necessarily counted as happiness (that is the etymology of \u03b5\u1f56 \u03c0\u03c1\u03ac\u03c4\u03c4\u03b5\u03b9\u03bd)._

_All in sharp contrast to the 'happiness' of the weak and the oppressed, with their festering venom and malignity, among whom happiness appears essentially as a narcotic, a deadening, a quietude, a peace, a Sabbath, an enervation of the mind and relaxation of the limbs\u2014in short, a purely passive phenomenon._

_While the aristocratic man lived in confidence and openness with himself (\u03b3\u03b5\u03bd\u03bd\u03b1\u1fd6\u03bf\u03c2, 'noble-born', emphasizes the nuance sincere, and perhaps also 'na\u00eff'), the resentful man, on the other hand, is neither sincere nor na\u00eff, nor honest and candid with himself._

_His soul squints; his mind loves hidden crannies, tortuous paths and back-doors, everything secret appeals to him as his world, his safety, his balm; he is past master in silence, in not forgetting, in waiting, in provisional self-depreciation and self-abasement._

_..._

_To be unable to take his enemies, his misfortunes and even his misdeeds seriously for long\u2014that is the sign of strong, rounded natures who possess a superfluity of moulding plastic force, that heals completely and produces forgetfulness: a good example of this in the modern world is Mirabeau, who had no memory for any insults and meannesses which were practised on him, and who was only incapable of forgiving because he forgot._

_Such a man indeed shakes off with a shrug many a worm which would have buried itself in another; it is only in characters like these that we see the possibility (supposing, of course, that there is such a possibility in the world) of the real 'love of one's enemies'."_ -- _On the Genealogy of Morals_

I like the shitlord aspects of her, but little else.

(If you want [the ultimate female shitlord.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Savitri_Devi))&gt;I think as she says, she may have the only consistent philosophy that you can live a fulfilling life under.

[Oh, hai.](http://i.imgur.com/BZoFwEu.jpg)&gt;Psychology and philosophy don't mix.

For analytics, not continentals.  It's pretty easy to force biopsychology to the fore, either by getting at what logic really is or even invoking modern neuroscience.&gt;outright fascistic

What's wrong with this?

'Fascism' isn't one and the same as 20th century totalitarianism; it more concerns a spirit of a polity.

Capitalism can be thought of as rule by the bourgeoisie, Communism rule by the proletariat, and Fascism rule by the aristos.

Fascism is about [a kind of ascended spirit](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3o7wr7/daily_discussion_thread_everything_about_me_on/cvutbif), which Captalism materializes into timid mediocrity, which Communism then seeks to simply end by ending civilization itself.&gt;anarcho-capitalists turning toward mutualism

Many more are leaving it for the alt-right, not mutualism.&gt;Most people who identify them as previously AnCap tend to have an extremely poor understanding of what AnCaps actually believe

This was True before the alt-right when the very few who left here and there went into leftism and mutualism.

Now, however, you're going to have a hard time finding post-ancaps who went further to the Right (the majority of the exodus now) not being able to show specialized knowledge of the treatises.

Many of us have actually read much more ancap literature than the present ancap flag wavers.Have you seen him debate sociobiology?

The man clearly shows up.  I'm just a fraudulent former ancap.

&gt;saying his own arguments for his position are so difficult that not even most of the people on this sub that call themselves anarcho-capitalists could grasp them

He's just a second-tier consequentialist ancap; he wasn't that impressive to us other consequentialists back in the day.That's pretty silly: I'm a talented real-time debater, but I've been methodically taken to task by certain commentators whom I'm confident are not aggressive orators.

It's essentially an INTJ v. ENTJ battle, where the former can offer good criticism if you're noble enough to give him the time.&gt;Mostly through Center for a Stateless Society.

http://i.imgur.com/uUt3oMr.png

https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/328aw4/keith_preston_on_c4ss_theyre_all_crazy_nutcase/Bourgeois self-hatred.Libertarianism is failing because it's too leftist, too Levantine.

For it to manifest, it must do what it did before: be high trust.I recently collated the rest of the Nietzsche quotes I like, as I move on into Evola, J\u00fcnger, and Ortega (and do the same for them).What's so outlandish about different sociobiological groups adapting to different geographic and sociopolitical circumstances, leading to different evolutionary strategies?

From where did you even think cultural differences arise?(\u3065\uffe3 \u00b3\uffe3)\u3065

I have a great deal of virtue ethics content from Evola and J\u00fcnger coming, too.It's a question of the degree of subconscious self-deceit.

It's True you can find certain types who are not as vengeful as the most anti-civilizational minds, but as regards "equality," it depends on the manner in which you're approaching it.

If it's out of explicit "this is what's right and just!" then it is decadent, which is to also say 'self-loathing', 'unknown to oneself', 'slavish plotting'.

If it's out of an unconscious "I do not need the cowardice of arbitrary subjugation and restraint" [monarchical rule v. aristocratic rule], then it's of course not decadent, but very strong.

The above quote describes a man who is too strong to have need for special revenge, for deep-seated grudges; due to his overflowing vitality, he is happy to enrich his enemies, to give them their "due" (even though there really isn't such a thing and nor does he need such machinations) and their chance to prove themselves and meet spirit-to-spirit.

In describing this, I am partially presenting Aristocratic Egalitarianism, which endorses an 'equality' only out of the relish of an honorable challenge, a chance to stretch one's limbs and enjoy one's power (sex and athletics are the few outlets we have left where men are True to themselves and commune with all dimensions of their spirit).http://i.imgur.com/qAtmaes.gifv

What's a great man without his escort of gossipers?Some of the recent ones were, but the term ultimately goes back to aristocracies.That's the monarchical-totalitarian form of ruling so common to the East.

'Fascism' derives from Roman and Etruscan aristocratic roots, which is unique to the West.

Unfortunately, though, much of the West has regressed into bourgeois consumerism and plebeian anti-culture.

And for the record, I don't know that much about the German and Italian fascist movements of the 20th century to be able to say where they stayed True to Aristocratic Egalitarianism and where they went off into Eastern despotism.  I look forward to knowing soon, though.A martial disposition toward adversity is admirable and spiritually empowering, but an anti-artistic, mere thug mindset doesn't take one to any higher consciousness.I see you're still enjoying the lion phase.Well, that's the scientific parlance; take it up with the evolutionary psychologists.Christians tend to be more charitable._Auhtizmz feez_ _geewwwddd!_Curt is actually a heavy analytic, not much like me.http://www.bibotu.com/books/2012/Th%20e%20Uniqueness%20of%20Western%20Civilization.pdf

I'd start with Chapter 7, but you can read the whole thing.Looks more like a broad synthesis of various modes of analysis, but if you say so.lol&gt;calls me a race traitor

lolwutProbably near the end of the year.It's a very useful interpretative tool for organizing people and dispositions toward them.

The descriptions they give tend to be spot on and the advice on faults helpful.because - but - however - because - however \u2014 value preferences.It would be better if there was archaeological evidence presented on the native Africans, rather than 'eye witness' accounts.

Many Classicists believe Julius Caesar lied about the barbarity and polyarmory of the Gauls, and I imagine this is a fairly common act for civilizations with an incentive to dehumanize.I like it on some levels and would have _really_ liked such an explicit system in my ex_logica days, but I understand now the extent to which dialectics is egalitarian and spiritually and artistically suicidal.

It's not an accident philosophy has historically moved toward egalitarianism\u2014dialectics is the very first step toward leftism.&gt;Personally, I'm not a big fan of the whole enslavement and mass killing of any peoples, even if it does get them to stop ripping out hearts and enslaving each other.

How would you handle such a foreign culture?Are we coming out as [Nazis](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sW80JfXLZGs&amp;t=25s) now?&gt;Eye witness evidence is more reliable than archeology

Not as an absolute, no, far from it.  It just depends on multiple factors what you go with.

Forensics bleeds into archaeology and often with similar rigor.

Obviously, if there's comparatively less to go by with archaeological evidence of an area, we can consider eye witness accounts more heavily, but even here prudence must be taken.Have you looked into these two authors yet?

* http://www.goldberg-patriarchy.com/

* http://marchofthetitans.com/

Have you finished _The Uniqueness of Western Civilization_ yet?&gt;"Why shouldn't seasteading go south, too, like the mainland?"

&gt;&gt;"Because property rights and contract."

&gt;&gt;&gt;"So, more social rigidity."

These two supposed paths to ancap are bedfellows\u2014seasteading and tech; they are both ways of dissecting fluid society into abstract, isolated units of account, which can be mathematically manipulated and reconstructed in a way that pleases the rationalist.

In all this, the irrational, the animalistic must be hated, hated for being incomprehensible to the weapons of the rationalist, hated for being a world not bourgeois _in toto_ \u2014 the State as the greatest concentration of the anti-rational, one that will never be conquered by the bourgeois rationalist.

The only way forward from here is to accept nations as pre-conscious biological phenomena and stop trying to conquer them with post-conscious tools, as if 'property rights and contracts' could circle back and turn on its origin.I'm more making an (obscure) philosophical point, rather than one couched in the analytic framework.

Maybe reading [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/35ctpo/the_neonazi_element_in_this_sub_is_disturbing/cr3q0br) will help.Why should you be concerned whether your political philosophy for society has no awareness of society?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9hB9bRQlXz4&gt;humanist politicsHasn't Penn always been more the touchy-feely sort?

It's not that surprising.  In the end, you guys need us levelheaded shitlords.(Extreme) 'income inequality' has the potential to break up a social pact.

Aristocratic republics existed as social pacts where the aristos were allowed to enjoy their higher abilities because they still ensured all boats rose and kept the nation together.

Many aristos even enjoyed this burden being placed on them, as a chance to demonstrate heroism and grandeur.

However, today in the US, we have an aristocratic class that isn't really an aristocratic class: they exist blissfully unaware of [the death of the working class,](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6q3zy4NRzz4) and the chances of the social pact\u2014where some measure of inequality is tolerated by that working class\u2014breaking are increasing from here.Would ancap not use drones?The Left has always been about identity politics.&gt;No wonder why the mexican cartel put a million dollar bounty on trump.

It was supposedly $100 million, but the DEA regards it as fake.Low skilled labor is not going to generate enough productivity and it also shifts the voting demographics even further toward leftism.

Obama wouldn't have gotten elected in '08 or '12 had we just had the demographics of '91, that's how quickly things are changing.

Another decade of Hispanic immigration and we'll be pushed even further to the Left.

And you were talking about encouraging lazy people?Latinos have already treated the US like dirt for the majority of their time here, by repeatedly voting 70% Democrat and pushing the Democrat party into the coalition of anti-whitey, anti-European legal institutions.&gt;You think he'd be a Hitler 2.0 with Latinos in the place of Jews?

We know your butthole puckers at the chance to morally shriek and sigh.Anarchy is indeed international law.Race and ethnicity are the scaffold for a particular culture and set of sociopolitical institutions.With regard to point 2, Lincoln's treatment of the South also acted as a warning to Northern copperhead secessionists.The only thing I can recall calling people on the issue of race is a cuck\u2014a self-hating whitey.

I'm a meritocrat more than an ethno-nationalist, but when one goes out of their way to hate whitey, you bet I revile that level of self-hatred.I recommend taking a look at [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2pfj5h/antimetaphysical_egoism/).

I'll explain anything else from there.&gt;Saying the individual is the fundamental social unit is no less aware of society than a study of atoms is unaware of molecules.

Even with the invention of the isolated atom, we run the risk of pretending like its identity isn't connected to the Universe in the manner it is.

&gt;Social atomism sees society as an emergent creation of the action of individuals

And this is an invention.Do you support Barack Obama?  Because they sure did.

They have little to no awareness of the European historical arc.

They want more and more services; almost every party south of the border is explicitly socialist and communist.&gt;Cantwell just disavowed NRx as statists

Oh, no, we're going down now; all bets were on this random outsider Cantwell who's read 1/2000th of the literature.

&gt;Mao was right, political power comes largely out of the barrel of a gun. Our choices are to cower from this reality, or to fight for the most noble of causes.

"Hahaha, Cantwell just disavowed ancap as pansies.  Classic, and True."

&gt;My biggest problem with Cantwell is he has not learned the deeper lesson of love.

"My biggest problem with Cantwell is he doesn't understand this ideology like I do, _but he totes understands the other one, huehuehuehue._"You are cringeworthily ignorant.  The testimonialist branch does not push for or love the State, but sees it as a social parasite complicit with much of the cultural decline.

The State pushes for multiculturalism, for Christ's sake.  Perhaps you multiculturalist blank slaters should realize whose dinner table you're at.You take a look at Kevin MacDonald's works yet?Apple is actually a hilariously shitty company with hilariously shitty products.You good little Christian, revolting against Rome.

What I don't understand is why you shouldn't go full on into your vengeful ideology and join those even more leftist.&gt;One of the primary advantages of libertarianism is that it would allow Mr. Cantwell to get together with other's who share his cultural beliefs and put them into practice

How did this libertarianism come about in the first place?

&gt;us who disagree with Mr. Cantwell to associate in alternative communities

Like Detroit?  Like Chicago?  Like Atlanta? Like South Africa?  Like Haiti?  Like the Levant? Like Somalia?

Where are the non-majority white libertarian paradises?

&gt;Social practice diversity (within the confines of libertarian axiomatic commitments)

So, 95% white kind of "diversity."Have you taken a look at Curt Doolittle's [Propertarianism](http://www.propertarianism.com/) yet?

It's to ancap what ancap was to classical liberalism; that is, the next phase and how we _actually_ reduce and eliminate the State, with much more history and science on its side.&gt;Don't we all?

Whites do not demand for greater government services nearly as much as blacks and Hispanics.

&gt;You mean like Europe?

The democratic socialist states in Europe are not full blown communist like many parts of Latin and South America (not even Norway and Sweden are that socialist; when you actually look under the hood, you see they do have a capitalist ethos).

They also have been dealing with a hostile elite like us Americans (e.g. anti-free speech legislation passed that imprisons you if you say, "Maybe not exactly 6 million Jews died in the Holocaust," even though free speech is a deeply European institution).

Nationalism is slowly growing in Europe, starting in France and the East, but slowly building up in other areas, like Poland, Germany, and the UK; the elites want to keep breaking it up, but the greater tide is turning.What if the collateral damage is deemed worth it on the broader market?

What if there were few willing to represent or collect for contingent victims?

Let's not kid ourselves that brown people are going to all of a sudden become high trust and establish high market value.&gt;Maybe I would still attempt to conquer the Americas and force them to give up sacrificial rituals and keep them from fighting each other out of some sense that what I'm doing is for the greater good but still allow non-toxic aspects of their culture to exist.

And when they descend upon your people with spears and shields?

&gt;What about you? Would you do anything differently than our timeline?

I don't know all the specifics of Spanish colonialism.  Any aristocratic republic I was a part of I would want to practice a sustainable division of labor between the classes: the workers, the bourgeoisie, the aristos, the artist mythmakers.

I don't hate brutal cultures, least of all the Aztecs.  As an enemy, I would proudly honor them how they would want to be honored: on the battlefield.

Life, after all, isn't about survival; it's about ascending and experiencing the Sublime how one will, before one's life flickers out, perhaps as the brightest moment right before it does.

[War and Warriors](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w3eNMHPALjA&amp;t=1h22m2s)And yet where are the toilet paper shortages in Europe?&gt;Where else do you see society then? Can you point to it? Weigh it?

Yes, I see society as sociobiological blocs.

&gt;We recognize the concept of a network is an abstraction over many individual components

And why can't it be the other way around?  The individual as the "useful invention"?&gt;Nothing is for nothing, and suffering is the price.

I like this.

&gt;One day we shall march through Europe in flames, avengers of our comrades' martyrdom; builders of future Aryandom upon the ruins of Christendom; rulers of the new Golden Age.

She's getting me hot and bothered._Grrreeeeeaaaat_.  We got us another reactionary here, guys.

_Mods, do something for my NAPs!_At least come up with relevant joke material.Tommy boy is a Catholic conservative.  He's already in Curt's camp; he just doesn't know it yet.

I tried to schedule an interview between the two, but I haven't been able to get a hold of Tom yet.

There is zero conflict between Tom's values and Curt's system, and I imagine it's a system Tom would be a thousand times more comfortable pushing than ancap polycentric law (when was the last time you heard Tom talk about "PDAs"?).https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9-gSJW3sHXE&amp;t=8s&gt;Viewing a set of individuals as a society reduces complexity (destroys information).

And why can't it be the reverse?

The greater complexity of the Universe is in its combinations of units, not the units.

(And even this leaves aside my critique of universal atomism\u2014personhood is not equally distributed.)

https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/https://www.reddit.com/r/polfacts/comments/38gsdg/long_list_of_muslim_immigrant_facts/I love how you talk around giving a counter-argument to make it sound less like bullshit.With which degree?There's nothing wrong with having a certain pang for that 17-18 year old girl that's fresh on the scene, but when you're a 45 year old loser attracted to 8 year old girls, we got a problem.Well, your first claim aside, even the anti-racists here would probably prefer a neoreactionary aristocracy to a populist democracy.

At least when you have fewer and more intelligent people with influence, you can more easily reason with them and there are fewer minds to have to sway; when it's a populist democracy, it's communism all the way down.https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3ojgf7/the_lifestyle_of_the_natives_conquered_by_the/cvz7y24Post this question as a thread; I'm confident you'll be told sound economics + racism &gt; democracy + racial egalitarianism.We have indeed had this conversation before and I'll tell you what I told you then: I'm not advocating for an autocracy; aristocracy is not an autocracy, but historically stands in strong defiance of it.&gt;you aren't the person we asked for a source

I'm sorry your attack on him didn't go as planned, truly.

&gt;rambling lists of other articles written by NRxers is bad evidence

TIL CBS News is "NRx."If that's where the economics are, I'd love for you to show me a prominent firm advocating for unprofitable policies.

You guys shouldn't forget I was a moral nihilist consequentialist ancap for nearly a decade; I can take you apart using your own system; it was I who turned many of the prominent consequentialists here into what they now are.I'm thoroughly uninterested in wondering what a mediocre rationalist was thinking X number of days ago.

You don't even understand what the ancient aristocracies historically even were.

Go read Duchesne and then strike a conversation with me; otherwise I'm moving on.Ancap revolution one inch closer thanks to this submission.Probably many East Anglo urbanites.

From here, the demographics of the Democrat vote will be the same group + blacks and Hispanics.So, why do ancaps have such a fetish for social atomism?

Why is the individual the starting point and not the Nation?

After examining biopsychology and neuroscience, 'the individual' is no less an invention than a 'nation' is.It's been a glorious fall into neoreaction.I think people have tipped me Bitcoin in the past, but I don't track the crypto scene for the how-to.Aristocratic republics are anti-state\u2014the State being defined as concentrated social parasitism.

Historically, it was only the aristos who could [defy both tyrant kings and mob rule.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FdjQpQWyff0&amp;t=48m44s)

Historically, it was only via these republics the world has understood any significant measure of liberty.You guys damn yourselves, by talking.In time, ye thirsty ones.Except we talk about different things.No, I'm making a meaningful point to you; if you are a Nietzschean, you shouldn't be an 'anarchist agitator'.Z3F and capchem are not ideological libertarians either.

The wonders of ideological progression.http://i.imgur.com/PHWdRYK.jpgIf so, a New England transplant to the midwest.

I grew up the first ten years of my life in Utah and am familiar with the crisp, neutral speech, but she doesn't have it.

She sounds like a toned down New Englander, not sure which part.  Being a transplant also tones one's accent down, or slightly gives one, as moving to the South and living here for a while has given me a slight drawing out of certain vowels and syllables.&gt;and to be so obsessed with your race

I'm not; my interest in race realism and sociobiology is only an element in a larger worldview.

Nor does RR preclude spiritual and physio dynamism.http://i.imgur.com/7x2T8aU.pngI want you to [read this](https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/The_Genealogy_of_Morals/Second_Essay); it will deepen your Christianity.

I read most of C.S. Lewis' theological commentaries as a child and enjoyed his Christian asceticism; Nietzsche is a religious ascetic and is a natural progression from one to the other.If someone needs to be told a separate name from ancap may be separate, their IQ probably wasn't of any use anyways.So, be like those

&gt;Bitchass Pussy

speech-control leftists.

At least be a man and reveal your anus is a little inflamed and you would like it not so; ah, but if you had that integrity, it wouldn't be inflamed.Those two have forgotten more about ancap than you understand.

Ancap theory progressed (techno-commercialism, testimonialism); get over it.&gt;how much people will do to avoid even a small

Well, it would just be relative to ease of escape.Why would I leave?  I was one of the most prominently supported members here, and I've turned 50-100 people over to various elements of my worldview.  I'm doing great.  \u25d4\u25e1\u25d4

I once had most or all of your worldview; I didn't pout when new ideas came around the corner.  It's a wonder you even became an ancap in the first place, if you're this hypersensitive to foreign ideas.Ah, maybe; we'll see.http://i.giphy.com/DyKyJJAI99r5m.gifhttps://iq-research.org/en/page/average-iq-by-country/ve-venezuelaThat damn kike.It's not everyone but China, and there are many non-Europeans in Western countries.Sub-Saharan Africans are more than one standard deviation below 100.&gt;can we just admit that once you've reached the point of being in favor of ~~using government to curb immigration (as many such videos here seems to express)~~ _not stopping people who hate libertarianism from taking from you and increasing how anti-libertarian your government is_ you've conceded anarcho-capitalism _ever existing_? &gt;In a free society, I don't want borders blocking people out of the country.

Which country has that ever been?  It's smart to be drained of capital and conquered?

&gt;I don't necessarily have a problem with it in a statist society

You don't have a problem with the government getting an even larger mandate to be anti-libertarian?

&gt;The problem of course is welfare and taxation

Which those immigrants resoundingly vote for.

&gt;which should not exist and will not exist in a free society

So, you're cool with a pig, so long as it can fly.&gt;how has the State homesteaded all of the land in a country like the US?

Property norms have never been that atomistic; property is inherently a collectivist institution\u2014your neighbors and countrymen's willingness to enforce your claims.

We can as a group prefer to enforce relatively more individualistic dynamics, but that doesn't mean an anti-social actor gets to come in and abuse everything without danger.

So, if we can accept that property is a collectivist phenomenon, we can understand how it historically has been that governments have maintained (any air of) legitimacy.  We can hope to have an even better system with a smaller or no "state," but that doesn't change that crying about homesteading doesn't mean anything in the final absolute.[Norway](http://www.heritage.org/index/country/norway)'s actually not that bad a place to live or do business, especially relative to brown countries: 

http://i.imgur.com/5fOkfcI.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/YQ8HgEA.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/mNLOK55.jpg

http://i.imgur.com/Cn4t64D.jpg

Also, note how Northern Europe is economically freer than Southern Europe, another non-accident.&gt;People who hate libertarianism

They're probably referring to Levantine libertarianism (lying, parasitism, anti-social), which is extremely anti-communal and anti-actually-existing-libertarianism, the high-trust Northern European classical liberal model.&gt;The problem is not about open borders but about the welfare state.

How did we get the welfare state?  Women's suffrage, which gradually led to single motherhood, which gradually led to a state that wanted to keep growing, so it removed restrictions on non-white immigration.

Almost sounds like libertarianism needs social conservatism to exist.&gt;it's framed very much as anti-immigrant when it should be anti-welfare

Why don't you guys just champion meritocracy and be anti-those-who-are-not-meritorious?

That means pro-certain kinds of immigration and anti-other kinds (race realism has found that this will likely result in a 90+% white population, but it is what it is).The West\u2014US and Europe primarily, with South Africa already lost.

&gt;but such an assumption is inconsistant with anarcho-capitalism in the first place

Most ancaps' ignorance of nation and subnation dynamics is why many of them can't be taken philosophically seriously, and why many have moved on into the alt-right, where we understand something more than microeconomics.&gt;but borders around unclaimed land aren't helping either. Unused land doesn't provide utility.

Because low-skill, pro-welfare laborers are here only to find abandoned land in Wyoming.

&gt;What's your point? My mostly homogenous, white Nation is already voting more and more socialist.

Norway, again?  The country that's much freer than most of Europe and the rest of the world?

&gt;one where homesteading isn't legitimate? That's fine, but that sounds vastly more similar to what those AnComs want

Property is inherently a collectivist phenomenon; if you can't accept that, then your political philosophy will remain in the realm of coloring books.&gt;But why should I deny someone else the possibility to homestead an unused plot of land?

If they're planning on using it to subvert your nation (terrorism, staging ground for invasion, chemical warfare, etc.).&gt;I think a violent monopoly is an inherently flawed concept

The point is to solve the public goods problem, not adopt a low trust ethic ("NAP lets me be a scumbag!").

&gt;but the State has no legitimate claim on all of the land in their country

The State exists because there's a demand for protection of positive externalities, which have not been solved otherwise.  You should solve the public goods problem first and abolish the State second (you don't have a choice, anyways).&gt;How is that evidence that it isn't moving left?

Supposedly, it became even freer from where it was last year.

In any event, all of the West is struggling with a hostile elite right now; our states have ramped up how anti-the host nation they are.

Many European institutions like free speech are gradually being lost, thanks to that hostile elite looking to slow boil us, but nationalism is on the rise probably faster than they anticipated.&gt;I don't see how not wanting a violent monopoly is contradictory to solving the public goods problem.

It isn't, and I'm not pro-State, but again, the point is to solve the problem.

Historically, how Northern Europe did it and why it became so much wealthier and innovative than the rest of the world was the build-up of high trust, via outbreeding coupled with eugenic institutions and pacification of liars and other miscreants.

When the social transaction costs of a nation are high, the State is large (what do you have to lose when everyone around you is already a scumbag and you have to secure some measure of predictability to survive?); when they are low, the State is small.

No one likes the State as the ideal solution, but they don't like ghetto ethics (liars, con artists, two-timers, etc.) either.Where's the magical moral value in the individual?

'The individual' isn't even a defined entity, but an amorphous overlap of other individuals, creating groups and subgroups.

No one has 100% original thoughts; language itself is an instance of overlap.

It's smart to have some healthy measure of individualism to allow for agility of thought and change, but to pretend like everyone is a special snowflake and group dynamics don't exist is equal folly and equally contemptible.

We need observance of both phenomena to get the maximum flow: only looking at "individuals" would probably cut off the spectrum of ideas even more immediately (ideas evolve through people, friends, and groups, not single individuals).Those two are related.  "Anarcho-Capitalism" is Levantine ethics\u2014international law, anti-social, etc..

Those who want to actually manifest libertarianism should focus on Curt's testimonialist system, the next stage in the evolution of libertarian theory and where many of us have moved on into.

[I have come back to save my flock.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2NDBVi3QdwU&amp;t=2m16s)&gt;What would you do if you became president of your home country? 

Abolish Fed.

End most welfare.

Give Hispanics and blacks their own sovereign section of the country or send most of them back to more native lands.

Have a meritorious naturalization process that involves more than reciting a couple historical trivia.

Remove individual voter suffrage and give it only to family blocs.

Encourage eugenic breeding; discourage dysgenic breeding.I didn't link for the ranking, but the raw figure that we're dealing with: Hispanics tend to be of mediocre-to-low intelligence.lol, thank God, and you shouldn't have told the social parasite.&gt;NRX: The aristocracy is smart so they have the answer.
AnCap: Well its a complex process of market signals and maybe this and maybe that and incentives for this and that ect ect..

Aristos aren't central planners of the bourgeoisie; the bourgeoisie are given their sphere.

What is really referred to is that the society is spiritually higher to not be so dominated by only bourgeois materialist desires; this is where the aristos come in, as spiritual and artistic guides.

&gt;Centrally controlled ... aristocracy

Which is a contradiction in terms: the aristocracies were decentralized, [acted as checks on any kings](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FdjQpQWyff0&amp;t=48m44s), and gave birth to the only significant measure of freedom the world has ever known.

&gt;that has been used many times and failed just as many

Wha?  [This](https://i.imgur.com/4QMUtnT.png) is a failure?

Rome, Greece, and Northern Europe were "failures", in art, philosophy, science, technology, and economy?

&gt;is all basic monkey shit

You seem to be describing your own level of understanding of what I and those around me put forward.

You do realize that neoreaction is perhaps the most diverse range of ideologies in existence, right?  None of us here are monarchists, because we realize how historically silly that is.

The West's tradition and the source of its success is aristocracy.Don't trust ~~Fl~~ Lynn, perhaps the most respected psychometric scholar in history?You're not a 'retard', aletoledo; I put you around a 130 IQ, which is quite intelligent.

You are actually a very novel thinker; you're just quite asocial, which brings its pros and cons.

You have been at least a more entertaining commentator here for me than the others, as I'm sure I am to some, too.&gt; Can we say the word "nigger"?

_OH MY GOLLY GEE WILKERS_

&gt;If we can't counter their arguments with logic and evidence, then they must be correct.

You will be my banner when I re-enter the conquered kingdom.&gt;It shouldn't be the job of community members to be constantly refuting something that doesn't belong here in the first place.

And yet you guys love to do it when it's basic bitch economic points against leftists, because most of you can do it.

When it's us... well, we know of your inabilities.&gt;Sure, why not?

Bahahaha.&gt;This isn't a democracy.

And you lost.Cialis is a gentleman of the highest sort.

I demand a cage fight for this slanderous injustice.lol, I meant to type Lynn; just now realized how close the two's last names are.

Rushton also did great empirical work.Most movies are superficial anyways and not accidentally.&gt;See? Why would you have a problem with darchdolla's focus on jews?

Because it's not the only matter and it certainly isn't the most important.

&gt;Is this somehow a jewish only trait? Or even a defining trait of jews?

It's the most prominent one, given high ethnocentrism and diaspora.&gt;I think this assertion is a bit too strong. If the public goods problem were solved, the state might go away as people would become more able to defend themselves against it.

Implicit in that statement was that non-state actors weren't able to yet solve the matter.What's your particular suggestions?&gt; everyone can come and go as they please (like an ancap society)

Oh, boy.Sounds more like a man-child, dishonorable loser.&gt;Most of us don't believe in morality

Believing in the objectivity of morality isn't the same claim as having anti-life values.

&gt;social orders based on violent enforcement instead of free association

So, your end game is one of non-violence.What about it?  Genetics stops mattering?

Does 'force' stop mattering because it's a science construct, too?&gt;I know we used to do it, but I don't understand it.

Genetics doesn't matter?Context matters, indeed, which creates the basis for language and [which shows the facile objection that there aren't non-contextual definitions for words for what it is: facile.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GJ-e5XjlmZA&amp;t=1h53m19s)You sure scienced him, with your funnies.&gt;of questionable use anyway

Like predicting intelligence, behavior, income, assets, crime, life outcome, etc.?&gt;you still have to demonstrate that IQ measures something biological

You're wanting certain SNPs correlated with a high or low IQ?  It's already been done: 

http://www.eupedia.com/genetics/psychological_traits_snp.shtml

http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/18855131?dopt=Abstract

http://dare.ubvu.vu.nl/bitstream/handle/1871/11368/7201.pdf;jsessionid=7C151A174A4FED71D367F4B6A650E029?sequence=5

&gt; that "race" measures something biological

Self-identified race strongly correlates with genetic markers for such field-context constructs (i.e. 'race'):

http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC1196372/

&gt;"race"-mixing in order to strengthen the species in general

Why would race-mixing necessarily lead to improvement?&gt;That's not much in the way of evidence.

Evidence of what?

There isn't an absolute definition for a chair or a truck; not going to stop using the words.

Language never was anything but sensory imposition.

&gt;using race will always involve discriminating against individuals on the basis of the qualities of other individuals. It just amounts to a bad heuristic for most uses

It's certainly possible, but when some leftists analyze racial statistics and demand aid, it's useful to understand why those racial disparities exist.

What's more, no one demands East Asians give up their incomes which are slightly higher than whites'; it's only whites who receive this demand, precisely because of their sociopolitical history (low ethnocentrism, outgroup altruism, etc.)\u2014in other words, only whites are low ethnocentric enough to fall for a high ethnocentric strat.&gt;also apply to marginalized ethnicities in other countries

What's their skin complexion?  I bet it's brown.

&gt;to give you some bread crumbs to follow where this line of argumentation is going, consider that everything you say about black Americans today was similarly believed of the Irish from at least the sixteenth to nineteenth centuries. Do they still experience such stark disparities in their social outcomes, at least in the United States?

Did you know southern slaves were fed and treated better than northern Irish?  There's even a song about it the slaves sung.  Guess which one still has low IQs?So, why has Africa been a violent shithole for all eternity?

Why has the Near East always been low trust?  Whitey did that, too?

Or could it be sociobiological adaptation (high ethnocentrism)?hamjam?  He's no more Nietzschean than Foucault was.

I keep telling him to call himself a more accurate term, like Novatorean.&gt;was clearly very strongly influenced by

You think Nietzsche was a facile deconstructionist nihilist or that he supported that kind of thing?&gt;for failing to live up to the life affirmation he saw in the ancient Greeks

That's True, but he didn't see the Greeks as the ideal either.You think he chose to become detached?  It is the necessary result of a dying unconscious.Are you claiming N. was a mere moral nihilist?_"I can't guilt Capitalism for more gibs."_&gt;It is absolutely not libertarian to police people based on ideology.

It would more be how it goes on to cause demonstrated behavior.Curt's system has already won out as a scientific language.

From here, it just depends on what medium it's applied.

Also, good summation of where we historically are.[Why ancaps have trouble differentiating socialists and fascists.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3p4oas/serious_question_what_is_the_difference_between/cw3f4fx)

In short, 'laissez-faire'-ists have trouble distinguishing anything that disempowers the bourgeoisie in any way.

The definition of freedom for a libertarian is: where the bourgeoisie rule and others don't.&gt;non-voluntary acts (whether aimed towards promoting equality or not) are improper

That already is a form of leftism, just a milder kind.In being leftist, right?

As if dialectics isn't egalitarian.&gt;And we don't need to rely on questionable, pseudoscientific eugenics claims to justify our belief system. We have actual arguments and claims, bolstered by reason and empirical studies.

Must be easy to argue, when you just say, "They = poor arguments; Me = great arguments," and then call it a day.

&gt;the constant fallacy of conflating correlation with causation 

All of science is mere correlation.

&gt;a decidedly Brown classical liberal revolution

A number of people of Spanish descent are actually not that Amerindian or African.

&gt;Bottom line: you don't have a program.

I recommend looking into Curt's system.&gt;Then what in the world is all the hubbub about on this sub?

In Cialis' way of seeing things, we are not a part of "NRx," and neither is Curt.

&gt;a Ukrainian basement

Now, Curt is not an ideal friend of mine, but this is pure slander; the man is actually very wealthy and leads a life of luxury.  Furthermore, if I'd say anything about Curt, it's that he's actually hyperscientific, and he's not as much of a race realist as I am either.&gt;that every category of humanity save for White Europeans are genetically and ethnically incompatible with a free and civilized society

You're a fool: look at Cialis' flair.  East Asians have been integrated into European global economies fairly well, certainly to a level worth doing.&gt;is it me or a sheer number of Neoreactionaries are dank /pol/ memers?

Creature of the Internet and PC times, really.&gt;terrorizing rural America

Where?When you say fascism, you're probably referring to your public school education on 20th century totalitarianism.

The actual origin of the fasces was with the Roman and Etruscan republics.&gt;give you more material to argue against

[Here you go.](https://www.youtube.com/user/DeAristocratia/videos)

&gt;and tell me what the fuck is NRx

I can explain NRx, Nietzsche, Curt, aristocratic history, and more on Skype with you just fine.

And you know I can, so there's no reason to feign outrage here.You're probably asking what testimonialism is, not "NRx."The beautiful aristocratic circle.I noticed your knowledge of N. has expanded since last we spoke.

Have you read _On the Genealogy of Morals_?

&gt;The Ancient Greeks were just people who were more alike with the overhuman than any of the moderns, at least I think.

Well, that's relative to the modern Christian nihilist, which has lost the psychological strength to shackle itself to a god, hence why their god 'had to die for them'.

(All gods are inventions, but religions and the nature of a given deity reveal much about the artistic and psychological nature of a people.)

The Greek gods revealed a people in a particular phase of the ego's self-imprison, but it's not that close to the overman either\u2014the overman represents the end of the self-imprison askesis, which Nietzsche conceives of as a pleasurable and intended trial.

The Second Essay of _On the Genealogy of Morals_ explains all of this: power wanted to invent power against itself, to taste itself.  This is the origin of Nietzsche's 'commanding and obeying': he doesn't mean just some cheesy dictatorship to be all edgy and spooky.&gt;It's just the one you constantly bring up when people don't agree with you.

It's a type of behavior, not mere disagreement.

I debate people daily and many of the debaters are honorable men.

&gt;Jerry Seinfeld unusually sardonic and manipulative?

Jewish people aren't really that distinct of a race or ethnicity; they're about as incoherent one as Hispanics.

Probably the most prevalent trait today is a talent for comedy and wit; from there, more devious sides of that can result, but not always, probably because many 'Jews' are very diluted.

Jews have been in diaspora for thousands of years and that has had an impression on them: they are natural critiquers of their host Europeans (Marx, Freud, Frankfurt school, comedians, Jewish SJWs, Jewish pioneering of porn, etc.).&gt;John Welsh

He seems to have an okay understanding of the fundamental difference between the two.

What I would say is a better presentation is this: Nietzsche would see Stirner as symptomatic of the historical phase and spiritual cycle, as a further development of the Socratic dissolving spirit, where the spirit severs itself in a confused and morbid weakness (it doesn't understand yet [the value of immoralism](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/35ctpo/the_neonazi_element_in_this_sub_is_disturbing/cr3q0br)).

Ultimately, this degeneration was undertaken by larger forces, for the sake and joy of an ascetic trial, where power could come to know itself fully, expense as the demonstration of what was, cost as gain and identity.

This is the same ethic of a warrior (hence, [Nietzsche's conception of freedom as war and his free man as a warrior](https://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/3gb6m4/the_aristocratic_origin_of_freedom_ricardo/)) who has no fear of death and even a subtle desire for it, because he'll come to fully know the rest of himself, the brief moment of full adrenaline and an electrified psyche as the justification for his whole life.Yes, as self-serving as it may sound to say this, a deep understanding of Nietzsche will de-egalitarianize a person.

You ultimately come to see the movement of forces, not people, and it leads to a natural aristocratic disposition, where equality and nonviolence are not ideals.

Equality freezes the movement of forces, and nonviolence is spiritual suicide.&gt;my disagreement with him

I know you already have an intuitive idea of what that disagreement is, but just need the language and framing, so what is the intuitive disagreement?

&gt;That's replacing my old masters with new ones.

What would be wrong with that?  And could there not be a deeper way of communing with reality than understanding and interfacing with the past and present, not hate it and demand some far-off utopian future?

&gt;I gave up non-violence and equality so that I could fully own my ideas and values, not so I could enslavement myself to new fixed ideas.

What's 'fi